Privacy notice
Privacy notice
General notes
This privacy policy contains detailed information about what happens to your personal data when you visit our website. Personal data is any data with which you can personally identify yourself. We strictly adhere to the legal provisions when processing your data, in particular the Data Protection Regulation ("GDPR"), and attach great importance to ensuring that your visit to our website is absolutely secure.
Responsible body
Responsible under data protection law for the collection and processing of personal data on this website is:
Name:
barely digital GmbH & Co KG
Represented by:
Tobias Hübner, Jan Kofoet, Managing Director
Street, house number:
Konrad-Adenauer-Str. 8
Postcode, town:
86836 Klosterlechfeld
Country:
Germany
E-mail:
service@vintrica.com
Tel.:
+49 8232 / 76 899 76 - 40
Websites:
www.vintrica.com, www.hu-vignette.com, www.ch-vignette.com, www.si-vignette.com, www.cze-vignette.com, www.sk-vignette.com, www.bg-vignette.com, www.ch-vignette.com, www.evignette.ro
Access data (server log files)
When you access our website, we automatically collect and store in so-called server log files access data that your browser automatically transmits to us. These are:
- Browser type and browser version of your PC
- Operating system used by your PC
- Referrer URL (source/reference from which you came to our website)
- Date and time of the server request
- the IP address currently used by your PC (if applicable, in anonymised form)
As a rule, it is not possible for us to make a personal reference, nor is it intended to do so. The processing of such data is carried out in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f GDPR to protect our legitimate interest in improving the stability and functionality of our website.
Hosting / Content Delivery Network
Amazon Cloudfront
We use the Amazon CloudFront content delivery network (CDN) from Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, 38 avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855 Luxembourg (AWS) to increase the security and delivery speed of our website. This corresponds to our legitimate interest (Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f GDPR). A CDN is a network of servers distributed worldwide that is able to deliver optimised content to the website user. For this purpose, personal data may be processed in server log files by AWS. Please compare the explanations under "Access data".
AWS is the recipient of your personal data and acts as a processor for us. This corresponds to our legitimate interest within the meaning of Art. 6 (1) sentence 1 lit. f GDPR not to operate a content delivery network ourselves.
You have the right to object to the processing. Whether the objection is successful is to be determined within the framework of a balancing of interests.
The processing of the data provided under this section is not required by law or by contract. The functionality of the website is not guaranteed without the processing.
Your personal data will be stored by AWS for as long as is necessary for the purposes described.
For more information on how to object to and remove your data from AWS, please visit:
https://aws.amazon.com/de/compliance/gdpr-center/
.
AWS has implemented compliance measures for international data transfers. These apply to all global activities where AWS processes personal data of individuals in the EU. These measures are based on the EU Standard Contractual Clauses (SCCs). For more information, please visit: :
https://d1.awsstatic.com/legal/aws-gdpr/AWS_GDPR_DPA.pdf
.
.Amazon Web Services Inc. with headquarters in the USA is certified for the us-European data protection agreement "Privacy Shield", which ensures compliance with the level of data protection applicable in the EU.
Cookies
- In order to make visiting our website more attractive and to enable the use of certain functions, we use so-called cookies. These are small text files that are stored on your terminal device. Cookies cannot execute programs or transfer viruses to your computer system.
- Cookies that are required to carry out the electronic communication process or to provide certain functions you have requested are stored on the basis of Art. 6 (1) lit. f GDPR. We have a legitimate interest in storing cookies for the technically error-free and optimised provision of our services. Insofar as other cookies (e.g. cookies to analyse your surfing behaviour) are stored, these are treated separately in this data protection declaration.
- Most of the cookies we use are so-called "session cookies". They are automatically deleted at the end of your visit. Other cookies remain stored on your terminal device until you delete them. These cookies enable us to recognise your browser on your next visit.
- You can set your browser so that you are informed about the setting of cookies and only allow cookies in individual cases, exclude the acceptance of cookies for certain cases or in general and activate the automatic deletion of cookies when closing the browser. If you deactivate cookies, the functionality of this website may be limited.
Web analysis tools and advertising
Google Analytics
Our website uses the web analytics service Google Analytics. The provider is Google Ireland Ltd, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland ("Google").
Google Analytics uses so-called "cookies". These are text files that are stored on your computer and enable an analysis of your use of our website. The information generated by cookies about your use of our website is usually transferred to a Google server in the USA and stored there.
The legal basis for the processing of your data is the consent you have given via the cookie consent tool in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a) GDPR.
IP anonymisation
We have activated the IP anonymisation function on this website. This means that your IP address is shortened by Google within member states of the European Union or in other contracting states of the Agreement on the European Economic Area before being transmitted to the USA. Only in exceptional cases will the full IP address be transmitted to a Google server in the USA and shortened there. Google will use this information on our behalf for the purpose of evaluating your use of our website, compiling reports on website activity and providing other services relating to website activity and internet usage to us. The IP address transmitted by your browser as part of Google Analytics will not be merged with other Google data.
Job processing
We have concluded an order data processing contract with Google and fully implement the strict requirements of the German data protection authorities when using Google Analytics.
Storage period
Data stored by Google at user and event level that are linked to cookies, user identifiers (e.g. user ID) or advertising IDs (e.g. DoubleClick cookies, Android advertising ID) are anonymised or deleted after 14 months. Details can be found under the following link:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/7667196?hl=en
.
Objection to data collection
You may refuse the use of cookies by selecting the appropriate settings on your browser, however please note that if you do this you may not be able to use the full functionality of this website.
You can also prevent the collection of data generated by the cookies and related to your use of the website (including your IP address) to Google and the processing of this data by Google by downloading and installing the browser add-on available under the following link to deactivate Google Analytics:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en
. If you delete the cookies on your computer, you must set the opt-out cookie again.
For more information on how Google Analytics handles user data, please see Google's privacy policy:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=en
.
Further information on data protection can be found in Google's privacy policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en&gl=en
.
TrackJS
Our website uses services provided by TrackJS LLC. ("TrackJS") to analyse technical errors in the use of our website. For more information, please see the TrackJS privacy policy:
https://trackjs.com/privacy/
.
Hotjar
We use Hotjar to better understand the needs of our users and to optimise the offering and experience on this website. Hotjar's technology gives us a better understanding of our users' experiences (e.g. how much time users spend on which pages, which links they click on, what they like and dislike, etc.) and helps us to tailor our offering to our users' feedback. Hotjar uses cookies and other technologies to collect data about the behaviour of our users and their devices, in particular the IP address of the device (only collected and stored anonymously during your use of the website), screen size, device type (unique device identifiers), information about the browser used, location (country only), preferred language for viewing our website. Hotjar stores this information on our behalf in a pseudonymised user profile. Hotjar is contractually prohibited from selling the data collected on our behalf.
For more information, see the 'about Hotjar' section on Hotjar's help page:
https://help.hotjar.com/hc/en-us/categories/115001323967-About-Hotjar
.
targeting360
Cookies are used on our website to enable retargeting advertising campaigns by targeting360 GmbH, Gredinger Str. 24a, 90453 Nuremberg, Germany. The adserving technology of NEORY GmbH, Dortmund, is used for this purpose. For the same purpose, targeting360 GmbH may also load technologies from the providers Adform, Adition, Google or The Trade Desk. These technologies may set additional cookies for this purpose.
The purpose of retargeting is to be able to display interest-based advertising to visitors to our websites on websites of partners in the advertising network.
When you visit our websites and after you have given your consent, the technology used stores a cookie with a unique identifier (cookie ID) in the browser on the end device you are using. If a cookie stored in the browser with this ID is read on a partner site, your device can be recognised. You can then be shown adverts on the partner site that relate, for example, to content that you have previously accessed on our websites.
In order to actually only show you adverts that match your interests, a usage profile is created by analysing the data that is transmitted from your end device to the requested server when you interact with the websites. Your IP address recorded in the process is anonymised by shortening and hashing right at the start of processing. The cookie ID, the approximate location according to the shortened IP address, Internet provider, access speed, technical information on the browser and end device used, operating system, preferred languages according to browser settings, HTTP referrer and date and time of the server request are also used for the usage profile. Your pseudonymised data processed in this way cannot be assigned to you without further ado. Advertising success is also calculated using pseudonymised data without being able to identify a specific person.
The legal basis for the use of the cookies used here and the subsequent processing is your consent in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 lit a) GDPR. You can terminate the processing of the above-mentioned data based on your consent and the further use of the cookies used for this purpose by exercising your right of revocation or objection under the following link:
https://ad.ad-srv.net/privacy/kdb0xdq3ls8m/
.
Google Tag Manager
Our website uses the Google Tag Manager from the provider Google. Google Tag Manager is a solution with which marketers can manage website tags via an interface. The tool that implements the tags is a cookie-less domain and does not store any personal data. The tool takes care of triggering other tags, which in turn may collect data. Google Tag Manager does not access this data. If a deactivation has been made at the domain or cookie level, this remains in place for all tracking tags that are implemented with Google Tag Manager.
Google Ads and Google Conversion Tracking
Our website uses Google Ads (formerly Google AdWords). Google Ads is an online advertising programme of the provider Google.
Google Ads enables us to draw attention to our offers with the help of advertising media on external websites and to determine how successful individual advertising measures are. This helps us to show you advertising that is of interest to you, to make our website more interesting for you and to achieve a fair calculation of advertising costs.
Within the framework of Google Ads, we use so-called conversion tracking. The advertising material is delivered by Google via so-called "AdServers". For this purpose, we use so-called AdServer cookies, which can be used to measure certain parameters for measuring success, such as the display of ads or clicks by users. When you click on an ad placed by Google, a cookie is set for conversion tracking. Cookies are small text files that the internet browser stores on the user's computer. These cookies lose their validity after 30 days and are not used to personally identify users. These cookies enable Google to recognise your web browser. If you visit certain pages of our website when the cookie has not yet expired, Google and we can recognise that you have clicked on the specific advertisement and have been redirected to this page.
Each Google Ads client receives a different cookie. The cookies can therefore not be tracked via the websites of Ads customers. The following information is usually stored as analysis values for the cookie: unique cookie ID, number of ad impressions per placement (frequency), last impression (relevant for post-view conversions), opt-out information (marking that the user no longer wishes to be addressed). The information obtained using the conversion cookie is used to create conversion statistics for Ads customers who have opted in to conversion tracking. The Ads clients learn the total number of users who clicked on their ad and were redirected to a page tagged with a conversion tracking tag. However, they do not receive any information that can be used to personally identify users. If you do not wish to participate in the tracking, you can object to this use by easily deactivating the Google conversion tracking cookie via your internet browser under user settings. You will then not be included in the conversion tracking statistics.
The aggregation of the collected data in your Google account is based exclusively on your consent, which you can give or revoke at Google (Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a GDPR). In the case of data collection processes that are not merged in your Google account (e.g. because you do not have a Google account or have objected to the merging), the collection of data is based on Art. 6 (1) lit. f GDPR. The legitimate interest arises from the fact that we have an interest in the anonymised analysis of visitors to our website for advertising purposes in order to optimise both our web offering and our advertising.
Further information and the data protection provisions can be found in Google's data protection declaration at:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/ads?hl=en
.
Microsoft Advertising (formerly Bing Ads)
This website uses Microsoft Advertising. This is a tracking and advertising service using cookies and web beacons provided by Microsoft Corporation, One Microsoft Way, Redmond, WA 98052-6399, United States of America. The cookie is activated for a maximum of 1 year and 25 days.
The purposes of data collection and processing are advertising and conversion tracking. The following categories of (personal) data that may be collected and analysed as part of the service: Browser language, Ads clicked, Digital signature, GUID generated by the UET tag, IP address, Microsoft click ID, Microsoft cookie, Page title, Referrer URL, Screen colour depth, Screen resolution, UET ID tag, Page load time, Publisher/URL access.
Processing takes place in the European Union, but may also be transferred to third countries. Please note that this service may transfer data outside the European Union and the European Economic Area and to a country that does not provide an adequate level of data protection.
If the data is transferred to the USA, there is a risk that your data may be processed by US authorities for control and monitoring purposes without you possibly having any legal remedy. Microsoft has additionally agreed standard data protection clauses in the terms of use as a guarantee for an appropriate level of data protection.
Further information and Microsoft's privacy policy can be found at this link:
https://learn.microsoft.com/de-de/compliance/regulatory/offering-EU-Model-Clauses?view=o365-worldwide
.
Spotify Ad Pixel
Our website uses the Spotify Ad Pixel, a service provided by Spotify AB, Regeringsgatan 19, SE-111 53 Stockholm, Sweden. With your consent, we activate the Spotify Pixel when you visit our website. The Spotify Ad Pixel allows us to evaluate and analyse user behaviour on our website. This processing helps us deliver content efficiently and assess the effectiveness of our advertising efforts.
Processing is based on your consent in accordance with Article 6(1)(a) of the GDPR, which you can provide via our cookie banner. You may withdraw your consent at any time with future effect by adjusting the cookie settings on our website.
For more information about Spotify’s data processing practices, please refer to Spotify’s Privacy Policy:
https://www.spotify.com/de-en/legal/privacy-policy/
.
Third-party provider
CM.com
We use CM.com, to send confirmation SMS messages to the customer on explicit customer request. Here the telephone number and the message content are transmitted to the Dutch provider CM.com. Responsible for this is CM. com Netherlands B.V. Konijnenberg 30, 4825 BD Breda, the Netherlands. For more information regarding the use of the D aten, visit
https://www.cm.com/en-gb/app/legal/cmcom-legal//
.
Nemzeti Mobilfizetési Zrt.
If you purchase an e-vignette for Hungary via vintrica, we will transfer your personal data (such as country of vehicle registration, license plate number, vehicle category, period of validity) to the following recipient in order to fulfill the contract and register the vignette:
Nemzeti Mobilfizetési Zrt.
Kapás utca 6-12
1027 Budapest
Hungary
The customer is hereby informed, that the service for E-Vignettes for Hungary is based on centralized mobile payment of services sold by the NMFSZ (Hungarian abbreviation for National Mobile Payment Service Provider):
Nemzeti Mobilfizetési Zrt.
Kapás utca 6-12
1027 Budapest
Hungary
LetterXpress
To send letters , our website uses the LetterXpress service. Data required for this process is transmitted to this provider. A&O Fischer GmbH & Co KG, Maybachstraße 9, 21423 Winsen (Luhe), Germany is responsible for handling this data. You can find more information at the following address:
https://www.letterxpress.de/ueber-uns/datenschutz
.
State Fund for Traffic Infrastructure
As part of the registration process for a Czech motorway vignette for vehicles registered in the Czech Republic, we automatically transmit the vehicle license plate number you enter during the online process to the "Státní fond dopravní infrastruktury" (State Fund for Transport Infrastructure), with its registered office at Sokolovská 1955/278, 190 00 Praha 9, Czech Republic. The purpose of this data transmission is to verify whether the licence plate number entered exists and to determine the type of drive system of the vehicle. We use the information received exclusively to determine the correct vignette category for your vehicle. This data is stored for the duration of the registration process and until the vignette expires. Our aim is to use this process to ensure that the correct vignette category is determined efficiently and correctly and to ensure compliance with legal requirements. You can find more information at:
https://edalnice.cz/en/gdpr-and-personal-data/index.html
.
Contact form
If you contact us by e-mail or via a contact form, the transmitted data including your contact details will be stored in order to be able to process your enquiry or to be available for follow-up questions. This data will not be passed on without your consent.
The data entered in the contact form is processed exclusively on the basis of your consent (Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a GDPR). You may revoke your consent at any time. An informal communication by e-mail is sufficient for the revocation. The legality of the data processing operations carried out until the revocation remains unaffected by the revocation.
Data transmitted via the contact form will remain with us until you request us to delete it, revoke your consent to store it or there is no longer any need to store the data. Mandatory legal provisions - in particular retention periods - remain unaffected.
Customer account
If you open a customer account, you agree that your inventory data such as name, address, e-mail address as well as your usage data (user name, password) are stored. This enables you to order from us using your e-mail address and your personal password.
Subscribe to our e-mail newsletter
If you register for our e-mail newsletter, we will send you regular information about our news and offers. Only your e-mail address is required for sending the newsletter. The provision of any other data is voluntary and will be used to address you personally. We use the so-called double opt-in procedure for sending the newsletter. This means that we will only send you an e-mail newsletter if you have expressly confirmed that you consent to the sending of newsletters. We will then send you a confirmation e-mail asking you to confirm that you wish to receive future newsletters by clicking on a corresponding link. By activating the confirmation link, you give us your consent for the use of your personal data in accordance with Art. 6 Para. 1 lit. a GDPR. When you register for the newsletter, we store your IP address entered by your internet service provider (ISP) as well as the date and time of registration in order to be able to track your consent and possible misuse of your email address at a later date. The data collected by us when you register for the newsletter is used exclusively for the purpose of addressing you in an advertising manner by way of the newsletter. You can unsubscribe from the newsletter at any time via the link provided for this purpose in the newsletter or by sending a corresponding message to the responsible person named at the beginning. After unsubscribing, your e-mail address will be deleted from our newsletter distribution list immediately, unless you have expressly consented to further use of your data or we reserve the right to use your data in a way that goes beyond this and is permitted by law and about which we inform you in this declaration.
Online payments
When you order goods or services in our online shop, it is necessary for the fulfilment of the contract that you provide your personal data, which is necessary for the processing of your order. The mandatory data required for the processing of the contract are marked separately. Depending on the selected payment method, the data required for payment processing will be forwarded to the corresponding payment service providers. The processing of your data is carried out on the legal basis of Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b) GDPR.
American Express
We use American Express on our website. The service provider is the American Express Company. The company responsible for the European region is American Express Europe S.A., Avenida Partenón 12-14, 28042, Madrid, Spain.
The data processing is essentially carried out by American Express. This may result in data not being processed and stored anonymously. Furthermore, US government authorities may have access to individual data. It is also possible that this data may be linked to data from other American Express services with which you have a user account.
You can find out more about the data processed through the use of American Express in the Privacy Policy on
https://www.americanexpress.com/uk/company/legal/privacy-centre/
.
Apple Pay
We use Apple Pay, a service for online payment processes, on our website. The service provider is the American company Apple Inc., Infinite Loop, Cupertino, CA 95014, USA.
The data processing is essentially carried out by Apple Pay. This may result in data not being processed and stored anonymously. Furthermore, US government authorities may have access to individual data. It may also happen that this data is linked to data from possible other Apple services with which you have a user account.
You can find out more about the data processed through the use of Apple Pay in the Privacy Policy at
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/en-ww/
.
Discover
We use the payment system service provider Discover on our website. The service provider is the American company Discover Financial Services, 2500 Lake Cook Rd, Riverwoods, IL 60015, USA.
Data processing is essentially carried out by Discover. This may result in data not being processed and stored anonymously. Furthermore, US government authorities may have access to individual data. It is also possible that this data may be linked to data from other Discover services with which you have a user account.
You can find out more about the data processed through the use of Discover in the Privacy Policy at
https://www.discover.com/privacy-statement/eu-data.html
.
giropay
We use the online payment provider giropay on our website. The service provider is the German company paydirekt GmbH, Stephanstraße 14-16, 60313 Frankfurt am Main, Germany. You can find out more about the data processed through the use of giropay in the data protection declaration on
https://www.giropay.de/agb/index.html
.
Google Pay
We use the online payment provider Google Pay on our website. The service provider is the American company Google Inc. For the European area, the company Google Ireland Ltd, Gordon House, Barrow Street Dublin 4, Ireland is responsible for all Google services.
The data processing is essentially carried out by Google Pay. This may result in data not being processed and stored anonymously. Furthermore, US government authorities may be able to access individual data. It is also possible that this data may be linked to data from other Google services with which you have a user account.
You can find out more about the data processed through the use of Google Pay in the Privacy Policy at
https://policies.google.com/privacy
.
Mastercard/Maestro
We use the payment service provider Mastercard on our website. The service provider is the American company Mastercard Inc. The company responsible for the European region is Mastercard Europe SA, Chaussée de Tervuren 198A, B-1410 Waterloo, Belgium.
The data processing is essentially carried out by Mastercard. This may result in data not being processed and stored anonymously. Furthermore, US government authorities may have access to individual data. It may also happen that this data is linked to data from possible other Mastercard services with which you have a user account.
You can find out more about the data processed through the use of Mastercard in the Privacy Policy on
https://www.mastercard.com/global/en/vision/corp-responsibility/commitment-to-privacy/privacy.html
.
PayPal
We use the online payment service PayPal on our website. The service provider is the American company PayPal Inc. The company PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A., 22-24 Boulevard Royal, L-2449 Luxembourg is responsible for the European region.
The data processing is essentially carried out by PayPal. This may result in data not being processed and stored anonymously. Furthermore, US government authorities may have access to individual data. It may also happen that this data is linked to data from other PayPal services where you have a user account.
You can find out more about the data processed through the use of PayPal in the Privacy Policy on
https://www.paypal.com/de/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full
.
Visa/VPay
We offer payments with Visa on our website. The service provider is the American company Visa Inc. The company responsible for the European region is Visa Europe Services Inc, 1 Sheldon Square, London W2 6TT, United Kingdom.
The data processing is essentially done by Visa. This may result in data not being processed and stored anonymously. Furthermore, US government authorities may have access to individual data. It may also happen that this data is linked to data from possible other Visa services where you have a user account.
You can find out more about the data processed through the use of Visa in the Privacy Policy at
https://www.visa.de/visa-privacy-center.html
.
Blik
We offer payments on our website via the Polish payment system Blik for bank transfer. After selecting Blik on our website, you need to enter a secure Blik code in the payment form.
You receive this unique six-digit code from your banking application and enter it on your checkout page. This links the transaction to the correct banking application. The blik code expires in 120 seconds.
As soon as you select "Pay", Blik sends a push notification to your banking application.
You must authorise the payment within 45 seconds in his banking app for the payment to go through.
For more information on the processing of personal data by Blik, please refer to the Privacy Policy of Polski Standard Płatności sp. z o.o.. , Warsaw (00-718), ul. Czerniakowska 87A, Poland.
iDEAL, Bancontact
iDEAL, Bancontact Customers with accounts at a Dutch bank can pay with iDEAL. Customers who have a Bancontact card at a participating Belgian bank can pay with Bancontact. If you choose iDEAL as your payment method, you will need an account and access to online banking at a participating Dutch bank. If you choose Bancontact as your payment method, you only need a bank account at a Belgian bank and a smartphone or card reader.
If you select iDEAL or Bancontact, you will be redirected to the payment page of your bank at the end of the order process. Here you can make a transfer of the payment as usual. After completing the transaction, you will be redirected back to the operator's website.
When choosing these payment methods, the operator only receives the information about whether the payment was successful or not.
For more information on the processing of personal data by iDEAL, please refer to the Privacy Policy of Currence B.V., Gustav Mahlerplein 33-35, Amsterdam, Noord-Holland 1082 MS, Netherlands. For more information on the processing of personal data by Bancontact, please refer to the privacy policy of Bancontact Payconiq Company NV/SA, Rue d'Arlon 82, 1040-Brussels, Belgium.
GiroPay
For payment via GiroPay , access to online banking at a participating bank is required. If you select GiroPay , you will be redirected to the online portal of Paydirekt GmbH or secupay AG at the end of the ordering process. There you can log into your online banking account to initiate the payment to us. This requires you to enter your access data for online banking. Further information on the processing of personal data by GiroPay can be found in the data protection regulations of Paydirekt GmbH, Stephanstr. 14-16, 60313 Frankfurt am Main, Germany. For further information on the processing of personal data by Giropay, please refer to the data protection provisions of secupay AG, Goethestraße 6,01896 Pulsnitz, Germany.
EPS
For payment via EPS, access to online banking at a participating bank is required. If you select EPS, you will be redirected to the online portal of PSA Payment Services Austria GmbH at the end of the order process. There you can log into your online banking account to initiate the payment to us. This requires you to enter your access data for online banking. Further information on the processing of personal data by EPS can be found in the privacy policy of PSA Payment Services Austria GmbH, Handelskai 92, Gate 2, 1200 Vienna, Austria.
JCB
We use the payment service provider JCB on our website. The service provider is the Japanese company JCB International Ltd. The company responsible for the European region is JCB International (Europe) Ltd Frankfurt Branch (hereinafter referred to as JCB), Messeturm 10. OG, Friedrich-Ebert-Anlage 49, 60308 Frankfurt, Germany.
Data processing is essentially carried out by JCB. This may result in data not being processed and stored anonymously. Furthermore, Japanese government authorities may have access to individual data. It may also happen that this data is linked to data from possible other JCB services where you have a user account.
You can find out more about the data processed through the use of Mastercard in the privacy policy on
https://www.global.jcb/en/about-us/policy/privacy/
.
Cartes Bencaire
We use the payment service provider Cartes Bencaire on our website. The service provider is the French company Groupement d 'Intérêt économique Cartes Bancaires CB, 151 Bis Rue Saint-Honoré 75001 Paris, France (hereinafter CB).
The data processing is essentially done by CB. This may result in data not being processed and stored anonymously. Furthermore, French government authorities may have access to individual data. It may also happen that this data is linked to data from possible other CB services where you have a user account.
To find out more about the data processed through the use of CB, please refer to the Privacy Policy on
https://www.cartes-bancaires.com/protegezvosdonnees/
.
Union Pay
We use the payment service provider Union Pay on our website. The service provider is the Chinese company UnionPay International Co., Ltd (hereinafter referred to as UnionPay). For the European region, the company UnionPay International Co., Ltd. , Building B, Poly Plaza, No.6 Dongfang Road, Pudong New District, Shanghai, China.
The data processing is essentially carried out by UnionPay. This may result in data not being processed and stored anonymously. Furthermore, Chinese government authorities may have access to individual data. It may also happen that this data is linked to data from possible other UnionPay services where you have a user account.
You can find out more about the data processed through the use of UnionPay in the Privacy Policy at
https://www.cartes-bancaires.com/protegezvosdonnees/
.
Diners
We use the payment service provider Diners on our website. The service provider is the Austrian company card complete Service Bank AG. The company card complete Service Bank AG, Lassallestraße 3, 1020 Vienna, Austria is responsible for the European region.
Electronic Bank Transfer Finland
After you have chosen to pay with Online Banking Finland, you will be redirected to the payment page hosted by a third party provider, where you will see a list of available banks.
You select your bank and are asked to enter your online banking credentials and authenticate yourself as you would when logging into his online bank account.
They select the account from which they want to make the payment and are asked to enter a unique code to confirm the payment.
After you have completed the payment, you will be redirected back to our website or app.
For further information on JCB's processing of personal data, please refer to the Privacy Policy of JCB International (Europe) Ltd Frankfurt Branch, Messeturm 10th OG, Friedrich-Ebert-Anlage 49, 60308 Frankfurt, Germany.
Data use and disclosure
We will neither sell to third parties nor otherwise market the personal data that you provide to us, e.g. when placing an order or by e-mail (e.g. your name and address or your e-mail address). Your personal data will only be processed for correspondence with you and only for the purpose for which you have provided us with the data. For the processing of payments, we pass on your payment data to the credit institution commissioned with the payment.
The use of data that is automatically collected when you visit our website is only for the purposes stated above. The data will not be used for any other purpose.
We assure you that we will not pass on your personal data to third parties unless we are legally obliged to do so or you have given us your prior consent.
SSL or TLS encryption
Our website uses SSL or TLS encryption for security reasons and to protect the transmission of confidential content, such as orders or enquiries that you send to us as the site operator. You can recognise an encrypted connection by the fact that the address line of the browser changes from "http://" to "https://" and by the lock symbol in your browser line.
If SSL or TLS encryption is activated, the data you transmit to us cannot be read by third parties.
Storage period
Personal data that has been communicated to us via our website is only stored until the purpose for which it was entrusted to us has been fulfilled. Insofar as retention periods under commercial and tax law must be observed, the storage period for certain data may be up to 10 years.
Data subjects' rights
With regard to the personal data concerning you, as a data subject, you have the following rights vis-à-vis the data controller in accordance with the legal provisions:
Right of withdrawal
Many data processing operations are only possible with your express consent. If the processing of your data is based on your consent, you have the right to revoke your consent to the processing of data at any time with effect for the future in accordance with Art. 7 (3) GDPR. The revocation of consent does not affect the lawfulness of the processing carried out on the basis of the consent until the revocation. Storage of data for billing and accounting purposes remains unaffected by a revocation.
Right to information
You have the right to request confirmation from us, pursuant to Article 15 of the GDPR, as to whether we are processing personal data relating to you. If such processing is taking place, you have the right to obtain information about your personal data processed by us, the purposes of processing, the categories of personal data processed, the recipients or categories of recipients to whom your data have been or will be disclosed, the planned storage period or criteria for determining the storage period, the existence of a right of rectification, erasure or access to your personal data. the criteria for determining the storage period, the existence of a right to rectification, erasure, restriction of processing, objection to processing, complaint to a supervisory authority, the origin of your data if it has not been collected from you by us, the existence of automated decision-making including profiling and, if applicable, meaningful information about the logic involved and the scope and intended effects of such processing concerning you, as well as your right to be informed about which guarantees exist in accordance with Art. 46 of the GDPR if your data are transferred to third countries.
Right of rectification
In accordance with Art. 16 GDPR, you have the right at any time to demand the immediate correction of any inaccurate personal data relating to you and/or the completion of your incomplete data.
Right to erasure
You have the right to request the deletion of your personal data in accordance with Art. 17 GDPR if one of the following reasons applies:
Your personal data are no longer necessary for the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed;
You revoke your consent on which the processing was based pursuant to Art. 6 (1) a or Art. 9 (2) a GDPR and there is no other legal basis for the processing;
You object to the processing pursuant to Article 21(1) of the GDPR and there are no overriding legitimate grounds for the processing, or you object to the processing pursuant to Article 21(2) of the GDPR;
The personal data have been processed unlawfully;
The deletion of personal data is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation under Union law or the law of the Member State to which we are subject;
The personal data was collected in relation to information society services offered pursuant to Art. 8(1) GDPR;
However, this right does not exist insofar as the processing is necessary:
to exercise the right to freedom of expression and information;
for compliance with a legal obligation which requires processing under Union or Member State law to which we are subject or for the performance of a task carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of official authority vested in us;
for reasons of public interest in the area of public health pursuant to Art. 9(2)(h) and (i) and Art. 9(3) GDPR;
for archiving purposes in the public interest, scientific or historical research purposes or statistical purposes pursuant to Article 89(1) of the GDPR, insofar as the right of the data subject is likely to render impossible or seriously prejudice the achievement of the purposes of such processing, or
for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
If we have made your personal data public and we are obliged to erase it in accordance with the above, we shall take reasonable steps, including technical measures, to inform data controllers processing the personal data that you, as the data subject, have requested that they erase all links to your personal data or copies or replications thereof, taking into account the available technology and the cost of implementation.
Right to restrict processing
You have the right to request the restriction of processing (blocking) of your personal data in accordance with Art. 18 GDPR. To do this, you can contact us at any time at the address given in the imprint. The right to restriction of processing exists in the following cases:
If you dispute the accuracy of your personal data stored by us, we usually need time to check this. For the duration of the verification, you have the right to request the restriction of the processing of your personal data.
If the processing of your personal data has happened / is happening unlawfully, you can request the restriction of data processing instead of erasure.
If we no longer need your personal data, but you need it to exercise, defend or enforce legal claims, you have the right to request restriction of the processing of your personal data instead of deletion.
If you have lodged an objection pursuant to Art. 21 (1) GDPR, a balancing of your interests and ours must be carried out. As long as it has not yet been determined whose interests prevail, you have the right to demand the restriction of the processing of your personal data.
If you have restricted the processing of your personal data, such data may - apart from being stored - only be processed with your consent or for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims or for the protection of the rights of another natural or legal person or for reasons of important public interest of the European Union or a Member State.
Right to information
If you have asserted the right to rectification, erasure or restriction of processing against us, we are obliged to notify all recipients to whom your personal data have been disclosed of this rectification or erasure of the data or restriction of processing, unless this proves impossible or involves a disproportionate effort. In accordance with Art. 19 of the GDPR, you have the right to be informed about these recipients upon request.
Right not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling
You have the right not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing - including profiling - which produces legal effects concerning you or similarly significantly affects you, in accordance with Article 22 of the GDPR.
This shall not apply if the decision
is necessary for the conclusion or performance of a contract between you and us,
is authorised by legislation of the Union or the Member States to which the controller is subject and that legislation contains adequate measures to safeguard your rights and freedoms and your legitimate interests, or
is done with your express consent.
However, decisions in the cases referred to in (a) to (c) may not be based on special categories of personal data pursuant to Article 9(1) of the GDPR, unless Article 9(2)(a) or (g) applies and appropriate measures have been taken to protect the rights and freedoms and your legitimate interests.
In the cases referred to in (a) and (c), we shall take reasonable steps to safeguard your rights and freedoms and your legitimate interests, including at least the right to obtain the intervention of a person responsible, to express your point of view and to contest the decision.
Right to data portability
If the processing is based on your consent pursuant to Art. 6 (1) lit. a GDPR or Art. 9 (2) lit. a GDPR or on a contract pursuant to Art. 6 (1) lit. b GDPR and is carried out with the help of automated processes, you have the right, pursuant to Art. 20 GDPR, to receive your personal data that you have provided to us in a structured, common and machine-readable format and to transfer it to another controller or to demand that it be transferred to another controller, insofar as this is technically feasible.
Right of objection
Insofar as we base the processing of your personal data on the balance of interests pursuant to Art. 6 (1) lit. f GDPR, you have the right to object to the processing of your personal data at any time for reasons arising from your particular situation; this also applies to profiling based on this provision. The respective legal basis on which processing is based can be found in this data protection declaration. If you object, we will no longer process your personal data concerned unless we can demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your interests, rights and freedoms, or the processing serves the purpose of asserting, exercising or defending legal claims (objection under Article 21(1) of the GDPR).
If your personal data is processed for the purpose of direct marketing, you have the right to object at any time to the processing of personal data concerning you for the purpose of such marketing; this also applies to profiling insofar as it is related to such direct marketing. If you object, your personal data will subsequently no longer be used for the purpose of direct advertising (objection pursuant to Art. 21 (2) GDPR).
You have the possibility, in connection with the use of information society services, notwithstanding Directive 2002/58/EC, to exercise your right to object by means of automated procedures using technical specifications.
Right of appeal to the competent supervisory authority pursuant to Art. 77 GDPR
In the event of breaches of the GDPR, data subjects shall have a right of appeal to a supervisory authority, in particular in the Member State of their habitual residence, their place of work or the place of the alleged breach. The right of appeal is without prejudice to any other administrative or judicial remedy.
The supervisory authority responsible for us is:
The Bavarian State Commissioner for Data Protection
PO Box 22 12 19
80502 Munich
Business address:
Wagmüllerstraße 18
80538 Munich
Germany
Telephone: 089 212672-0
E-mail:
poststelle@datenschutz-bayern.de
Internet:
https://www.datenschutz-bayern.de
Validity and amendment of this privacy policy
This privacy policy will apply from 18 September 2023. We reserve the right to amend this privacy policy at any time in compliance with the applicable data protection regulations. This may be necessary, for example, to comply with new legal provisions or to take account of changes to our website or new services on our website. The version available at the time of your visit applies.
If this Privacy Policy is amended, we intend to post changes to our Privacy Policy on this page so that you are fully informed about what personal data we collect, how we process it and under what circumstances it may be disclosed.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en&gl=en:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://trackjs.com/privacy/:
Privacy Policy
This Agreement was last modified on March 14, 2018.
TrackJS LLC ("TrackJS", "we", "us") provides error tracking services ("Services")
  for web applications. We are committed to protecting the privacy of our customers, and
  their users. We have prepared this Privacy Policy to describe our
  practices in gathering, securing, and using application and personal data.
By making Application Data or Personal Data available to us through our website,
  Services, or related communication, you agree to the terms of this Privacy
  Policy and your expressly consent to the processing of your Application Data
  and Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Your Personal Data may
  be processed outside the country in which it was collected, where laws regarding
  processing of Personal Data may be less stringent than the laws in your country.
Information We Collect
TrackJS may collect and process the following Personal Data from you:
Data You Give Us
TrackJS collects Personal Data from you when you voluntarily provide us with
  such Data in the course of using our website, Services, or related materials.
  For example, when you subscribe to our newsletter you volunteer your name and
  email address.
Data We Collect Automatically
TrackJS and our service providers collect certain technical information automatically
  when you visit our website or use our Services, such as your browser, operating
  system, referrer, IP address, and other Internet data. We gather this information
  with the use of cookies.
Data Collected for Business
We may store and collect Personal Data from you when you do business with us, such
  as storing your Billing Address and contact information so that we may maintain business
  relations with you as your vendor, supplier, or other third party.
Data Collected as your Data Processor
TrackJS collects data on behalf of our customers in the context of providing
  our Services. All data collection provided by the Service is completely controlled by the
  customer, so you can choose the right level of information collection and privacy for
  your needs. For example, you can configure the Services to ignore or anonymize IP Addresses
  from your users should you not want TrackJS to store that data. For more information on
  configuring the service, see
the Documentation
.
How We Protect Your Information
TrackJS uses a variety of security measures to maintain the safety of your Personal Data. All
  supplied payment information is transmitted via Secure Socket Layer (SSL) technology and
  then encrypted into our Payment gateway providers database only to be accessible by those
  authorized with special access rights to such systems, and are required to keep the information
  confidential. After a transaction, your private information (e.g., credit cards) will not be
  stored on our servers.
TrackJS will never sell your Personal Data to anyone. Your Personal Data is only accessible to
  TrackJS employees, contractors, and our service providers that require access in order to
  administer the TrackJS website, services, or related materials, or to provide you with
  support and assistance.
How We Use Your Information
Personal Data we collect from you is used either to respond to requests that you make, or
  to aid us in serving you better. TrackJS uses your Personal Data in the following ways:
To create and secure your account on our network,
To identify you as a user in our system,
To provide improved administration of our website, Services, and related materials,
To improve the quality of experience when you interact with our website, Services, and related materials,
To send you welcome, setup, and notification emails in relation to providing the TrackJS Services,
To solicit your feedback on our Services.
Cookies
A cookie is a string of information that a website stores on a visitor’s
  computer, and that the visitor’s browser provides to the website each
  time the visitor returns. We use cookies to help identify and track
  visitors, their usage of our website, and their website access
  preferences. TrackJS visitors who do not wish to have cookies placed on
  their computers should set their browsers to refuse cookies before using
  the TrackJS website, Service, or other materials. Certain features may not
  function properly without the aid of cookies.
Privacy Policy Changes
Although changes are likely to be minor, TrackJS may change our
  Privacy Policy from time to time, at our sole discretion. TrackJS
  encourages visitors to frequently check this page for any changes to its
  Privacy Policy. Your continued use of this site after any change in this
  Privacy Policy will constitute your acceptance of such change.
Download as PDF
Concerned about this agreement? We’d love to chat about your needs.
Contact us
and we’ll work something out!
Sub-policy 2
https://ad.ad-srv.net/privacy/kdb0xdq3ls8m/:
targeting360 GmbH
Deutsch
English
Privacy Manager
Your privacy is very important to us and the legislator! 
							Therefore, we wish to fully inform you about the information that we process and the options you have. You have been redirected to this page because you have requested more information.
At no point targeting360 GmbH can establish a reference to your person or your location.
NEORY GmbH as the technical solution provider for targeting360 GmbH adheres to the European Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising in the EU. Please find additional informations about the principles on this site:
http://www.edaa.eu
NEORY GmbH adheres additionally to the Self-Regulatory Principles of the German Data Privacy Council ("Deutscher Datenschutzrat Online-Werbung (DDOW)").
Besides the options below to opt-out from the tracking of your data in a psydonymous profil by targeting360 GmbH, you can find the possibility to opt-out from online behavioural advertising from us and other market participants on the following site:
http://www.youronlinechoices.com/uk/your-ad-choices
Please find further informations from the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance about Online Behavioural Advertising on this site:
http://www.youronlinechoices.com
This page gives you a comprehensive insight into the information and settings of the pseudonymous data stored about you:
You have the opportunity to consent to the pseudonymous storage of usage data through targeting360 GmbH.
You will also receive your pseudonymous user ID, which will allow you to request the data stored about you by targeting360 GmbH.
Furthermore, you have the option of deleting the pseudonymous data stored about you and to opt-out the use of your data in a pseudonymous profile by targeting360 GmbH in the future.
Your user ID
0a3e3a3ef8459e44
→
This is the unique online identifier under which targeting360 GmbH processes your data.
You can contact targeting360 GmbH at the following URL. There you have the possibility to obtain information about the data collected and processed under your online identification.
https://targeting360.de/de/datenschutz/
Objection to the collection of personal data
Opt-out does not exist.
→
Opt-out
Consent for personalized advertising
Opt-in does not exist.
→
Opt-in
Sub-policy 3
https://www.spotify.com/de-en/legal/privacy-policy/:
Deutschland (Deutsch)
✕
Close
Legal
Terms and Conditions of Use
Intellectual Property Policy
Privacy Policy
User Guidelines
Premium Offer Terms
Spotify Privacy Policy
Effective as of 10 October 2024
1. About this Policy
2. Your personal data rights and controls
3. Personal data we collect about you
4. Our purpose for using your personal data
5. Sharing your personal data
6. Data retention
7. Transfer to other countries
8. Keeping your personal data safe
9. Children
10. Changes to this Policy
11. How to contact us
1. About this Policy
This Privacy Policy describes how we process your personal data at Spotify AB. From now on, we'll call it the 'Policy'.
It applies to your use of:
all Spotify streaming services as a user. For example this includes:
your use of Spotify on any device
the personalisation of your user experience. Watch
our personalisation explainer video
to learn more about this
the infrastructure required to provide our services
connection of your Spotify account with another application
both our free or paid streaming options (each a '
Service Option
')
other Spotify services which include a link to this Policy. These include Spotify websites, Customer Service and the Community Site
From now on, we'll collectively call these the '
Spotify Service
'.
From time to time, we may develop new or offer additional services. They'll also be subject to this Policy, unless stated otherwise when we introduce them.
This Policy is
not
...
the Spotify
Terms of Use
, which is a separate document. The Terms of Use outline the legal contract between you and Spotify for using the Spotify Service. It also describes the rules of Spotify and your user rights
about your use of other Spotify services which have their own privacy policy. Other Spotify services include Anchor, Soundtrap, Megaphone and the Spotify Live app
Other resources and settings
Key information about your personal data is right here in this Policy. However, you might want to take a look at our other privacy resources and controls:
Privacy Center
: A user-friendly hub with summaries of key topics and helpful videos. It includes the 'Your Privacy Controls' video which shows you how to exercise your user rights and make choices about the way we process your data. See
Section 2 'Your personal data rights and controls'
for more on user rights.
Account Privacy
: Control the processing of certain personal data, including
tailored advertising
.
Notification Settings
: Set which marketing communications you get from Spotify.
Settings (found in the Desktop and Mobile versions of Spotify): Control certain aspects of the Spotify Service such as 'Social' or 'Explicit Content'. On the 'Social' setting, you can:
start a Private session
choose whether to share what you listen to on Spotify with your followers
choose whether to show your recently played artists on your public profile
On the 'Explicit Content' setting you can control whether explicit-rated content can be played on your Spotify account.
Cookies Policy
: Information on how we use cookies and how to manage your cookie preferences. Cookies are files saved on your phone, tablet or computer when you visit a website.
2. Your personal data rights and controls
Many privacy laws give rights to individuals over their personal data. These laws include the General Data Protection Regulation, or
'GDPR'
.
Some rights only apply when Spotify uses a certain 'legal basis' to process your data. We explain each legal basis, and when Spotify uses each one, in
Section 4 'Our purpose for using your personal data'
.
The table below explains:
your rights
circumstances when they apply (such as the legal basis required)
how to use them
You can also watch our video about
Your Privacy Controls
.
It’s your right to...
How?
Be informed
Be informed of the personal data we process about you and how we process it.
We inform you:
through this Policy
through information provided to you as you use the Spotify Service
by answering your specific questions and requests when you
contact us
Access
Request access to the personal data we process about you.
To request a copy of your personal data from Spotify, either:
use the “Download your data” tool on your
Account Privacy
page, or
contact us
When you download your data you will receive the information about your data that Spotify has to provide under Article 15 of the GDPR. If you would like more information about how we process your personal data, you can
contact us
.
Rectification
Request that we amend or update your personal data where it’s inaccurate or incomplete.
You can edit your User Data under ‘Edit profile’ in your account or by
contacting us
.
Erasure
Request that we erase certain of your personal data.
For example, you can ask us to erase personal data:
that we no longer need for the purpose it was collected for
that we process based on the
legal basis
of consent, and you withdraw your consent
when you object (see section ‘Object’ below) and
you make a justified objection, or
you object to direct marketing
There are situations where Spotify is unable to delete your data, for example when:
it’s still necessary to process the data for the purpose we collected it for
Spotify’s interest in using the data overrides your interest in having it deleted. For example, where we need the data to protect our services from fraud
Spotify has a legal obligation to keep the data, or
Spotify needs the data to establish, exercise or defend legal claims. For example, if there’s an unresolved issue relating to your account
There are several ways you can erase personal data from Spotify:
to remove audio content from your profile select the relevant content and choose to remove it. For example, you can remove playlists from your profile, or remove a track from your playlist
to request erasure of your other personal data from Spotify, follow the steps on our
support page
. This data includes your User Data, Usage Data and other data listed in
Section 3 ‘Personal data we collect about you’
you can also
contact us
to request erasure
Restriction
Request that we stop processing all or some of your personal data.
You can do this if:
your personal data is inaccurate
our processing is unlawful
we do not need your information for a specific purpose, or
you object to our processing and we are assessing your objection request. See section ‘Object’ below
You can request that we stop this processing temporarily or permanently.
You can exercise your right to restriction by
contacting us
.
Object
Object to us processing your personal data.
You can do this if:
Spotify is processing your personal data on the legal basis of legitimate interests, or
Spotify is processing your personal data for tailored advertising
To exercise your right to object, you can:
use controls on the Spotify Service to switch off or adjust some features which process your personal data. See the end of this section on how you can control tailored advertising
contact us
Data portability
Request a copy of your personal data in electronic format and the right to transmit that personal data for use in another party’s service.
You can request us to transmit your data when we are processing your personal data on the legal bases of consent or performance of contract. However Spotify will try to honour any request to the extent possible.
For information about how to exercise the right to portability, see ‘Access’ above.
Not be subject to automated decision making
Not be subject to a decision based solely on automated decision making (decisions without human involvement), including profiling, where the decision would have a legal effect on you or produce a similarly significant effect.
Spotify does not carry out this type of automated decision making in the Spotify Service.
Withdrawal of consent
Withdraw your consent to us collecting or using your personal data.
You can do this if Spotify is processing your personal data on the
legal basis
of consent.
To withdraw your consent, you can:
adjust the relevant control on Spotify
contact us
Right to lodge a complaint
Contact the Swedish Authority for Privacy Protection or your local data protection authority about any questions or concerns.
You can find the Swedish Authority’s details
here
. You can also go to the website of your local data protection authority.
Tailored advertising controls
What is tailored advertising?
This is when we use information about you to tailor ads to be more relevant to you. This is also known as interest based advertising.
An example of tailored advertising is when an advertising partner has information suggesting you like cars. This could enable us to show you ads about cars.
How to control tailored advertising:
You can control tailored advertising on your
Account Privacy
page under 'Tailored Ads'.
You can also control tailored advertising for some podcasts using the link in the episode's show description. This applies where the content provider inserts advertising into the podcast to fund it. The hosting provider, which might not be Spotify, manages these controls for the podcast.
If you are 'opted out' of Tailored Ads on your
Account Privacy
page, you may still get advertising. This can include on our free Service Option, as well as our paid Service Option, as applicable (for example, advertising in podcasts). This type of advertising is based on your registration information and what you are currently listening to on our services. For example, if you are listening to a cooking podcast, you may hear an ad for a food processor.
Appropriate age for tailored advertising:
The appropriate age for tailored advertising is determined by the country you are in and what rules apply to tailored advertising in that country. You will not receive Tailored Ads unless you have reached the appropriate age.
You will not be able to 'opt-in' to Tailored Ads if you are under the appropriate age.
You will start to receive Tailored Ads once you reach the appropriate age for your country. When this happens, you will receive a message within the Spotify Service to let you know. This message will contain a link to the
Account Privacy
page where you can change your preferences or 'opt-out' of Tailored Ads at any time.
3. Personal data we collect about you
These tables set out the categories of personal data we collect from you. You can also watch our video about
Personal Data at Spotify
.
Collected when you sign up for the Spotify Service
or when you update your account
Category
Description
User Data
Personal data that we need to create your Spotify account and that enables you to use the Spotify Service.
The type of data collected and used depends on the type of Service Option you have. It also depends on how you create your account, the country you are in, and if you use third party services to sign in. This may include your:
profile name
email address
password
phone number
date of birth
gender
street address (see further details below)
country
university/college (for Spotify Premium Student)
We receive some of this data from you e.g. from the sign up form or account page.
We also collect some of this data from your device e.g. country or region. For more information about how we collect and use this data, see ‘Your general (non-precise) location’ in the Usage Data category.
Street Address Data
We may ask for and process your street address for the following reasons:
to check eligibility for a Service Option
to deliver notices which are required by law
to deliver support options
for billing and tax administration
to deliver physical goods or gifts which you have requested
In some cases, we may use a third party application to help you verify your address, such as Google Maps.
Collected through your use of the Spotify Service
Categories
Description
Usage Data
Personal data collected and processed about you when you’re accessing or using the Spotify Service.
There are a few types of information this includes, listed in the following sections.
Information about how you use Spotify
Examples include:
information about your Spotify Service Option
your actions with the Spotify Service (including date and time), such as:
search queries
streaming history
playlists you create
your library
browsing history
account settings
interactions with other Spotify users
your use of third party services, devices and applications in connection with the Spotify Service
inferences (i.e., our understanding) of your interests and preferences based on your usage of the Spotify Service
content you provide when participating in Spotify promotions, such as contests or sweepstakes
content you post to any part of the Spotify Service. For example: images, audio, text, titles, descriptions, communications, and other types of content
Your technical data
Examples include:
URL information
online identifiers such as
cookie data
and IP addresses
information about the devices you use such as:
device IDs
network connection type (e.g. wifi, 4G, LTE, Bluetooth)
provider
network and device performance
browser type
language
information enabling digital rights management
operating system
Spotify application version
information which enables us to discover and connect with third party devices and applications. Examples of this information are the device name, device identifiers, brand and version. Examples of third party devices and applications are:
devices on your wifi network (such as speakers) which can connect to the Spotify Service
devices your operating system makes available when connecting via Bluetooth, plugin, and installation
Spotify partner applications to determine whether the application is installed on your device
Your general (non-precise) location
Your general location includes country, region or state. We may learn this from technical data (e.g. your IP address, language setting of your device) or payment currency.
We need this to:
meet geographic requirements in our agreements with the owners of content on the Spotify Service
deliver content and advertising that’s relevant to you
Your device sensor data
Motion-generated or orientation-generated device sensor data if needed to provide features of the Spotify Service that require this data. This is data which your device collects about the way you move or hold your device.
Additional data you may choose to give us
Categories
Description
Voice Data
If voice features are available in your market and where you’ve chosen to use a voice feature, we collect and process voice data. Voice data means audio recordings of your voice and transcripts of those recordings.
For more information on how different voice features work, and how you can control and turn them off, see our
Voice Control Policy
.
Payment and Purchase Data
If you make any purchases from Spotify or sign up for a paid Service Option or a trial, we will need to process your payment data.
The exact personal data collected and used will vary depending on the payment method. It will include information such as:
name
date of birth
payment method type (e.g. credit or debit card)
if using a debit or credit card, the card type, expiration date, and certain digits of your card number Note: For security, we never store your full card number
ZIP/postal code
mobile phone number
details of your purchase and payment history
Survey and Research Data
When you respond to a survey or take part in user research, we collect and use the personal data you provide.
We receive some of the data mentioned above from third parties. The below table describes the categories of those third parties.
Third party sources that we receive your data from
Categories of third parties
Description
Data categories
Authentication partners
If you register for or log into the Spotify Service using another service, that service will send your information to us. This information helps create your account with us.
User Data
Third party applications, services and devices you connect to your Spotify account
If you connect your Spotify account to a third party application, service or device, we may collect and use information from them. This collection is to make the integration possible.
These third party apps, services or devices may include:
social media
devices including:
audio (e.g. speakers and headphones)
smart watches
televisions
mobile phones and tablets
automotive (e.g. cars)
games consoles
services or platforms such as voice assistants or content platforms
We’ll ask your permission before we collect your information from certain third parties.
User Data
Usage Data
Technical service partners
We work with technical service partners that give us certain data. This includes mapping IP addresses to non-precise location data (e.g., country or region, city, state).
This makes it possible for Spotify to provide the Spotify Service, content, and features.
We also work with security service providers who help us protect user accounts.
User Data
Usage Data
Payment partners and Merchants
If you choose to pay through third parties (e.g. telco carriers) or by invoice, we may get data from our payment partners.
This allows us to:
send you invoices
process your payment
give you what you’ve purchased
If we direct you to a merchant, we receive data from the merchant that is related to your purchase. For example, we might direct you to an artist’s merchandise store on a third party platform or to a third party ticketing website.
Receiving this data allows us to:
calculate any commissions owed to us
analyse the effectiveness of our partnership with these merchant partners
understand your interests
Payment and Purchase Data
Advertising and marketing partners
We receive inferences from certain advertising or marketing partners. These inferences are the partners’ understanding of your interests and preferences.
This allows us to deliver more relevant ads and marketing.
Usage Data
Acquired companies
We may receive data about you from companies we acquire. This is to enhance our services, products, and offerings.
User Data
Usage Data
If you download the Spotify mobile app and try Spotify using a logged out user experience, we will collect limited information about your usage of the Spotify Service, including Usage Data. We do this to understand how you are accessing and using the Service. We also do this to ensure we provide the right experience for you, for example based on your country or region. If you decide to create a Spotify account to experience our service in full, then we will combine this data with your Spotify account data.
4. Our purpose for using your personal data
The table below sets out:
our purpose for processing your personal data
our legal justifications (each called a '
legal basis
') under data protection law, for each purpose
categories of personal data which we use for each purpose. See more about these categories in
Section 3 'Personal data we collect about you'
You can also watch our video about
Personal Data at Spotify
.
Here is a general explanation of each 'legal basis' to help you understand the table:
Performance of a Contract:
When it's necessary for Spotify (or a third party) to process your personal data to:
comply with obligations under a contract with you. This includes Spotify's obligations under the Terms of Use to provide the Spotify Service to you, or
verify information before a new contract with you begins.
Legitimate Interest:
When Spotify or a third party has an interest in using your personal data in a certain way, which is necessary and justified considering any possible risks to you and other Spotify users. For example, using your Usage Data to improve the Spotify Service for all users.
Contact us
if you want to understand a specific justification.
Consent:
When Spotify asks you to actively indicate your agreement to Spotify's use of your personal data for a certain purpose.
Compliance with Legal Obligations:
When Spotify must process your personal data to comply with a law.
Purpose for processing your data
Legal basis that permits the purpose
Categories of personal data used for the purpose
To provide the Spotify Service in accordance with our contract with you.
For example, when we use your personal data to:
set up an account for you
personalise your account, or
provide the Spotify app when you download it onto your device
Performance of a Contract
User Data
Street Address Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
Payment and Purchase Data
To provide further parts of the Spotify Service.
For example, when we use your personal data to enable you to share a link to Spotify content with someone else.
Legitimate Interest
Our legitimate interests here include:
keeping the Spotify Service running and functional
allowing users to access and use the Spotify Service
User Data
Street Address Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
Payment and Purchase Data
To provide certain additional voluntary features of the Spotify Service. When this is the case, we will clearly ask for your consent.
Consent
User Data
Usage Data
Survey and Research Data
Payment and Purchase Data
To diagnose, troubleshoot, and fix issues with the Spotify Service.
Performance of a Contract
User Data
Usage Data
To evaluate and develop new features, technologies, and improvements to the Spotify Service.
For example:
we use personal data to develop and improve our personalised recommendation algorithms
we analyse how our users react to a particular new feature and see whether we should make any changes
Legitimate Interest
Our legitimate interests here include developing and improving products and features for our users.
User Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
Survey and Research Data
For marketing or advertising where the law requires us to collect your consent.
For example, when we use cookies to understand your interests or the law requires consent for email marketing.
Consent
User Data
Usage Data
Survey and Research Data
For other marketing, promotion and advertising purposes where the law does not require consent.
For example, when we use your personal data to tailor advertising to your interests.
Legitimate Interest
Our legitimate interests here include using advertising to fund the Spotify Service, so that we can offer much of it for free.
User Data
Usage Data
Survey and Research Data
To comply with a legal obligation that we are subject to.
This might be:
an obligation under the law of the country / region you are in
Swedish law (because of our headquarters in Sweden), or
EU law that applies to us
For example, when we use your date of birth when required for age verification purposes.
Compliance with legal obligations
User Data
Street Address Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
Payment and Purchase Data
Survey and Research Data
To comply with a request from law enforcement, courts, or other competent authorities.
Compliance with legal obligations, and legitimate interest
Our legitimate interests here include assisting law enforcement authorities to prevent or detect serious crime.
User Data
Street Address Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
Payment and Purchase Data
Survey and Research Data
To fulfil contractual obligations with third parties.
For example, when we provide pseudonymised data about our users’ listening because we have an agreement with a Spotify rightsholder to do so.
Pseudonymised data means that your data is identified by a code rather than your name or other directly identifying information.
Legitimate Interest
Our legitimate interests here include:
maintaining our relationships with artists so that we can provide the Spotify Service
maintaining our relationships with other third parties for the same reason
User Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
Payment and Purchase Data
To take appropriate action with reports of intellectual property infringement and inappropriate content.
Legitimate Interest
Our legitimate interests here include protecting intellectual property and original content.
User Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
Payment and Purchase Data
To establish, exercise, or defend legal claims.
For example, if we are involved in litigation and we need to provide information to our lawyers in relation to that legal case.
Legitimate Interest
Our legitimate interests here include:
seeking legal advice
protecting ourselves, our users or others in legal proceedings
User Data
Street Address Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
Payment and Purchase Data
Survey and Research Data
To conduct business planning, reporting, and forecasting.
For example, when we look at aggregated user data like the number of new sign ups in a country in order to plan new locations to launch our products and features in.
Legitimate Interest
Our legitimate interests here include researching and planning so that we can keep running our business successfully.
User Data
Usage Data
Payment and Purchase Data
To process your payment.
For example, when we use your personal data to let you purchase a Spotify subscription.
Performance of a Contract, and consent
User Data
Payment and Purchase Data
Street Address Data
To keep the Spotify Service secure and to detect and prevent fraud.
For example, when we analyse Usage Data to check for fraudulent use of the Spotify Service.
Legitimate Interest
Our legitimate interests here include protecting the Spotify Service and our users against fraud and other illegal activity.
User Data
Street Address Data
Usage Data
Payment and Purchase Data
To conduct research and surveys.
For example, when we contact our users to ask for your feedback.
Legitimate Interest
Our legitimate interests here include to understand more about how users think about and use the Spotify Service.
User Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
Survey and Research Data
5. Sharing your personal data
This section sets out who receives personal data which is collected or generated through your use of the Spotify Service.
Publicly available information
The following personal data will always be publicly available on the Spotify Service (except to any user you have blocked):
your profile name
your profile photo
your public playlists
other content you post on the Spotify Service, and any associated titles, descriptions and images
who you follow on the Spotify Service
who follows you on the Spotify Service
You or another user can share certain information on third party services, like social media or messaging platforms. This includes:
your profile
any content you post on Spotify and details about that content
your playlists and any associated titles, descriptions and images
When this sharing occurs, the third party service may store a copy of it to support their features.
Personal data you may choose to share
We will only share the following personal data with those outlined in the table below:
where you have chosen to use a Spotify Service feature, or a third party application, service or device, and we need to share personal data to enable this, or
if you otherwise grant us your permission to share the personal data. For example, you can do it by selecting the appropriate setting in the Spotify Service or by giving your consent
Categories of recipients
Categories of data you can choose to share
Reason for sharing
Third party applications, services and devices you connect to your Spotify account
User Data
Usage Data
To connect your Spotify account, or so that you can use the Spotify Service in connection with third party applications, services or devices.
Examples of such third party applications, services and devices include:
social media applications
speaker devices
televisions
automotive platforms
voice assistants
You can see and remove many third party connections under ‘
Apps
’ in your account.
Support community
User Data
To enable you to use the
Spotify Support Community service
.
When you register for an account on the Spotify Support Community, we’ll ask you to create a profile name. This will be publicly displayed to anyone who uses the Spotify Support Community. We’ll also display any questions or comments you post.
Other Spotify users
User Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
To share information about your use of the Spotify Service with other Spotify users. These could include your followers on Spotify.
For example, under ‘Social’ settings you can choose to share your recently played artists and your playlists on your profile. You can also choose to create or join a shared playlist with other users. Shared playlists give you social recommendations based on your listening activity.
Artists and record labels
User Data
To receive news or promotional offers from artists, record labels or other partners.
You may choose to share your User Data for this purpose. You’ll always have the option to change your mind and
withdraw your
consent at any time
.
Information we may share
See this table for details of who we share to and why.
Categories of recipients
Categories of data
Reason for sharing
Service providers
User Data
Street Address Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
Payment and Purchase Data
Survey and Research Data
So they can provide their services to Spotify.
These service providers include those we hire to:
give customer support
operate the technical infrastructure we need to provide the Spotify Service
assist in protecting and securing our systems and services (e.g. Google’s reCAPTCHA)
help market Spotify’s (and our partners’) products, services, events and promotions
Payment partners
User Data
Payment and Purchase Data
So they can process your payments, and for anti-fraud purposes.
Advertising partners
User Data
Usage Data
So they can help us deliver more relevant advertising to you on the Spotify Service, and help measure the effectiveness of ads.
For example, our ad partners help us facilitate tailored advertising.
Marketing Partners
User Data
Usage Data
To promote Spotify with our partners. We share certain User Data and Usage Data with these partners where necessary to:
enable you to participate in Spotify promotions, including trials or other bundled offers
to promote Spotify in media and advertising published on other online services
help us and our partners to measure the effectiveness of Spotify promotions
Examples of partners include:
marketing or sponsorship partners
websites and mobile apps who sell us advertising space on their services
device, app and mobile partners who also offer Spotify promotions
Our partners may also combine the personal data we share with them with other data they collect about you, e.g. your use of their services. We and our partners may use this information to present you with offers, promotions, or other marketing that we think you’ll find relevant.
Hosting Platforms
Usage Data
Hosting platforms host podcasts so that they can deliver them to you. We share certain data, such as your IP address, with the hosting platforms when you play a podcast. We also allow you to stream podcasts available from other hosting platforms not owned by Spotify.
Podcast providers should explain in the show or episode description which platform is hosting the podcast. See the hosting platform’s own privacy policy for how they use data shared with them.
Academic researchers
User Data
Usage Data
For activities such as statistical analysis and academic study, but only in a pseudonymised format.
Other Spotify group companies, including companies that Spotify acquires
User Data
Street Address Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
Payment and Purchase Data
Survey and Research Data
To carry out our daily business operations and so we can maintain, improve and provide the Spotify Service and acquired companies’ services to you.
For example:
enabling our employees who work for different group companies to develop and improve features for the Spotify Service
sharing data with our measurement companies to measure the effectiveness of ad campaigns that run on the Spotify Service
sharing data with our podcast companies to better understand user listening trends
Law enforcement and other authorities, or other parties to litigation
User Data
Usage Data
When we believe in good faith it’s necessary for us to do so, for example:
to comply with a legal obligation
to respond to a valid legal process (such as a search warrant, court order, or subpoena)
for our own or a third party’s justifiable interest, relating to:
national security
law enforcement
litigation (a court case)
criminal investigation
protecting someone’s safety
preventing death or imminent bodily harm
Purchasers of our business
User Data
Street Address Data
Usage Data
Voice Data
Payment and Purchase Data
Survey and Research Data
If we were to sell or negotiate to sell our business to a buyer or possible buyer.
In this case, we may transfer your personal data to a successor or affiliate as part of that transaction.
6. Data retention
We keep your personal data only as long as necessary to provide you with the Spotify Service and for Spotify's legitimate and essential business purposes, such as:
maintaining the performance of the Spotify Service
making data-driven business decisions about new features and offerings
complying with our legal obligations
resolving disputes
Here are some of the categories of our retention periods, and the criteria we use to determine them:
Data retained until you remove it
It's your right to request that we delete certain of your personal data. See the section on 'Erasure' in
Section 2 'Your personal data rights and controls'
for more information, and the circumstances in which we can act on your request.
You can also delete certain personal data directly from the Spotify Service: for example, you can edit or delete your profile picture. Where users are able to see and update the personal data themselves, we keep the information for as long as the user chooses unless one of the limited purposes described below applies.
Data that expires after a specific period of time
We have set certain retention periods so that some data expires after a specific period of time. For example, personal data you may input as part of search queries is generally deleted after 90 days.
Data retained until your Spotify account is deleted
We keep some data until your Spotify account is deleted. Examples of this include your Spotify username and profile information. We also typically keep streaming history for the life of an account, for example, to provide retrospective playlists that users enjoy and personalised recommendations that take listening habits into account (for example, Your Time Capsule or Your Summer Rewind). When your Spotify account is deleted, this category of data is deleted or de-identified.
Data retained for extended time periods for limited purposes
After your account is deleted, we keep some data for a longer time period but for very limited purposes. For example, we may be subject to legal or contractual obligations that require this. These may include mandatory data retention laws, government orders to preserve data relevant to an investigation, or data kept for the purposes of litigation. We may also keep data that has been removed from the Spotify Service for a limited period of time. This could be:
to help ensure user safety, or
to protect against harmful content on our platform.
This helps us investigate potential breaches of our
User Guidelines
and
Platform Rules
. On the other hand, we will remove unlawful content if the law requires us to do so.
7. Transfer to other countries
Because of the global nature of our business, Spotify shares personal data internationally with Spotify group companies, subcontractors and partners when carrying out the activities described in this Policy. They may process your data in countries whose data protection laws are not considered to be as strong as EU laws or the laws which apply where you live. For example, they may not give you the same rights over your data.
Whenever we transfer personal data internationally, we use tools to:
make sure the data transfer complies with applicable law
help to give your data the same level of protection as it has in the EU
To ensure each data transfer complies with applicable EU legislation, we use the following legal mechanisms:
Standard Contractual Clauses
('
SCCs
'). These clauses require the other party to protect your data and to provide you with EU-level rights and protections. For example, we use SCCs to transfer the personal data described in
Section 3 'Personal data we collect about you'
to our hosting provider which uses servers in the US. You can exercise your rights under the Standard Contractual Clauses by
contacting us
or the third party who processes your personal data.
Adequacy Decisions
. This means that we transfer personal data to countries outside of the European Economic Area which have adequate laws to protect personal data, as determined by the European Commission. For example, we transfer the personal data described in
Section 3 'Personal data we collect about you'
to vendors based in the United Kingdom, Canada, Japan, Republic of Korea and Switzerland.
We also identify and use additional protections as appropriate for each data transfer. For example, we use:
technical protections, such as encryption and pseudonymisation
policies and processes to challenge disproportionate or unlawful government authority requests
8. Keeping your personal data safe
We're committed to protecting our users' personal data. We put in place appropriate technical and organisational measures to help protect the security of your personal data. However, be aware that no system is ever completely secure.
We have put various safeguards in place to guard against unauthorised access and unnecessary retention of personal data in our systems. These include pseudonymisation, encryption, access, and retention policies.
To protect your user account, we encourage you to:
use a strong password which you
only
use for your Spotify account
never share your password with anyone
limit access to your computer and browser
log out once you have finished using the Spotify Service on a shared device
read more detail on
protecting your account
You can log out of Spotify in multiple places at once by using the 'Sign out everywhere' function on
your account page
.
If other individuals have access to your Spotify account, then they can access personal data, controls and the Spotify Service available in your account. For example, you might have allowed someone to use your account on a shared device.
It's your responsibility to only allow individuals to use your account where you're comfortable sharing this personal data with them. Anyone else's use of your Spotify account may impact your personalised recommendations and be included in your data download.
9. Children
Note: This Policy doesn't apply to Spotify Kids unless the
Spotify Kids Privacy Policy
says so. Spotify Kids is a separate Spotify application.
The Spotify Service has a minimum 'Age Limit' in each country or region. The Spotify Service is not directed to children whose age:
is under the age of 13 years
makes it illegal to process their personal data, or
requires parental consent to process their personal data
We do not knowingly collect or use personal data from children under the applicable Age Limit. If you're under the Age Limit, do not use the Spotify Service, and do not provide any personal data to us. Instead, we recommend using a
Spotify Kids
account.
If you're a parent of a child under the Age Limit and become aware that your child has provided personal data to Spotify,
contact us
.
If we learn that we've collected the personal data of a child under the applicable Age Limit, we'll take reasonable steps to delete the personal data. This may require us to delete the Spotify account for that child.
When using a shared device on the main Spotify Service, be cautious about playing or recommending any inappropriate content to individuals under 18 years old.
10. Changes to this Policy
We may occasionally make changes to this Policy.
When we make material changes to this Policy, we'll provide you with prominent notice as appropriate under the circumstances. For example, we may display a prominent notice within the Spotify Service or send you an email or device notification.
11. How to contact us
For any questions or concerns about this Policy, contact our Data Protection Officer any one of these ways:
email
privacy@spotify.com
write to us at: Spotify AB, Regeringsgatan 19, 111 53 Stockholm, Sweden
Spotify AB is the data controller of personal data processed under this Policy.
© Spotify AB
Sub-policy 4
https://www.americanexpress.com/uk/company/legal/privacy-centre/:
Skip to main content
Home
Privacy Centre
Welcome to the American Express®
Privacy Center
Important Links
Privacy Principles
About cookies
Set Cookie Preferences
Set E-mail Preferences
Online Privacy Statement
Binding Corporate Rules
Cardmember Privacy Statement
Privacy made easier.
These short videos will give you a simple overview of our
existing privacy practices and help you exercise greater control.
Want full details? Our existing
Online Privacy Statement
is still one click away. You can also check your current choices at any time – just
log in to your account
or contact us using the number on the back of your Card.
Customers like you have trusted us since 1850 and we work hard to maintain that trust by protecting your
privacy
and
security
.
Just another way we have your back.
Choices and Rights
Collection and Use
Sharing
You have choices and you can easily manage them at any time.
Log in
to your Account, call the number on the back of your Card or
contact us
if you’d like to review and update:
1.     How we communicate with you, whether by phone, mail, or e-mail; or
2.     The types of messages you’d like to receive from us.
Depending on where you are, you may have specific rights to the data we hold about you and to receive a response from us in a set timeframe.
To find out more about data rights,
click here.
To find out more about marketing choices,
click here.
To find out more about your choices related to Cookies,
click here
.
We may collect data from you in three ways:
1.   Sometimes you give us data directly, by signing up for our products and services;
2.   When you use our website and App, or your American Express Card for everyday purchases;
3.    We may also obtain data about you that is publicly available (for example: data from online platforms or databases).
Learn more about how we collect data
here.
We may use data to offer products and deliver services tailored to you.
Data allows us to conduct research and analysis and improve your experiences offline and online.
We may also use data to further improve security, prevent and manage fraud on your Account, and assess credit risks related to our business.
To learn more about how we use data and see a list of
examples,
click here.
We may share data, as permitted or required by law, with partners such as our service providers and companies within the American Express group, to run and market our business, and to detect and prevent fraud.
For more details about our data sharing practices, visit our
Online Privacy Statement.
fraud-protection
fraud-protection
To learn how American Express protects you from fraud visit our Security Center.
Security Center
opens in new window
(opens new window)
FAQs about Privacy
How does American Express manage data about me?
We are committed to safeguarding your privacy. That's why we created the American Express Privacy Center - a resource to help you understand your choices and how we collect, use and share data about you. It's also a quick and convenient way to access our:
Online Privacy Statement,
which describes what information we collect and use and our sharing practices when you use our online or mobile products and services;
Privacy Principles
, which explain our commitment to protecting your personal data.
Where can I find more details about how American Express collects, uses and shares data about me?
You can learn about how we collect, use and share information in our
Online Privacy Statement.
What are my choices about how American Express directly markets to me?
You can choose how you would like us to contact you - whether through postal mail, email and/or telephone. If you choose not to receive marketing from us, we will honor your choice. However, you may no longer hear from us about products, services and features - including discounts and other deals - that we believe may be of interest to you. We will still send you communications in order to service your account, fulfill your requests, or administer any promotion or program in which you have elected to participate.
How can I update my personal details?
You can
log in to your account
to update or correct your personal information. You can also call the number on the back of your card. If you are not a Card Member, you can call the customer service number associated with your products or service.
Who can I contact if I have additional questions about how American Express protects my privacy?
If you have questions or concerns related to our principles, policies or statements, you can call the number on the back of your card, click
here
to contact us or contact our Data Protection Officer at
amexukdpo@aexp.com
Sub-policy 5
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/en-ww/:
Choose another country or region to see content specific to your location and shop online.
Ireland
Ireland
Other country or region
Continue
Apple
Store
Shop the Latest
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
Accessories
Find a Store
Order Status
Apple Trade In
Financing
Personal Setup
Certified Refurbished
Education
Business
Veterans and Military
Government
Mac
Explore All Mac
MacBook Air
MacBook Pro
iMac
Mac mini
Mac Studio
Mac Pro
Displays
Compare Mac
Switch from PC to Mac
Shop Mac
Help Me Choose
Mac Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Mac Support
AppleCare+ for Mac
macOS Sequoia
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
Continuity
iCloud+
Mac for Business
Education
iPad
Explore All iPad
iPad Pro
iPad Air
iPad
iPad mini
Apple Pencil
Keyboards
Compare iPad
Why iPad
Shop iPad
iPad Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
iPad Support
AppleCare+ for iPad
iPadOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iCloud+
Education
iPhone
Explore All iPhone
iPhone 16 Pro
iPhone 16
iPhone 16e
iPhone 15
Compare iPhone
Switch from Android
Shop iPhone
iPhone Accessories
Apple Trade In
Carrier Deals at Apple
Financing
iPhone Support
AppleCare+ for iPhone
iOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iPhone Privacy
iCloud+
Wallet, Pay, Card
Siri
Watch
Explore All Apple Watch
Apple Watch Series 10
Apple Watch Ultra 2
Apple Watch SE
Apple Watch Nike
Apple Watch Hermès
Compare Watch
Why Apple Watch
Shop Apple Watch
Apple Watch Studio
Apple Watch Bands
Apple Watch Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Apple Watch Support
AppleCare+
watchOS 11
Apple Watch For Your Kids
Apps by Apple
Apple Fitness+
Vision
Explore Apple Vision Pro
Guided Tour
Tech Specs
Shop Apple Vision Pro
Apple Vision Pro Accessories
Book a Demo
Financing
Apple Vision Pro Support
AppleCare+
visionOS 2
AirPods
Explore All AirPods
AirPods 4
AirPods Pro 2
AirPods Max
Compare AirPods
Shop AirPods
AirPods Accessories
AirPods Support
AppleCare+ for Headphones
Hearing Health
Apple Music
TV & Home
Explore TV & Home
Apple TV 4K
HomePod
HomePod mini
Shop Apple TV 4K
Shop HomePod
Shop HomePod mini
Shop Siri Remote
TV & Home Accessories
Apple TV Support
HomePod Support
AppleCare+
Apple TV app
Apple TV+
Home app
Apple Music
Siri
AirPlay
Entertainment
Explore Entertainment
Apple One
Apple TV+
Apple Music
Apple Arcade
Apple Fitness+
Apple News+
Apple Podcasts
Apple Books
App Store
Apple TV+ Support
Apple Music Support
Accessories
Shop All Accessories
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
TV & Home
Made by Apple
Beats by Dr. Dre
AirTag
Support
iPhone
Mac
iPad
Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Music
TV
Explore Support
Community
Check Coverage
Repair
Get AppleCare+
Apple Account and Password
Billing & Subscriptions
Accessibility
Find a Store
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Apple Intelligence
Apple Trade In
0
+
Privacy
Local Nav Open Menu
Local Nav Close Menu
Overview
Features
Control
Labels
Transparency Report
Privacy Policy
English
Choose your preferred language
At Apple, we believe strongly in fundamental privacy rights — and that those fundamental rights should not differ depending on where you live in the world.
That’s why we treat any data that relates to an identified or identifiable individual or that is linked or linkable to them by Apple as “personal data,” no matter where the individual lives.
This means that data that directly identifies you — such as your name — is personal data, and also data that does not directly identify you, but that can reasonably be used to identify you — such as the serial number of your device — is personal data. Aggregated data is considered non‑personal data for the purposes of this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy covers how
Apple or an Apple-affiliated company
(collectively, “Apple”) handles personal data whether you interact with us on our websites, through Apple apps (such as Apple Music or Wallet), or in person (including by phone or when visiting an Apple Store). Apple may also link to third parties on our services or make third-party apps available for download in our App Store. Apple’s Privacy Policy does not apply to how third parties define personal data or how they use it. We encourage you to read their privacy policies and know your privacy rights before interacting with them.
At Apple, we respect your ability to know, access, correct, transfer, restrict the processing of, and delete your personal data. We have provided these rights to our global customer base and if you choose to exercise these privacy rights, you have the right not to be treated in a discriminatory way nor to receive a lesser degree of service from Apple. Where you are requested to consent to the processing of your personal data by Apple, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
To exercise your privacy rights and choices, including where a third-party service provider is acting on Apple’s behalf, visit the Apple Data and Privacy page at
privacy.apple.com
for Apple or
shazam.com/privacy
for Shazam.
To help protect the security of your personal data, you must sign in to your account and your identity will be verified. If you want to obtain a copy of personal data that is not currently available from
privacy.apple.com
, you can make a request at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the applicable regulator.
There may be situations where we cannot grant your request — for example, if you ask us to delete your transaction data and Apple is legally obligated to keep a record of that transaction to comply with law. We may also decline to grant a request where doing so would undermine our legitimate use of data for anti-fraud and security purposes, such as when you request deletion of an account that is being investigated for security concerns. Other reasons your privacy request may be denied are if it jeopardizes the privacy of others, is frivolous or vexatious, or would be extremely impractical or unreasonable.
If you live in California and you cannot access Apple’s Data and Privacy page,
you or your authorized agent can make a request at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
or by calling 1-800-275-2273.
For more information on exercising your rights, visit
support.apple.com/102283
.
At Apple, we believe that you can have great products and great privacy. This means that we strive to
collect only the personal data that we need
. The personal data Apple collects depends on how you interact with Apple. Descriptions of how Apple handles personal data for certain individual services are available at
apple.com/legal/privacy/data
.
When you create an Apple Account, apply for commercial credit, purchase and/or activate a product or device, download a software update, register for a class at an Apple Store, connect to our services, contact us (including by social media), participate in an online survey, or otherwise interact with Apple, we may collect a variety of information, including:
Account Information.
Your Apple Account and related account details, including email address, devices registered, account status, and age
Device Information.
Data from which your device could be identified, such as device serial number, or about your device, such as browser type
Contact Information
. Data such as name, email address, physical address, phone number, or other contact information
Payment Information. Data about your billing address and method of payment, such as bank details, credit, debit, or other payment card information
Transaction Information.
Data about purchases of Apple products and services or transactions facilitated by Apple, including purchases on Apple platforms
Fraud Prevention Information.
Data used to help identify and prevent fraud, including a device trust score
Usage Data.
Data about your activity on and use of our offerings, such as app launches within our services, including browsing history; search history; product interaction; crash data, performance and other diagnostic data; and other usage data
Location Information
. Precise location only to support services such as Find My or where you agree for region-specific services, and coarse location
Health Information.
Data relating to the health status of an individual, including data related to one’s physical or mental health or condition. Personal health data also includes data that can be used to make inferences about or detect the health status of an individual. If you participate in a study using an Apple Health Research Study app, the policy governing the privacy of your personal data is described in the
Apple Health Study Apps Privacy Policy
.
Fitness Information.
Details relating to your fitness and exercise information where you choose to share them
Financial Information.
Details including salary, income, and assets information where collected, and information related to Apple-branded financial offerings
Government ID Data.
In certain jurisdictions, we may ask for a government-issued ID in limited circumstances, including when setting up a wireless account and activating your device, for the purpose of extending commercial credit, managing reservations, or as required by law
Other Information You Provide to Us.
Details such as the content of your communications with Apple, including interactions with customer support and contacts through social media channels
You are not required to provide the personal data that we have requested. However, if you choose not to do so, in many cases we will not be able to provide you with our products or services or respond to requests you may have.
Apple may receive personal data about you from other
individuals
, from businesses or third parties acting
at your direction
, from our
partners
who work with us to provide our products and services and assist us in security and fraud prevention, and from other
lawful sources.
Individuals.
Apple may collect data about you from other individuals — for example, if that individual has sent you a product or gift card, invited you to participate in an Apple service or forum, or shared content with you.
At Your Direction.
You may direct other individuals or third parties to share data with Apple. For example, you may direct your mobile carrier to share data about your carrier account with Apple for account activation, or for your loyalty program to share information about your participation so that you can earn rewards for Apple purchases.
Apple Partners.
We may also validate the information you provide — for example, when creating an Apple Account, with a third party for security, and for fraud-prevention purposes.
To power features such as search and as a source for our foundational AI models, Apple uses Applebot, a web crawler, to crawl information that is publicly available on the internet. We have measures in place to reduce the amount of personal data we collect and make no attempt to connect data crawled to any individual Apple user, or to build profiles about individuals. Your private personal data is not used to train our foundational AI models. To exercise your right as an individual to opt out of processing, visit the
Apple Intelligence Privacy Inquiries form
. For more information about Applebot, visit
support.apple.com/120320
.
For research and development purposes, we may use datasets such as those that contain images, voices, or other data that could be associated with an identifiable person. When acquiring such datasets, we do so in accordance with applicable law, including law in the jurisdiction in which the dataset is hosted. When using such datasets for research and development, we do not attempt to reidentify individuals who may appear therein.
Apple uses personal data to power our services, to process your transactions, to communicate with you, for security and fraud prevention, and to comply with law. We may also use personal data for other purposes with your consent.
Apple uses your personal data only when we have a valid legal basis to do so.
Depending on the circumstance, Apple may rely on your consent or the fact that the processing is necessary to fulfill a contract with you, protect your vital interests or those of other persons, or to comply with law. We may also process your personal data where we believe it is in our or others’ legitimate interests, taking into consideration your interests, rights, and expectations. More information is available in the product-specific information embedded in our products and features as described above. If you have questions about the legal basis, you can contact the Data Protection Officer at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Power Our Services.
Apple collects personal data necessary to power our services, which may include personal data collected to improve our offerings, for internal purposes such as auditing or data analysis, or for troubleshooting. For example, if you would like to access a song through an Apple Music subscription, we collect data on what songs you play in order to provide you with the content requested and for royalty purposes.
Process Your Transactions.
To process transactions, Apple must collect data such as your name, purchase, and payment information.
Communicate with You.
To respond to communications, reach out to you about your transactions or account, market our products and services, provide other relevant information, or request information or feedback. From time to time, we may use your personal data to send important notices, such as communications about purchases and changes to our terms, conditions, and policies. Because this information is important to your interaction with Apple, you may not opt out of receiving these important notices.
Security and Fraud Prevention.
To protect individuals, employees, and Apple and for loss prevention and to prevent fraud, including to protect individuals, employees, and Apple for the benefit of all our users, and prescreening or scanning uploaded content for potentially illegal content, including child sexual exploitation material.
Personal Data Used for Personalization.
If you choose to personalize your services or communications where such options are available, Apple will use information that we collect so that we can offer you those personalized services or communications. You can learn more about how relevant services use information to personalize your experience by reviewing the privacy information presented when you first use a service that asks to use your personal data. We make this information easy to find by presenting it with our Data & Privacy icon; it’s also available at all times on your Apple device and online at
apple.com/legal/privacy/data
.
Comply with Law.
To comply with applicable law — for example, to satisfy tax or reporting obligations, or to comply with a lawful governmental request.
Apple does not use algorithms or profiling to make any decision that would significantly affect you without the opportunity for human review. Apple also does not use or disclose sensitive personal data for any purposes that would require a user to exercise a right to limit processing according to California law.
Apple retains personal data only for so long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected, including as described in this Privacy Policy or in our service-specific privacy notices, or as required by law. We will retain your personal data for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy and our service-specific privacy notices. When assessing retention periods, we first carefully examine whether it is necessary to retain the personal data collected and, if retention is required, work to retain the personal data for the shortest possible period permissible under law.
Apple may share personal data with
Apple-affiliated companies
,
service providers
who act on our behalf, our
partners
,
developers, and publishers
, or others
at your direction
. Further, Apple does not share personal data with third parties for their own marketing purposes.
Service Providers.
Apple may engage third parties to act as our service providers and perform certain tasks on our behalf, such as processing or storing data, including personal data, in connection with your use of our services and delivering products to customers. Apple service providers are obligated to handle personal data consistent with this Privacy Policy and according to our instructions. They cannot use the personal data we share for their own purposes and must delete or return the personal data once they’ve fulfilled our request.
Partners.
At times, Apple may partner with third parties to provide services or other offerings. For example, Apple financial offerings like Apple Card and Apple Cash are offered by Apple and our partners. Apple requires its partners to protect your personal data.
Developers and Publishers from Whom You Get a Subscription.
If you purchase a third-party subscription from the App Store or within Apple News, we create a Subscriber ID that is unique to you and the developer or publisher. The Subscriber ID may be used to provide reports to the developer or publisher, which include information about the subscription you purchased and your country of residence. If you cancel all of your subscriptions from a particular developer or publisher, the Subscriber ID will reset after 180 days if you do not resubscribe. This information is provided to developers or publishers so that they can understand the performance of their subscriptions.
Others.
Apple may share personal data with others at your direction or with your consent, such as when we share information with your carrier to activate your account. We may also disclose information about you if we determine that for purposes of national security, law enforcement, or other issues of public importance, disclosure is necessary or appropriate. We may also disclose information about you where there is a lawful basis for doing so, if we determine that disclosure is reasonably necessary to enforce our terms and conditions or to protect our operations or users, or in the event of a reorganization, merger, or sale.
Apple does not sell your personal data including as “sale” is defined in Nevada and California. Apple also does not “share” your personal data as that term is defined in California.
At Apple, we believe that great privacy rests on great security. We use
administrative, technical, and physical safeguards
to protect your personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and the processing, and the threats posed. We are constantly working to improve on these safeguards to help keep your personal data secure. For more information, visit our
Apple Platform Security
guide.
Apple understands the importance of safeguarding the personal data of children, which we consider to be an
individual under the age of 13 or the equivalent age as specified by law in your jurisdiction
. That is why Apple has implemented additional processes and protections to help keep children’s personal data safe.
To access certain Apple services, a child must have a child Apple Account. A child Apple Account may be created by the
parent
or, in the case of a Managed Apple Account, by the
child’s educational institution
.
Parents.
To create a child account, parents must review the
Family Privacy Disclosure for Children
, which describes how Apple handles children’s personal data. If they agree, the parent must provide Apple with a verifiable parental consent.
Educational Institutions.
Educational institutions that participate in the Apple School Manager Program may also create Apple IDs for students, called “Managed Apple IDs.” These schools are required to agree to the
Managed Apple IDs for Students Disclosure
which is included as Exhibit A to the Apple School Manager Agreement.
If we learn that a child’s personal data was collected without appropriate authorization, it will be deleted as soon as possible.
To exercise privacy rights for your child’s information, visit the Apple Data and Privacy page at
privacy.apple.com
and sign in to their account.
Apple’s websites, online services, interactive applications, and advertisements may use
“cookies” and other technologies
such as web beacons.
These technologies help us to better understand user behavior including for security and fraud prevention purposes, tell us which parts of our websites people have visited, and facilitate and measure the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches.
Communications Cookies.
These cookies are used to enable network traffic to and from Apple’s systems, including by helping us detect any errors.
Strictly Necessary Cookies.
These cookies are set as required to provide a specific feature or service that you have accessed or requested. For example, they allow us to display our websites in the proper format and language, to authenticate and verify your transactions, and to preserve the contents of your Bag when shopping online at
apple.com
.
Other Cookies.
These cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with our websites and online services, including by helping us to assess the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches. Apple also uses these cookies to remember choices you make while browsing, so we can provide you with a customized experience.
If you prefer that Apple not use cookies, we provide you with the means to disable their use. If you want to disable cookies and you’re using the Safari web browser, choose “Block all cookies” in Safari’s privacy settings. If you are using a different browser, check with your provider to find out how to disable cookies. Certain features of the Apple website may not be available if all cookies are disabled.
In addition to cookies, Apple uses other technologies that help us achieve similar objectives.
In some email messages Apple sends to you, we provide a “click-through URL” that links you to content on the Apple website. When you click one of these URLs, they pass through a separate server before arriving at the destination page on our website. We track this click-through to help us determine interest in particular topics and measure whether we are communicating with you effectively. If you prefer not to be tracked in this way, you should not click graphic or text links in email messages.
Apple generally treats data we collect using these cookies and similar technologies as non-personal data.
However, to the extent that Internet Protocol (IP) addresses or similar identifiers are considered personal data by local law, we also treat these identifiers as personal data in those regions. In addition, Apple sometimes combines non-personal data collected from these technologies with other personal data Apple holds. When we combine data in this way, we treat the combined data as personal data for purposes of this Privacy Policy.
Ads that are delivered by Apple’s advertising platform may appear on the App Store, Apple News, Stocks, and Apple TV app depending on your location. Apple’s advertising platform does not track you, meaning that it does not link user or device data collected from our apps with user or device data collected from third parties for targeted advertising or advertising measurement purposes, and does not share user or device data with data brokers.
If you do not want to receive ads targeted to your interests from Apple's advertising platform in those apps, you can choose to disable Personalized Ads, which will opt your Apple Account out of receiving such ads regardless of what device you are using. On your iOS, iPadOS, or visionOS device, you can disable Personalized Ads by going to Settings > Privacy & Security > Apple Advertising and tapping to turn off Personalized Ads. On your Mac, you can disable Personalized Ads by going to System Settings > Privacy & Security > Privacy > Advertising, then deselecting Personalized Ads. You may still see ads in the App Store, Apple News, or Stocks based on context like your search query or the channel you are reading. If you disable Allow Apps to Request to Track, third-party apps cannot request to use the Advertising Identifier, a non-personal identifier served by the operating system on your device, to track you across apps and websites owned by other companies.
For more information about Apple-delivered advertising and privacy, visit
apple.com/legal/privacy/data/ww/apple-advertising
.
Apple products and offerings connect you to the world. To make that possible,
your personal data may be transferred to or accessed by entities around the world,
including Apple-affiliated companies, to perform processing activities such as those described in this Privacy Policy in connection with your use of our products and services. Apple complies with laws on the transfer of personal data between countries to help ensure your data is protected, wherever it may be.
The Apple entity that controls your personal data may differ depending on where you live.
For example, Apple Store information is controlled by individual retail entities in each country and Apple Media Services-related personal data may be controlled by various Apple entities as reflected in the terms of service. If you do not reside in the U.S., your personal data may be processed by Apple Inc. and other Apple-affiliated companies on behalf of the Apple entity controlling personal data for your jurisdiction. For example, Imagery and associated data collected by Apple around the world to improve Apple Maps and to support our Look Around feature is transferred to Apple Inc. in California.
Personal data relating to individuals in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland is controlled by Apple Distribution International Limited in Ireland. Apple’s international transfer of personal data collected in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland is governed by
Standard Contractual Clauses
. If you have questions or would like a copy of Apple’s Standard Contractual Clauses, you can contact us at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Personal data collected by
Apple or an Apple-affiliated company
worldwide is generally stored by Apple Inc. in the United States. Regardless of where your personal data is stored, Apple maintains the same high level of protection and safeguarding measures.
Apple’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Global Cross-Border Privacy Rules (CBPRs) System and the Global Privacy Recognition for Processors (PRP) System. For more information about the Global CBPR and PRP Systems, visit
Global CBPR Forum
. To view our certifications, visit
CBPR System Compliance Directory
. For more information about the scope of our participation, or to submit a privacy inquiry through
BBB National Programs
, our Accountability Agent, visit:
Cross-Border Privacy Rules Program
Privacy Recognition for Processors Program
Personal data relating to individuals in the People’s Republic of China may be processed by Apple in countries outside of the People’s Republic of China, such as Apple Inc. in the United States or Apple Distribution International Limited in the Republic of Ireland. Where this occurs, it will be done in compliance with local laws, including the Personal Information Protection Law. For the purposes of processing set out in this Privacy Policy, Apple may also transfer such personal data to third-party service providers, who may in turn store or transfer the data outside of the People’s Republic of China. For more information, visit
China Mainland Privacy Disclosures
.
To make sure your personal data is secure, we communicate our privacy and security guidelines to Apple employees and strictly enforce privacy safeguards within the company.
If you have questions about Apple’s Privacy Policy or privacy practices including where a third-party service provider is acting on our behalf, or you would like to contact our Data Protection Officer, you can contact us at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
or call the
Apple Support number
for your country or region.
You can also ask us questions about how to submit a privacy complaint and we will endeavor to help.
Apple takes your privacy questions seriously. A dedicated team reviews your inquiry to determine how best to respond to your question or concern, including those inquiries received in response to an access or download request. In most cases, all substantive contacts receive a response within seven days. In other cases, we may require additional information or let you know that we need more time to respond.
Where your complaint indicates an improvement could be made in our handling of privacy issues, we will take steps to make such an update at the next reasonable opportunity. In the event that a privacy issue has resulted in a negative impact on you or another person, we will take steps to address that with you or that other person.
You may at any time — including if you are not satisfied with Apple’s response — refer your complaint to the applicable regulator. If you ask us, we will endeavor to provide you with information about relevant complaint avenues which may be applicable to your circumstances.
When there is a material change to this Privacy Policy, we’ll post a notice on this website at least a week in advance of doing so and contact you directly about the change if we have your data on file.
View our CBPR certification
View our PRP certification
Sub-policy 6
https://www.discover.com/privacy-statement/eu-data.html:
EEA, UK and Swiss Online Privacy Notice
You are here
Privacy Center
EEA, UK and Swiss Online Privacy Notice
Your online privacy
We may interact with you in a variety of ways online. From Discover websites, to our mobile apps,
online services
and presence on social media sites and apps—this European Economic Area, United Kingdom and Swiss Online Privacy Notice (“EEA, UK & Swiss Privacy Notice”) covers how Discover Financial Services treats your information.
EEA, UK & Swiss Privacy Notice
Rights for European Economic Area, United Kingdom and Swiss Data Subjects
This supplement is being furnished to individuals in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom (“UK”), and Switzerland to provide additional information required by the European Union General Data Protection Regulation and its equivalent laws in the UK and Switzerland.
What Are Your Rights Under EEA, UK and Swiss Privacy Law
We adhere to applicable data protection laws in the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland, when relevant and appropriate. If you are a data subject located in one of these places, this means that:
if we process your personal data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time for further processing;
you have the right to request access to, rectification or deletion of your personal data;
you have the right to object to the processing of your personal data;
you have the right to request us to transfer your personal data to another controller;
you have the right to request us to restrict the processing of your personal data;
you have the right to file a complaint with us; and
you have the right to file a complaint with the appropriate Supervisory Authority based on the location of (i) your habitual residence, (ii) place of work, or (iii) where the alleged infringement happened.
The above rights are subject to legal restrictions, as provided by the applicable privacy law.
When we process your personal data, we rely on specific legal grounds. When we process your personal data, we do so with your consent and/or as necessary to provide our services and products, fulfill our contractual and legal obligations, or other legitimate interests as described in the sections "About the Information We Collect," "How We Use Information We Collect" and "What We Share." For example, we may process your personal data in order to (i) fulfill a contract with you or one between you and another party, such as a merchant or payment processor, (ii) support our Business Continuity Program, help prevent fraud and security incidents, or support our corporate governance, or (iii) comply with applicable law. We also process your personal data to support our legitimate interests, such as (i) to improve our products and services and (ii) to help prevent fraud and manage other risks.
You may access, correct, or delete some personal and account information online by logging into your account.
International Data Transfer
We rely on standard contractual clauses to govern the transfer of information between entities, when and if required. We may transfer personal data to countries other than the country in which the data was originally collected. Such countries may not have the same data protection laws as the country in which you initially provided the data. When we transfer your personal data to the United States, we will protect the data as described in this EEA, UK & Swiss Privacy Notice.
When your personal data are transferred from the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, it is the responsibility of the data exporter to ensure that such transfers are done in compliance with relevant data protection law. Where we are the data exporter, we put in place appropriate measures for such transfers to happen in compliance therewith. If you have more questions on when such situations might take place, you can send an e-mail to us at
privacy@discover.com
.
Automated Decision-Making and Profiling
. We sometimes use analytics and profiling tools in order to understand how individuals use our products and services. We may also use these tools for other business information purposes such as product development. These tools support our ability to improve our products and services. Additionally, we utilize the resultant information to help prevent security and fraud events. Discover will not make any automated decisions about you that may significantly impact you unless (1) such a decision is necessary as part of a contract with you, (2) we have your explicit consent, or (3) required by applicable law.
Inquiries
If you wish to exercise the above mentioned rights under EEA, UK, or Swiss data protection laws, or if you have any questions about this EEA, UK & Swiss Privacy Notice, please send an email to
privacy@discover.com
, or by writing to us at:
Discover Financial Services
Attn: Privacy Compliance
P.O. Box 795
Deerfield IL 60015
USA
To comply with the General Data Protection Regulation (2016/679) we have appointed a European representative. If you wish to contact them, their details are as follows:
Bird & Bird GDPR Representative Services SRL
Deloitte House
29 Earlsfort Terrace
Dublin 2, D02 AY28
Ireland
EUrepresentative.DiscoverBank@twobirds.com
Main point of contact: Vincent Rezzouk-Hammachi
Additionally, if you are in the UK, you may contact our representative at:
Diners Club International
The Ark
Attn: GDPR Representative
201 Talgarth Rd, Level One
Hammersmith, London, W6 8BJ
UK
In your communication, please include the following information so that we may adequately address your request:
Full name
Physical address(es) on file with Discover
Phone number
We reserve the right to decline requests in accordance with applicable law. EEA, UK, and Swiss data subjects may also contact their respective Supervisory Authority with any questions about our privacy practices.
Back to Top
You are leaving Discover.com
You are leaving Discover.com and entering a website operated by a third party. We are providing the link to this website for your convenience, or because we have a relationship with the third party. Discover Bank does not provide the products and services on the website. Please review the applicable privacy and security policies and terms and conditions for the website you are visiting. Discover Bank does not guarantee the accuracy of any financial tools that may be available on the website or their applicability to your circumstances. For personal advice regarding your financial situation, please consult with a financial advisor.
Close X
Close and return to pulsenetwork.com
discover.com,card.discover.com,discovernetwork.com,discovercard.com,discoverglobalnetwork.com,discovernetwork.ca,info.evidon.com/pub_info/1142?v=1,investorrelations.discover.com,jobs.discover.com,mydiscovercareer.com,portal.discover.com,servicecenter.discoverglobalnetwork.com,creditscorecard.com,dinersclub.com,discoverglobalnetwork.com,discovernetwork.com,discoverstudentloans.com,pulsenetwork.com,homeloans.discover.com,discover.app.link,discover.supplierone.co,discover.versaic.com,stage-wcm.discover.com,dev-wcm.discover.com,prod-cs-pub1.dfs.adobecqms.net,prod-cs-pub2.dfs.adobecqms.net,prod-cs-pub3.dfs.adobecqms.net,dfs-cs-prod65-uswest1.adobecqms.net,dfs-cs-prod65-useast1.adobecqms.net,publish1useast1.prod.dfs-cs-65.adobecqms.net,publish2useast1.prod.dfs-cs-65.adobecqms.net,publish1uswest1.prod.dfs-cs-65.adobecqms.net,javascript:void(0),mailto:,tel:,ftp:,content.pulsenetwork.com,www1.pulsenetwork.com,pulsenetwork.com/pn,discoverdebit.com,event.on24.com,debitmarketinghub.com
Sub-policy 7
https://www.mastercard.com/global/en/vision/corp-responsibility/commitment-to-privacy/privacy.html:
Skip to Content
Effective Date: 1/17/2025
Mastercard International Incorporated and its affiliates (collectively, “Mastercard”) respect your privacy.
Personal Information We May Collect
How We May Use Your Personal Information
How We Share Your Personal Information
Your Rights and Choices
Data Transfers
How We Protect Your Personal Information
Features and Links to Other Websites
Children’s Privacy
Updates to This Global Privacy Notice
How to Contact Us
This Global Privacy Notice describes the types of Personal Information we collect, the purposes for which we collect that Personal Information, the other parties with whom we may share it and the measures we take to protect the security of the data. It also tells you about your rights and choices with respect to your Personal Information, and how you can contact us about our privacy practices.
Please note that we also act on behalf of and under the instructions of financial institutions, merchants and other partners which act as data controllers, including for processing payment transactions. Please refer to their respective privacy policies for more information regarding the processing of your Personal Information in these contexts.
Our privacy practices may vary among the countries in which we operate to reflect local practices and legal requirements. Specific privacy notices may apply to some of our products and services. Please visit the webpage or digital asset of the specific product or service to learn more about our privacy and information practices in relation to that product or service.
Data Analytics Opt-Out
Marketing Email Opt-Out
My Data
1. Personal Information We May Collect
“Personal Information” means any information relating to an identified or identifiable individual. We may collect the following categories of Personal Information:
Transaction information, such as personal account number, the merchant’s name and location, the date and the total amount of the transaction, and other information provided by financial institutions or merchants when we act on their behalf.
Product and service information, such as registration and payment information, and program-specific information, when you request products or services directly from us, or participate in marketing programs.
Website, device and mobile app usage, and similar information collected via automated means, such as cookies and similar technologies.
Job applications and related information when you apply for a job with us.
Business contact information when you work for one of our business partners.
Identity verification information, such as name, e-mail address, physical address, telephone number, and IP address.
Any other information that you may provide while using communication tools.
For the purpose of this Global Privacy Notice, unless otherwise specified, “Personal Information” means any information relating to an identified or identifiable individual. We may obtain different types of Personal Information (including Sensitive Personal Information, as may be the case under applicable laws) relating to you in the situations described below.
Personal Information We Receive from Financial Institutions, Merchants, and Other Partners in Connection with Mastercard’s Products or Services
As a processor of payment transactions and provider of related services, we obtain a limited amount of information in connection with your payment transactions such as the personal account number, the merchant’s name and location, the date and the total amount of the transaction. Importantly, we generally do not need or collect the cardholder’s name or other contact information to process payment transactions.
In addition, for certain products and services, your financial institutions, the merchants where you make a transaction or other partners may provide us with more information about you, or we may collect it directly from you to provide you with those products and services on their behalf, support their business or perform processing activities on their behalf.
In the above situations, we may act on behalf of and under the instructions of financial institutions, merchants and other partners which act as data controllers. Unless otherwise authorized by law, we will process your Personal Information to process payment transactions or for the purposes agreed between Mastercard and the financial institutions, merchants and other partners. Please refer to their respective privacy policies for more information regarding the processing of your Personal Information.
Personal Information We Collect when Providing Mastercard’s Products and Services Directly to You
Mastercard may provide you directly with products and services such as marketing programs, rewards programs, eWallets, Open Banking solutions, prepaid services, location alert programs, and biometric authentication tools. To benefit from one or more of these products and services, you can submit information to us directly via various means including: (i) on our websites and digital assets, (ii) in response to marketing or other communications, (iii) by signing up for a Mastercard product or service, or (iv) through your participation in an offer, program or promotion. We may also obtain Personal Information about you through your use of our products or services, from companies that use or facilitate our products or services, from publicly available sources, or from third party partners. Your Personal Information may also be passed on to us by your financial institution, merchant or other business partners.
Below is an overview of the types of Personal Information we may collect in relation to programs we offer directly to you. Each program differs, so where applicable, please refer to the relevant program-specific privacy notice for more information on the use of your Personal Information for that specific program.
Registration and payment information: We may collect identifiers and your contact information (such as name, email address, telephone number, billing or shipping address), authentication information (e.g., username and password), age, date of birth, gender and family status, military and veteran status, language preferences, payment details, personal account number, commercial information, such as merchant’s name and location, date and total amount of the transactions, card expiration date and card verification code.
Information we process to provide you with the program: We may collect different types of Personal Information depending on the program. For example, programs designed to offer you location-based services will typically require the collection of your address or geolocation data. Programs within our Open Banking solutions may require the collection of your financial account information. Similarly, programs designed to allow you to authenticate for example, via facial or fingerprint recognition may require the processing of your photograph and/or biometric information. All these programs are voluntary, and your Personal Information is only collected if you subscribe to such programs.
Other information you choose to provide: You may choose to provide other information, such as different types of content (e.g., photographs, articles, comments), contact information of friends or other people you would like us to contact, content you make available through social media accounts or memberships with third parties, or any other information you want to share with us, for example when you contact customer service.
You may be subject to obligations under applicable laws, such as the obligation to provide complete and accurate Personal Information when consenting to the processing of your Personal Information.
In addition, we may collect or use Personal Information for fraud prevention and monitoring, risk management, dispute resolution and other related purposes. Such information may include identifiers, commercial information, and Internet or other electronic network activity information, such as the personal account number, merchant’s name and location, date and total amount of the transactions, IP address, fraud score, location data, merchant details, items purchased and information about the dispute. When we provide cryptocurrency and blockchain intelligence solutions, we may also collect and process information gathered from the blockchain, including blockchain addresses and other cryptocurrency transaction details. For more information, please
click here
.
For more information on our collection of Personal Information in the context of our Open Banking solutions, please click
here
.
Personal Information We Obtain from Your Interaction with Mastercard’s Ads, Websites, Apps or Other Digital Assets
We, our service providers and partners may collect certain information about you via automated means such as Internet or other electronic network activity information, cookies, and web beacons when you interact with our ads, mobile apps, or visit our websites, pages or other digital assets. The Internet and/or Device Information we collect in this manner may include: IP address, browser type, operating system, mobile device identifier, geographical area, referring URLs and information on actions taken or interaction with our digital assets. A “cookie” is a text file placed on a computer’s hard drive by a web server. A “web beacon,” also known as an Internet tag, pixel tag or clear GIF, is a technology that helps us identify when content has been accessed or visited.
We use this information to improve our online products and services by assessing how many users access or use our online products and services, which content, products and features of our online products and services most interest our visitors, what types of offers our customers like to see and how our online products and services perform from a technical point of view. For instance, we may use third-party web analytics services on our websites and mobile apps, such as those of Adobe Analytics. The analytics providers that administer these services use technologies such as cookies and web beacons to help us analyze how visitors use our websites and apps.
We, our service providers and partners may also collect information about you in connection with our marketing activities, including offers, sweepstakes, contests and promotions. The information collected for these purposes may include identifiers and your contact information (e.g., name, postal address, email address, telephone number), electronic identification data (e.g., username, password, security questions, IP address), and data collected in the context of online marketing programs, including commercial information, Internet or other electronic network activity information, geolocation data, and inferences drawn from Personal Information (e.g., personal characteristics, life habits, consumption habits, interests, location data, and voice and image recordings).
We, our service providers and partners may also collect information about you to provide you with content and advertising tailored to your individual interests based on inferences drawn from Personal Information. The information collected for these purposes may include Internet or other electronic network activity information, such as details about things like the particular pages or ads you view on our websites and apps and the actions you take on our websites and apps.
We, our service providers and partners may collect certain information about you via automated means such as, social media tools, widgets or plug-ins to connect you to your social media accounts. These features may allow you to sign in through your social media account, share a link or post directly to your social media account. When you visit a website that contains such tools or plugins, the social media or other service provider may learn of your visit. However, your interactions with these tools are governed by the privacy policies of the corresponding social media platforms. As we do not control these third-parties’ data handling practices, we recommend that you review their privacy policies, terms of use, and license agreements (if any). For further details, please consult Section 7 (“
Features and Links to Other Websites
”) of this Global Privacy Notice.
In addition, some of our online products and services include advanced fraud prevention technology using behavioral-based data or biometric information, such as keystroke timing, device accelerometer, scroll position and mouse-location.
Where required under applicable law, we obtain your consent prior to using the above automated means, and prior to sending you marketing communications, tailored content and advertising.
Please see the “
Your Rights and Choices
” section of this Global Privacy Notice to learn about your choices.
Because there is not yet a consensus on how companies should respond to web browser-based do-not-track (“DNT”) mechanisms, Mastercard does not respond to web browser-based DNT signals at this time. To learn more about browser tracking signals and DNT, visit
http://www.allaboutdnt.com
.
Personal Information We Obtain when You Apply for a Job with Us
If you are applying for a job at Mastercard, we may collect certain identifiers and professional or employment-related information from your job applications on our Career website. To learn more about the type of information Mastercard collects in connection with job applications, please see the
Mastercard  Applicant Privacy Notice
.
Personal Information We Collect in the Context of Our Business Relationship with a Financial Institution, Merchant or other Entity Partnering with Mastercard
We may collect Personal Information from individuals working for one of our business partners (including financial institutions, merchants, customers, suppliers, vendors and other partners), including identifiers, name, job title, department and name of organization, business email and postal addresses, business telephone number, queries, answers to security questions, security passwords and other credentials. We may use this information to provide products and services directly to financial institutions, corporate clients, merchants, customers and partners, to manage our business relationships and financial reporting, for franchise development and integrity, to protect us from financial crime, to improve our service, for marketing and to comply with applicable law, as well as for accounting, auditing and billing purposes.
In certain jurisdictions, it may be necessary for us to receive and process your Sensitive Personal Information to provide respective products and services to you and/or to financial institutions, corporate clients, merchants, customers and partners. Such processing of your Sensitive Personal Information will be protected with adequate security measures and be conducted in a manner so as to have the lowest possible impact on your personal rights and interests. The following information may be considered Sensitive Personal Information as defined by applicable law: personal account number, card expiration date, card verification code, answers to security questions, security passwords and other credentials, address or location information (to the extent that it may reveal your personal tracks), voice and image recordings, electronic identification data, payment transactions, and biometric information.
2. How We May Use Your Personal Information
We May Use Your Personal Information to:
Process your payment transactions.
Protect against and prevent fraud, and other legal or information security risks. For more information, please see our
Fraud & Security Notice
and our
MATCH Notice
.
Provide our
Open Banking solutions
.
Create and manage any accounts you may have with us, verify your identity, provide our services, and respond to your inquiries.
Provide and communicate with you about products and services offered by Mastercard, financial institutions, merchants and partners.
Offer and support loyalty programs.  For more information, please see our
Loyalty Notice
.
Provide you with personalized services and recommendations.
Manage our customer, supplier and vendor relationships, including to create and publish business directories (which may include business contact information).
Operate, evaluate and improve our business, including cleansing, preparing, and/or anonymizing data for analytics and to develop new products and services.
Process your job application. For more information, please see the
Mastercard Applicant Privacy Notice
.
Develop and improve products and services, detect, and prevent deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and improve customer and consumer experience. For these processing activities, we may use techniques such as artificial intelligence and machine learning to process and analyze data.
Enable mergers, acquisitions and/or sale of business or assets. For example, if we sell any business or assets or any part of our business or assets is acquired by a third-party, we may disclose your personal information relating to those business and assets to the prospective buyer or the acquiring third-party.
Serve other purposes for which we provide specific notice at the time of collection, and as otherwise authorized or required by law.
Generate anonymized and aggregated data to prepare insights to advise Mastercard’s customers and partners regarding spending patterns, fraud and other trends.
Learn more about you, including your preferences or other characteristics. We treat these inferences as Personal Information where required under applicable law.
Where required under applicable law, we will only use your Personal Information with your consent; as necessary to provide you with products and services; to comply with a legal obligation; or when there is a legitimate and overriding interest that necessitates the use.
We may use Personal Information we obtain about you for the purposes set out below. Depending on the country in which you are located, we will only process your Personal Information, where permitted under applicable laws, and when we have a legal basis for the processing as identified in the table below. However, please note that even though the chart below does not list consent as a legal basis for each processing activity, in some countries consent is the only or most appropriate legal basis for the processing of Personal Information, and in those countries, we rely on consent.
Processing activity
Legal Basis for Processing (where required under applicable law)
Process your payment transactions (including authorization, clearing, chargebacks and other related dispute resolution activities).
In most cases, we process your payment transactions as a processor on behalf of your financial institutions, merchants and other partners which act as data controllers. When we act as a processor, controllers are responsible for ensuring a legal basis for the processing of your Personal Information. Where applicable, we have taken steps to ensure that controllers have obtained your consent to our processing of your Personal Information on their behalf. Please refer to their respective privacy policies for more information regarding the processing of your Personal Information in these contexts.
In some limited cases (e.g., chargebacks), we may process your payment transactions as a controller, provided that:
You consented to the use of your Personal Information; or
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are party; or
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal or regulatory obligation.
Protect against and prevent fraud and cyber threats, unauthorized transactions, claims and other liabilities, and manage risk exposure and franchise quality with respect to the integrity and security of our payments network.
When we process Personal Information for fraud and cyber threat prevention, we may act as a controller or as a processor. When we act as a controller, we rely on one of the following legal grounds:
You consented to the use of your Personal Information; or
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal or regulatory obligation; or
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are party; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purpose of protecting against fraud, securing our network and the payment transactions that we process (including blockchain in relation to cryptocurrency).
For more information on our fraud prevention and monitoring activities, please see our
Fraud & Security Notice
.
For more information on the Mastercard Alert To Control High-risk Merchants (MATCH) program, please see our
MATCH Notice
.
Provide our Open Banking solutions, including our connectivity and dispute resolution services.
You consented to the use of your Personal Information; or
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal or regulatory obligation; or
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are party; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for such purpose (e.g., detecting fraud risks or resolving disputes).
In some cases, we provide our Open Banking solutions as a processor on behalf of your service provider, merchants and other partners which act as data controllers. When we act as a processor, controllers are responsible for ensuring a legal basis for the processing of your Personal Information. Where applicable, we have taken steps to ensure that controllers have obtained your consent to our processing of your Personal Information on their behalf. Please refer to their respective privacy policies for more information regarding the processing of your Personal Information in these contexts.
For more information on our Open Banking activities, please see our
Open Banking Privacy Notice
.
Create and manage any accounts you may have with us, verify your identity, provide our services, and respond to your inquiries.
You consented to the use of your Personal Information; or
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are a party; or
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal or regulatory obligation; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purpose of creating and managing accounts and verifying your identity, and responding to your inquiries.
Provide, administer, and communicate with you about products, services, offers, loyalty programs and promotions (including loyalty program operation, contests, sweepstakes, donation service program operation, and any other marketing activities) of Mastercard, financial institutions, merchants, and partners.
You consented to the use of your Personal Information; or
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are party; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purpose of providing you with products and services. For more information on our loyalty programs, please see our
Loyalty Programs Notice
. For more information about our donation service program, please see our
Mastercard Donation Service Privacy Notice
.
Manage our customer, supplier and vendor relationships, including to create and publish business directories (which may include business contact information).
You consented to the use of your Personal Information; or
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are a party; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purpose of managing our customer, supplier and vendor relationships.
Operate, evaluate and improve our business (including developing new products and services or cleansing, organizing, and preparing data for permissible purposes); determining the effectiveness of and optimizing our advertising; analyzing our products, services, websites, mobile apps and any other digital assets in order to facilitate their functionality; and analyzing and comparing our customers’ approach to spending that have signed up to our marketing program (such as Priceless Specials) in order to understand and improve the effectiveness of the program.
You consented to the use of your Personal Information; or
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are party; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purposes of operating, evaluating and improving our products or services.
Performing due diligence reviews, accounting, auditing, billing, reconciliation and collection activities.
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal or regulatory obligation; or
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are party; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purposes of performing due diligence, billing, reconciliation and collection activities.
Provide you with personalized services and recommendations. For example, we may use your Personal Information such as your email address and your interaction with our website to analyze your preferences, interests and behavior in order to decide to provide you with tailored content and the most relevant offers, recommendations and email communications about a specific product from Mastercard, financial institutions, merchants and partners.
You consented to the use of your Personal Information; or
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are party; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purposes of providing you personalized services and recommendations.
Anonymize Personal Information and prepare and furnish aggregated data reports showing anonymized information (including compilations, analyses, analytical and predictive models and rules, and other aggregated reports) for the purpose of advising our financial institutions, merchants and other customers and partners regarding past and potential future patterns of spending, fraud, credit risk,  and other insights that may be extracted from this data.  The Personal Information we anonymize may include payment transactions.
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purposes of anonymizing Personal Information and preparing and furnishing aggregated data reports; or
The processing is undertaken for statistical and/or research purposes (in jurisdictions where this legal ground is available) and training our AI.
To the extent we maintain or otherwise process deidentified or anonymized information, we will maintain and use the information in deidentified or anonymized form and will not attempt to reidentify the information unless otherwise permitted by applicable law.
Evaluate your interest in employment and contact you regarding possible employment with Mastercard.
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are party; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purposes of evaluating your interest in employment and contacting you regarding possible employment; or
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal or regulatory obligation.  For more information, see the
Mastercard Applicant Privacy Notice
.
Enforce our
Terms of Use
or as necessary to establish, exercise and defend legal rights.
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are party; or
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal or  regulatory obligation; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purposes of enforcing the
Terms of Use
and establishing, exercising and defending legal rights.
As may be required by applicable laws and regulations, including for compliance with Know Your Customers, Anti-Money Laundering, anti-corruption and sanctions screening requirements, or as requested by any judicial process, law enforcement or governmental agency having or claiming jurisdiction over Mastercard or Mastercard’s affiliates.
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal or regulatory obligation; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purposes of responding to a judicial process, law enforcement or governmental agency.
Comply with industry standards and our policies.
You consented to the use of your Personal Information; or
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal or regulatory obligation; or
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are party; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purposes of complying with industry standards and our policies.
Develop and improve products and services, detect, and prevent deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and improve customer and consumer experience. For these processing activities, we may use techniques such as artificial intelligence and machine learning to process and analyze data.
You consented to the use of your Personal Information; or
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation or other regulatory obligations; or
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are party; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purposes of complying with industry standards and our policies.
Enable mergers, acquisitions and/or sale of business or assets. For example, if we sell any business or assets or any part of our business or assets is acquired by a third-party, we may disclose your personal information relating to those business and assets to the prospective buyer or acquiring third-party.
The processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation or other regulatory obligations; or
The processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract to which you are party; or
We, or a third party, have a legitimate interest in using your Personal Information for the purposes of complying with industry standards and our policies.
For other purposes for which we provide specific notice at the time of collection.
Please consult the Specific Privacy Notice at the time of the collection.
Where required under applicable law, we have carried out balancing tests for the data processing based on our or a third party’s legitimate interests to ensure that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights or freedoms. For more information on our balancing tests, you may contact us as described in the “
How to Contact Us
” section below.
We will not subject you to a decision based solely on automated processing that produces legal effects concerning you or similarly significantly affects you, unless you explicitly consented to the processing where required under applicable law, the processing is necessary for entering into, or performance of a contract between you and Mastercard, or when we are legally required to use your Personal Information in this way, for example to prevent fraud.
If you provide us with any information or material relating to another individual, you must make sure that the sharing with us and our further use as described to you from time to time is in line with applicable laws, so for example you should duly inform that individual about the processing of her/his Personal Information and obtain her/his consent, as may be necessary under applicable laws.
Where the Personal Information we collect from you is needed to meet our legal or regulatory obligations or enter into an agreement with you, if you do not provide your Personal Information when requested, we may not be able to provide (or continue to provide) our products or services to you and you may not be able to purchase our products you require or fully use our services.
3. How We Share Your Personal Information
We May Share Personal Information with:
Mastercard’s headquarters in the U.S., our affiliates and other entities within Mastercard’s group of companies.
Service providers acting on our behalf.
Other participants in the payment ecosystem, including financial institutions, and merchants.
Other participants in the Open Banking ecosystem, including financial institutions, merchants and third parties.
Third parties for fraud monitoring and prevention purposes, or other purposes required by law.
Third parties whose feature(s) you use in connection with our products and services or with your consent.
Other entities as required under applicable law or in the event of a sale or transfer of our business or assets.
Please see the “
Data Transfers
” section below to understand how we comply with applicable cross-border data transfer rules.
We may also share your Personal Information:
With financial institutions and other entities that issue payment cards or merchants to process payment transactions and perform other activities that you request.
With entities that partner with Mastercard or assist Mastercard in providing its products and services, for fraud prevention and monitoring and third party identification services, to ensure the security of transactions and our payment processing system.
With other participants in the Open Banking ecosystem, including financial institutions, merchants and other entities of your choice (e.g., your investment advisors).
When we act as a service provider for third parties and provide them with Personal Information that we process on their behalf.
With our service providers who perform services on our behalf for the purposes described in this Global Privacy Notice (or in the applicable program specific privacy notice). We require these service providers by contract to only process Personal Information in accordance with our instructions and as necessary to perform services on our behalf or in compliance with applicable law. We also require them to safeguard the security and confidentiality of the Personal Information they process on our behalf by implementing appropriate technical and organizational security measures and confidentiality obligations binding employees accessing Personal Information.
With third parties whose features (e.g., third-party cookies, widgets, plug-ins) are integrated in our products and services. For further details, please consult Section 7 (
Features and Links to Other websites
) of this Global Privacy Notice.
With social media networks when you directly engage with those platforms. For further details, please consult Section 7 (
Features and Links to Other Websites
) of this Global Privacy Notice.
With other third parties with your consent.
As required under applicable law or legal process, or to respond to requests from law enforcement or governmental agencies. When receiving such requests, we will follow the process set out in our Binding Corporate Rules (see Section 5 below) where applicable.
When we believe disclosure is necessary to protect individuals’ vital interests, to enforce our
Terms of Use
, prevent Mastercard against harm or financial loss, or in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual fraudulent or illegal activity.
In the event we sell or transfer all or a portion of our business or assets. Should such a sale or transfer occur, we will use reasonable efforts to direct the transferee to use Personal Information you have provided to us in a manner that is consistent with our Global Privacy Notice. Following such a sale or transfer, you may contact the entity to which we transferred your Personal Information with any inquiries concerning the processing of that information.
Prior to the transfer or sharing of any Personal Information (including access to Personal  Information), we require appropriate privacy and information security protections in agreements with third parties. We operate a comprehensive Third Party Risk Management Program and we perform appropriate due diligence as part thereof
If you are located in mainland China, you may contact us as specified in the “
How to Contact Us
” section below to obtain information regarding the third-party recipients who act in the capacity of data controllers and with whom we share your Personal Information. Such sharing will always be conducted to the extent necessary and will not exceed or alter the purposes and means of processing that you have originally consented or based on a non-consent legal basis.
4. Your Rights and Choices
Depending on your country, you may have the right or choice to:
Opt out of some collection or uses of your Personal Information, including the use of cookies and similar technologies, the use of your Personal Information for marketing purposes, the preparation of transaction data for real-time services that your bank or another party may offer you, and the anonymization of your Personal Information for data analyses.
Access your Personal Information, obtain a copy of it, rectify it, restrict or object to its processing, or request its deletion, destruction or anonymization.
Receive the Personal Information you provided to us to transmit it to another company.
Withdraw any consent provided.
Where applicable, lodge a complaint with your relevant supervisory authority or regulator.
You, or a party authorized to act on your behalf, can exercise your rights on Mastercard’s “
My Data
” portal or by submitting a request as described in the “
How to Contact Us
” section below.
If you reside in the United States, you may have additional rights as described in our U.S. Privacy Addendum.
You may have certain rights regarding the Personal Information we maintain about you and certain choices about what Personal Information we collect from you, how we use it, and how we communicate with you.
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights, except where the different price or level of quality of good or service is reasonably related to the value of the data that we receive from you. In some instances, we may not be able to provide you with the good or service that you request if you choose to exercise certain rights.
You can choose:
Not to provide Personal Information to Mastercard by refraining from conducting payment transactions or from submitting Personal Information directly to us. When we collect Personal Information from you, we indicate whether and why it is necessary to provide it to us, as well as the consequences of failing to do so. If you do not provide Personal Information, you may not be able to benefit from the full range of Mastercard products and services, and we may not be able to provide you with the Mastercard products or services if that information is necessary to provide you with them, or if we are legally required to collect it in relation to the provision of such product or service.
To opt out of the collection and use of certain information, which we collect about you by automated means, when you visit our websites or use our apps. In certain jurisdictions, you can exercise your choice regarding the use of cookies and similar technologies by clicking on the ‘Manage cookies’ banner displayed in the bottom right corner of Mastercard websites. Your browser may tell you how to be notified of and opt out of having certain types of cookies placed on your device. Note that without certain cookies you may not be able to use all of the features of our websites, apps or online services.
To opt out of certain uses of information, which we collect about you by automated means, when you visit third-party websites and interact with our ads. We may use service providers to serve ads on those third-party websites. These ads may be customized and served based on the use of data we and our partners have collected on our websites and apps. In addition, some of our service providers and partners may collect information about your online activities over time and across third-party websites to customize and serve these ads. Mastercard ads are sometimes delivered with icons that help consumers (i) learn more about how their data is being used and (ii) exercise choices they may have regarding the use of their data. Please click where applicable, on the icon in our targeted ads to learn about your ability to opt out or limit the use of your browsing behavior for advertising purposes. You may also exercise your choice regarding the use of cookies and similar technologies by clicking on the ‘Manage cookies’ banner displayed in the bottom right corner of our websites.
To tell us not to send you marketing emails by clicking on the unsubscribe link within the marketing emails you receive from us or by contacting us as indicated below. You also may opt out of receiving marketing emails from Mastercard by
clicking here
.
To opt out of the anonymization of your Personal Information to perform data analyses by
clicking here
.
Depending on the country in which you are located, you may have the right to:
Request access to and receive information about the Personal Information we maintain about you, to update and correct inaccuracies in your Personal Information, to restrict or to object to the processing of your Personal Information, to have the information anonymized, destroyed or deleted, as appropriate, or to exercise your right to data portability to easily transfer your Personal Information to another company. In addition, you may also have the right to lodge a complaint with the relevant supervisory authority or regulator, including in your country of residence, place of work or where an incident took place.
Withdraw any consent you previously provided to us regarding the processing of your Personal Information, at any time and free of charge. We will apply your preferences going forward and this will not affect the lawfulness of the processing before your consent withdrawal.
If you reside in the United States, you may have additional rights as described in our U.S. Privacy Addendum.
For information on the number of privacy requests Mastercard processed pursuant to privacy laws globally, please review the “
My Data Report
” section of the “
My Data
” portal.
You may opt out from certain processing of your Personal Information, e.g., via our
opt-out webpage
.
Note that this list may not be exhaustive, which means that you may have additional rights in accordance with your local laws.  In addition, the above rights may be limited in some circumstances by local law requirements.
To update your preferences, ask us to remove your information from our mailing lists or submit a request to exercise your rights under applicable law, contact us as specified in the "
How To Contact Us
" section below.
We have developed Mastercard’s “
My Data
” portal to facilitate the exercise of your rights. You, or a party authorized to act on your behalf, can exercise your rights on Mastercard’s “
My Data
” portal or by submitting a request as described in the “
How To Contact Us
" section below.
If we fall short of your expectations in processing your Personal Information or you wish to make a complaint about our privacy practices, please tell us because it gives us an opportunity to fix the problem. To assist us in responding to your request, please give full details of the issue. We attempt to review and respond to all complaints within a reasonable time and as required under applicable law.
To learn more about the APEC Certification and access Dispute Resolution, please click on the TRUSTe seal.
5. Data Transfers
Mastercard is a global business. We may transfer your Personal Information to the United States and other countries which may not have the same data protection laws as the country in which you initially provided the information, but we will protect your Personal Information in accordance with this Global Privacy Notice, or as otherwise disclosed to you.
We comply with applicable legal requirements when transferring Personal Information to countries other than the country where you are located. If you are located in the EEA, the UK or Switzerland, we will transfer your Personal Information in accordance with adequacy decisions, Binding Corporate Rules, standard contractual clauses, and other data transfer mechanisms.
See list of countries for which the European Commission has issued an adequacy decision
here
;
See list of countries for which the UK government has issued an adequacy decision
here
;
See list of countries for which the Swiss Federal Council has issued an adequacy decision
here
Mastercard’s privacy practices, described in this Global Privacy Notice, comply with the APEC Cross Border Privacy Rules System. The APEC CBPR system provides a framework for organizations to ensure protection of Personal Information transferred among participating APEC economies. More information about the APEC framework can be found
here
.
Mastercard is a global business. We may transfer the Personal Information we collect about you to recipients in countries other than your country, including the United States, where we are headquartered. These countries may not have the same data protection laws as the country in which you initially provided the information. When we transfer your Personal Information to other countries, we will protect that information as described in this Global Privacy Notice, as disclosed to you at the time of data collection or as described in our program-specific privacy notice.
We comply with applicable legal requirements, including obtaining consent where required, when transferring Personal Information to countries other than the country where you are located. In particular, we have established and implemented Binding Corporate Rules (“
BCRs
”) that have been recognized by EEA data protection authorities as providing an adequate level of protection to the Personal Information we process globally. A copy of our EEA BCRs is available
here
. We equally rely on UK BCRs to transfer Personal Information outside of the United Kingdom. A copy of our UK BCRs is available
here
.
We may also transfer Personal Information to countries for which adequacy decisions have been issued (see list of countries for which the European Commission has issued an adequacy decision
here
; see list of countries which the Swiss Federal Council has determined to provide for adequate data protection legislation
here
), use contractual protections for the transfer of Personal Information to third parties, such as the European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses or their equivalent under applicable law, or rely on other data transfer mechanisms or requirements where applicable. Depending on your country, you may contact us as specified in the “
How to Contact Us
” section below to obtain a copy of the safeguards we use to transfer Personal Information outside of your jurisdiction.
Additionally, Mastercard’s privacy practices, described in this Global Privacy Notice, comply with the APEC Cross Border Privacy Rules System. The APEC CBPR system provides a framework for organizations to ensure protection of Personal Information transferred among participating APEC economies. More information about the APEC framework can be found
here
.
If you are located in mainland China, you understand that we may transfer the Personal Information we collect about you to recipients in countries or regions other than mainland China, including Mastercard International Incorporated in the United States, Mastercard Asia/Pacific Pte. Limited in Singapore and to other affiliates as listed
here
. When we conduct international transfers of Personal Information, we will always ensure to comply with requirements stipulated under applicable laws.
6. How We Protect Your Personal Information
We maintain appropriate security safeguards to protect your Personal Information and only retain it for a limited period of time.
The security of your Personal Information is important to Mastercard. We are committed to protecting the information we collect. We maintain reasonable administrative, technical and physical safeguards designed to protect the Personal Information you provide or we collect against accidental, unlawful or unauthorized destruction, loss, alteration, access, disclosure or use. We use SSL encryption on a number of our websites from which we transfer certain Personal Information.
In the event of a breach of our security safeguards, we will assess the extent of harm (if any) to individuals, and comply with reporting and notification obligations in accordance with the applicable law.
We also take measures to delete your Personal Information or keep it in a form that does not permit identifying you when this information is no longer necessary for the purposes for which we process it, unless we are required by law to keep this information for a longer period. When determining the retention period, we take into account various criteria, such as the type of products and services requested by or provided to you, the nature and length of our relationship with you, possible re-enrolment with our products or services, the impact on the services we provide to you if we delete some information from or about you, mandatory retention periods provided by law and the statute of limitations.
7. Features and Links to Other Websites
Our websites may include links to other third-party websites, social media tools, widgets or plug-ins, permitting sharing web content including IP address, with third parties and social media providers. These social media providers may learn of your visit even if you are not logged in to your social media account or if you do not have an account with them. To the extent any linked websites or features you visit or use are not owned or controlled by Mastercard, we suggest that you review their own privacy notices or policies.
Our websites may provide links to other websites for your convenience and information. Our website may also contain certain features for which we partner with other entities. These entities may learn of your visit regardless of whether you use these features. These websites and features, which may include social networking and geo-location tools, operate independently from Mastercard, and are clearly identified as such. To the extent any linked websites or features you visit or use are not owned or controlled by Mastercard, we suggest that you review the privacy practices of the websites.
Mastercard offers you the possibility to share, link to, or mention things on social media about Mastercard’s products and services. For example, you may “like” an offer via your Facebook account, or “tweet” an offer using Twitter. When you visit a website with a social media button, your browser establishes a direct connection to that social media provider, and data concerning your visit, including IP address, is transferred to the social media provider. If you have an account with the social media provider, the provider may link your visit to your account, even if you are not logged into this account.
You may also choose to use certain features on our websites that can be accessed through, or for which we partner with, other entities that are not otherwise affiliated with Mastercard. These features, including geo-location tools, are operated by third parties and are clearly identified as such. Social media providers such as Facebook and Twitter, and these other third parties, are independent from Mastercard and do not necessarily share the same policy as Mastercard regarding the protection of privacy. Please review their privacy notices if you decide to use their services and consult your social media account settings if you want to deactivate certain features.
8. Children’s Privacy
Mastercard products and services are not directed to, likely to be accessed by, or intended for, children under the age of 18 or the age of majority (to the extent it differs under applicable law), in accordance with applicable law.
Mastercard products and services are not directed to, likely to be accessed by, or intended for children. However, Mastercard may process Personal Information about children below 18 years of age or the age of majority (to the extent it differs under applicable law), with the parent or guardian’s consent, and with the child’s consent where required, or based on another legal basis in accordance with applicable law. If you learn that Mastercard is processing children’s Personal Information in violation of this Privacy Notice, then you may alert us at
privacyanddataprotection@mastercard.com
.
9. Updates to This Global Privacy Notice
This Global Privacy Notice may be updated periodically to reflect changes in our privacy practices.
This Global Privacy Notice may be updated periodically to reflect changes in our Personal Information practices. We will post a prominent notice on relevant websites to notify you of any significant or material changes to our Global Privacy Notice prior to them being effective and indicate at the top of the Notice when it was most recently updated. If we update our Global Privacy Notice, in certain circumstances, we may seek your consent.
10. How to Contact Us
You can e-mail our Global Privacy Office at
privacyanddataprotection@mastercard.com
. You may also submit a request to exercise your rights to your Personal Information on Mastercard’s “
My Data
” portal or by emailing us at:
privacyanddataprotection@mastercard.com
.
If you have any questions, comments or complaints about this Global Privacy Notice and our privacy practices, or would like to update your privacy preferences, please email us at:
privacyanddataprotection@mastercard.com
or write to us at:
Global Privacy Office
Mastercard International Incorporated
2000 Purchase Street
Purchase, New York 10577
USA
If you reside in a state in
the United States
which recognizes privacy rights under law, you may  exercise your rights under applicable privacy law by submitting your request on Mastercard’s “
My Data
” portal, email us at:
privacyanddataprotection@mastercard.com
, or call our toll-free number: 1-833-244-4084. For more information on exercising these rights, please see our U.S. Privacy Addendum.
If you are located in
Quebec, Canada,
you may contact our Data Protection Officer at
privacyanddataprotection@mastercard.com
. For inquiries about your Mastercard card and your purchase, you should contact your financial institution or merchant. More information about how to contact them can be found on their respective websites.
If you are located in the
EEA, the UK or Switzerland,
Mastercard Europe SA is the entity responsible for the processing of your Personal Information (or data controller). You may submit your request to exercise your rights to your Personal Information on Mastercard’s “
My Data
” portal, or email us at:
privacyanddataprotection@mastercard.com
, or write to us at:
Europe Data Protection Officer
Mastercard Europe SA
Chaussée de Tervuren 198A
B-1410 Waterloo
Belgium
If you are located in
Brazil,
Mastercard Brasil Soluções de Pagamento Ltda. is the entity responsible for the processing of your Personal Information. You may submit your request to exercise your rights to your Personal Information on Mastercard’s “
My Data
” portal, or email us at:
privacyanddataprotection@mastercard.com
or write to us at:
Brazil Data Protection Officer
Mastercard Brasil Soluções de Pagamento Ltda.
Avenida das Nações Unidas, 14.171, 20º andar, Crystal Tower
São Paulo/SP
Brasil
CEP 04794-000
If you are located in the
Caribbean and Latin America
, you may submit your request to exercise your rights to your Personal Information on Mastercard’s “
My Data
” portal. You may also contact our Data Protection Officer responsible for the Caribbean and Latin America regions at
privacyanddataprotection@mastercard.com
.
If you are located in
Asia Pacific (excluding mainland China), Middle East or Africa, Mastercard Asia Pacific Pte.
Ltd. is the entity responsible for the processing of your Personal Information. You may submit your request to exercise your rights to your Personal Information by emailing us at:
privacyanddataprotection@mastercard.com
, calling our toll-free number listed
here
or write to us at:
Asia Pacific, Middle East and Africa Data Protection Officer
Mastercard Asia/Pacific Pte Ltd
3 Fraser Street, DUO Tower, Level 17
Singapore 189352
If you are located in
South Africa
, you may also send your complaint to the South African Information Regulator at the following:
Email:
complaints.IR@justice.gov.za
Post: PO Box 31533, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2017
Website:
https://www.justice.gov.za/inforeg/
If you are located in
mainland China
, Mastercard Shanghai Business Consulting Ltd. is the entity responsible for the processing of your Personal Information. You may submit your request to exercise your rights to your Personal Information by emailing us at:
privacyanddataprotection@mastercard.com
or writing to us at:
China Data Protection Officer
Room 2907-14, Part of 29/F Tower 2
Shanghai IFC, 8 Century Avenue
China (Shanghai) Pilot Free Trade Zone
Manage Cookies
Sub-policy 8
https://www.paypal.com/de/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full:
Zurück zur Startseite
PayPal-Datenschutzerklärung
1. Übersicht
2. Die Aufgaben von PayPal als Datenverantwortlicher
3. Nutzer ohne Konto
4. Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie erheben
5. Welche personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden und auf welchen Rechtsgrundlagen dies beruht
6. Unter welchen Umständen geben wir personenbezogene Daten weiter
7. Wie lange Ihre personenbezogenen Daten von PayPal gespeichert werden
8. Internationale Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten
9. Wie wir Cookies und Tracking-Technologien verwenden
10. Ihre Datenschutzrechte
11. Nähere Informationen zu automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung und Profiling
12. Warum wir personenbezogene Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weitergeben
13. Wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten schützen
14. Können Kinder unsere Dienste nutzen?
15. Aktualisierungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
16. Hinweis zu Bankvorschriften für Nutzer im EWR und in Großbritannien
17. Begriffsbestimmungen
18. Unsere Kontaktdaten
Druckfähige PDF-Datei herunterladen
PayPal-Datenschutzerklärung
Letzte Aktualisierung 15. April 2024
Bitte kontaktieren Sie uns, wenn Sie Fragen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung oder allgemeine Fragen zu Ihren personenbezogenen Daten haben. Ihre Daten werden verwendet, damit wir die Dienste bereitstellen können. Dies erfolgt im Einklang mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung und den maßgeblichen
PayPal-Nutzungsbedingungen
.
1. Übersicht
Diese Datenschutzerklärung zielt darauf ab, Ihnen ausreichende Informationen über die Nutzung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu bieten, wenn Sie unsere Website besuchen und unsere Dienste nutzen (zusammenfassend die „
Dienste“)
. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, diese Datenschutzerklärung zu lesen und sie zu nutzen, um fundierte Entscheidungen zu treffen.
Die Erläuterung wichtiger Begriffe, die in der Datenschutzerklärung ansonsten nicht definiert werden, finden Sie in Abschnitt 17 (
Begriffsbestimmungen
) am Ende dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
2. Die Aufgaben von PayPal als Datenverantwortlicher
Innerhalb des Europäischen Wirtschaftsraums (EWR) ist
PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A.
Datenverantwortlicher für personenbezogene Daten, die beim Besuch unserer Website, während des Anmelde- und Antragsverfahrens sowie während Ihrer fortgesetzten Nutzung der Dienste erhoben und verarbeitet werden.
Bezugnahmen auf "wir", "unser", "uns", "
PayPal
" oder "
PayPal-Unternehmen
" in dieser Datenschutzerklärung bezeichnen PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A. sowie die Gruppe der Unternehmen, die jeweils die einzelnen Unternehmen direkt oder indirekt kontrolliert, von ihnen kontrolliert wird oder sich mit ihnen in gemeinsamem Besitz befindet.
Einige der Dritten, an die wir personenbezogene Daten weitergeben, sind unabhängige Datenverantwortliche. Das bedeutet, dass wir nicht diejenigen sind, die bestimmen, wie die von uns weitergegebenen Daten verarbeitet werden. Beispiele sind Behörden, Kreditauskunfteien, Erwerber und andere Finanzinstitute. Wenn Ihre Daten an unabhängige Datenverantwortliche weitergegeben werden, gelten deren Datenrichtlinien. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, ihre Datenschutzerklärungen zu lesen und Ihre Datenschutzrechte zu kennen, bevor Sie mit ihnen interagieren.
Weitere Informationen darüber, wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten bei der Übermittlung außerhalb des EWR, Großbritanniens und der Schweiz schützen, finden Sie in Abschnitt 8 (
Internationale Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten
)
3. Nutzer ohne Konto
Der Zugriff auf unsere Dienste ist auch für Personen ohne PayPal-Konto oder PayPal-Profil möglich. Auch wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, ohne Inhaber eines Kontos zu sein, erheben wir personenbezogene Daten von Ihnen. Dies kann beispielsweise der Fall sein bei der Nutzung der Funktion "Zahlung ohne PayPal-Konto", von markenlosen Zahlungsdiensten (wie z.B. Braintree) oder beim Empfang von Zahlungen von Kontoinhabern über unsere Dienste. Der Begriff "Nutzer" bezieht sich daher gleichermaßen auf Personen mit und ohne Konto. Haben Sie kein Konto, erfolgt die Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zur Bereitstellung der Dienste und nach Maßgabe dieser Datenschutzerklärung und den jeweiligen
PayPal-Nutzungsbedingungen
.
4. Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie erheben
Wir erheben die folgenden Datenkategorien über Sie, um unsere Dienste bereitzustellen, Ihre Benutzererfahrung kontinuierlich zu verbessern und unser Geschäft zu betreiben und weiterzuentwickeln. Die Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie erheben, werden nachstehend erläutert.
Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die
von Ihnen
erhoben werden, einschließlich durch Ihre Interaktionen mit uns und Ihre Nutzung der Dienste:
Anmelde- und Kontaktdaten
. Je nach den von Ihnen gewählten Diensten erheben wir Ihren Namen, Ihre Postanschrift, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihr Einkommen, Ihre Telefonnummer, Ihre Steuernummer, Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, Informationen über Ihren Beruf, Ihr Beschäftigungsverhältnis oder Ihr Geschäft sowie sonstige Informationen, die zur Einrichtung eines Kontos erforderlich sind.
Identifizierungs- und Unterschriftsdaten
. Je nach den von Ihnen gewählten Diensten erheben wir Daten, um Ihren Namen, Ihre Adresse, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihre Telefonnummer, Ihren amtlichen Ausweis, Ihr Alter und Ihre biometrischen Daten zu überprüfen sowie um Ihre elektronische Unterschrift zu erstellen und auszustellen.
Zahlungsinformationen
. Informationen, wie etwa der von Ihnen gesendete oder angeforderte Betrag, Ihr Zahlungsinstrument, Ihre in Verbindung mit den Diensten verwendete Karte oder Zahlungsquelle, einschließlich der Bezeichnung des Ausstellers, des Kartentyps, des Ländercodes, der Kontonummer des Zahlungskontos, des CVV, des Benutzernamens sowie IBAN-Informationen.
Informationen zu Ihren importierten Kontakten
. Wenn Sie sich entscheiden, Ihre Kontaktlisten zu importieren, erfassen wir Informationen, die Sie über Ihre Kontakte eingeben oder importieren, wie Name, Adresse, Telefonnummer, Bilder, E-Mail-Adresse oder Benutzernamen, die mit den importierten oder manuell eingegebenen Kontakten verknüpft sind.
Daten in Ihrem Kontoprofil.
Informationen, die Sie freiwillig eingeben, wie etwa Ihren Benutzernamen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihre Mobiltelefonnummer, Ihr Profilbild, Ihre bevorzugte Sprache oder die Beschreibung Ihrer Person, die sensible personenbezogene Daten enthalten kann, welche Aufschluss über religiöse Überzeugungen, politische oder philosophische Ansichten, Behinderungen, sexuelle Orientierung sowie biometrische Daten geben. Sie können Ihr Profil jederzeit als "privat" kennzeichnen.
Informationen, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie uns kontaktieren
. Informationen, die Sie offenlegen, wenn Sie an Umfragen teilnehmen oder unsere Kundendienstteams kontaktieren, wie z. B. von Ihnen genutzte Dienste, aufgezeichnete Gespräche, Chat-Gespräche mit uns, E-Mail-Korrespondenz mit uns, Kontostatus, Rückzahlungsverlauf, Spracherkennung. Dies kann Informationen über andere beinhalten, wenn Sie diese mit uns teilen.
Gerätedaten.
Dies sind Daten, die automatisch von einem beliebigen Gerät erhoben werden können, das für den Zugriff auf die Seite oder die Dienste genutzt wird. Zu diesen Daten gehören unter anderem der Typ, die Netzwerkverbindungen, der Name, die IP-Adresse und Informationen zum Webbrowser Ihres Geräts sowie Informationen zur Internetverbindung, mit denen Sie auf die Seiten oder Dienste zugreifen, Geolokalisierungsdaten, Informationen zu Apps, die auf Ihr Gerät heruntergeladen wurden, sowie biometrische Daten.
Abgeleitete Daten.
Wenn Sie die Dienste nutzen, können wir aus Ihren Transaktionen und personenbezogenen Daten gegebenenfalls weitere Daten ableiten. Dies erfolgt unter anderem, um Ihr Konto zu schützen und Sie bei der Nutzung der Dienste vor Betrug zu bewahren. Zu den abgeleiteten Daten können beispielsweise Verhaltensmuster und persönliche Vorlieben, Browsing- und Kaufgewohnheiten sowie Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit gehören.
Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die
von Dritten
erhoben werden, einschließlich von Identitätsprüfern, Datenbrokern, Anbietern, die uns bei der Betrugserkennung helfen, Ihrer Bank, Händlern oder Drittanbieterplattformen, über die Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Daten aus den von Ihnen verknüpften Drittkonten
. Wenn Sie ein Finanzkonto oder ein Konto ohne Finanzbezug verknüpfen, wie z.B. Ihr persönliches E-Mail-Konto, Ihre Konten in sozialen Medien oder Ihre Bank- oder Kreditkonten, erheben wir Informationen, die mit dem angegebenen Zweck in Verbindung stehen, zu dem die Verknüpfung erfolgt ist. Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise für die Teilnahme an
Open Banking
entscheiden, erheben wir von Ihren verknüpften Konten die Kontoanmeldedaten, Kontostände, Kontotransaktionen und Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. Sie können Ihre Entscheidung zur Nutzung dieser Funktion jederzeit ändern und die Verknüpfung mit den betreffenden Konten aufheben.
Informationen von Auskunfteien
. Soweit gesetzlich zulässig, erfassen wir im Rahmen Ihrer Nutzung unserer Dienste kreditbezogene Informationen wie ausstehende und historische Schulden, Rückzahlungshistorie, frühere Kreditgenehmigungen, aktuelle Arbeitsverhältnisse und Beziehungen zu anderen Finanzinstituten.
Transaktionsdaten
. Informationen zu Ihren Bestelldetails und Einkäufen, wie z.B. Artikelbeschreibung, Menge, Preis, Währung, Lieferadresse, Online-Warenkorbinformationen, Verkäufer- und Käuferinformationen und Zahlungsinformationen. Dazu gehören Informationen aus Ihren Transaktionen, bei denen Sie unsere Dienste ohne ein PayPal-Konto nutzen (z. B. Zahlen ohne PayPal-Konto).
Informationen zu den gesetzlichen Vorschriften
. In Übereinstimmung mit geltendem Recht (u.a. Gesetz zur Geldwäscheprävention) können dies Informationen aus externen Sanktionslisten wie Name, Geburtsdatum, Geburtsort, Beruf und der Grund, warum die betreffende Person auf der betreffenden Liste steht, umfassen.
Anwendungen von Drittanbietern
. Informationen von anderen aus Ihrer Nutzung von Anwendungen von Drittanbietern, wie dem Apple App Store oder Google Play Store, sozialen Netzwerken, wie Name, Ihre soziale Netzwerk-ID, Standortinformationen, E-Mail, Geräte-ID, Browser-ID und Profilbild. Ihre Nutzung von Anwendungen Dritter unterliegt der Datenschutzerklärung und den Nutzungsbedingungen für solche Anwendungen.
Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die durch Cookies und ähnliche Tracking-Technologien sowie von Ihren Geräten automatisch über Sie erhoben werden, einschließlich durch Ihren Zugriff auf unsere Website oder PayPal-App:
Technische Nutzungsdaten
. Informationen über die Antwortzeit für Webseiten, Download-Fehler und Datum und Uhrzeit Ihrer Nutzung des Dienstes, wie z. B. Ihre IP-Adresse, Statistiken darüber, wie Seiten geladen oder angezeigt werden, die Websites, die Sie besucht haben, bevor Sie auf die Websites gelangten, und andere Nutzungs- und Browsing-Informationen, die durch Cookies erhoben werden ("
Technische Nutzungsdaten
").
Informationen von Ihrem Gerät
. Informationen über Ihre Spracheinstellungen, IP-Adresse, Browser-ID, Geräte-ID, Cookie-Einstellungen, Zeitzone, Betriebssystem, Plattform, Bildschirmauflösung und ähnliche Informationen über Ihre Geräteeinstellungen sowie Daten, die von Cookies oder anderen Tracking-Technologien erfasst werden,
Standortinformationen
. Informationen aus IP-basierter Geolokalisierung wie Breiten- und Längengraddaten und Global Positioning System (GPS)-Informationen, wenn Sie uns über Ihre Geräteeinstellungen die Erlaubnis erteilen.
Abgeleitete Daten
. Rückschlüsse, die gezogen werden, um ein Profil über Sie zu erstellen, das Verhaltensmuster und persönliche Vorlieben wie Geschlecht, Einkommen, Surf- und Kaufgewohnheiten und Kreditwürdigkeit widerspiegeln kann.
5. Welche personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden und auf welchen Rechtsgrundlagen dies beruht
Die
Verarbeitung
Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten kann aus einer Vielzahl von Gründen erfolgen, die nach dem maßgeblichen Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union (EU), Großbritanniens und der Schweiz und unter Beachtung der nachstehenden Rechtsgrundlagen zulässig sind:
Wir erheben die folgenden personenbezogenen Daten, die wir für
erforderlich halten, um unsere vorvertraglichen und vertraglichen Verpflichtungen
Ihnen gegenüber zu erfüllen, und ohne die Sie die Dienste nicht nutzen können.
Zu diesen erforderlichen Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten gehören:
Informationen zu Ihrer Registrierung und Kontaktinformationen
Identifizierungs- und Unterschriftsdaten
Zahlungsinformationen
Informationen zu den gesetzlichen Vorschriften
Informationen, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie uns kontaktieren
Transaktionsdaten
Tracking von Paketen
Dienstspezifische personenbezogene Daten
Informationen von Auskunfteien und Finanzinstituten
Informationen aus Ihren verbundenen Finanzkonten
Daten aus Ihrer Nutzung der Dienste
Technische Nutzungsdaten
Gerätedaten
Standortdaten
Zu diesen Aktivitäten gehört
:
die Erbringung unserer Dienstleistungen, die Erfüllung unserer gegenüber Ihnen bestehenden vertraglichen Verpflichtungen und die sonstige Betreuung unserer Geschäftsbeziehung zu Ihnen;
Ihre Zahlung für Produkte und die Kundenbeziehung zu verwalten.
Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Bewerbung zu beurteilen, Ihre Identität und Ihre Kontaktdaten zu bestätigen und Sie und andere vor Betrug zu schützen.
die Bestätigung Ihrer Identität, auch durch Verwendung von elektronischen Signaturen, und die Verifizierung Ihrer persönlichen Angaben und Kontaktdaten;
nachzuweisen, dass Transaktionen ausgeführt wurden.
die Begründung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung eines Rechtsanspruchs oder von Inkassoverfahren.
die Einhaltung interner Verfahren.
zu beurteilen, welche Zahlungsmöglichkeiten und Dienstleistungen wir Ihnen anbieten, beispielsweise durch die Durchführung interner und externer Bonitätsprüfungen.
Kundenanalyse, Verwaltung unserer Dienste und interne Vorgänge, z.B. Fehlerbehebung, Datenanalyse, Tests, Forschung und statistische Zwecke.
mit Ihnen in Bezug auf unsere Dienste zu kommunizieren.
geltende Gesetze der EU und der Mitgliedstaaten einzuhalten, wie z.B. Gesetze zur Geldwäscheprävention und Buchungsaufbewahrung sowie Vorschriften, die von unseren benannten Banken und relevanten Kartennetzwerken herausgegeben werden.
Wir haben ein berechtigtes Interesse daran, sicherzustellen, dass PayPal ein sicherer Finanzdienstleister bleibt und weiterhin Dienstleistungen anbietet, die innovativ und von Interesse für Sie sind. Wir tun dies,
sofern unsere berechtigten Interessen nicht durch Ihr Recht auf Nichtverarbeitung Ihrer Daten zu diesem Zweck überwiegen
.
Zu diesen Aktivitäten gehört:
sicherzustellen, dass Inhalte auf die für Sie und Ihr Gerät effektivste Weise dargestellt werden.
den Missbrauch unserer Dienste im Rahmen unserer Bemühungen, unsere Plattform sicher und geschützt zu halten, zu verhindern.
die Ermittlung Ihrer Berechtigung zur Inanspruchnahme von Diensten, die für Sie von Interesse sein könnten, z.B. durch Vornahme interner Bonitätsprüfungen, und die damit verbundene Kommunikation mit Ihnen;
Risikoanalysen, Betrugsprävention und Risikomanagement durchzuführen.
die Weiterentwicklung unserer Dienste sowie allgemeine Geschäftsentwicklungszwecke, wie z.B. die Optimierung von Risikomodellen zur Betrugsreduzierung, die Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen und die Erschließung neuer Geschäftsmöglichkeiten;
die fortlaufende Aktualisierung Ihrer Konto- und Finanzdaten;
Marketing-, Produkt- und Kundenanalysen, einschließlich Tests, dazu gehören beispielsweise die Verbesserung unserer Produktpalette und die Optimierung unseres Kundenangebots.
Einhaltung des geltenden Rechts, wie z.B. der Gesetze zu Geldwäscheprävention und Buchführungspflichten sowie der aufsichtsrechtlichen Vorschriften über die Eigenkapitalanforderungen und der von unseren zuständigen Banken und relevanten Kartennetzwerken erlassenen Regeln. Zum Beispiel, wenn wir personenbezogene Daten zur Einhaltung der Know-Your-Customer-Voraussetzungen ("KYC") verarbeiten, um Geldwäsche, Terrorismusfinanzierung und Betrug zu vermeiden, zu erkennen und zu untersuchen. Wir führen auch Sanktionsprüfungen durch, melden Steuerbehörden, Polizeivollzugsbehörden, Vollstreckungsbehörden und Aufsichtsbehörden, wenn wir nicht durch EU-Recht und das Recht der Mitgliedstaaten dazu verpflichtet sind, aber wir nach Treu und Glauben davon ausgehen, dass die Weitergabe der Informationen erforderlich ist, um die geltenden Vorschriften einzuhalten.
die Ermöglichung Ihrer Teilnahme an Wettbewerben, Angeboten und Veranstaltungen;
Durchführung von Verpflichtungen zum Risikomanagement wie Kreditleistung und Qualität, Versicherungsrisiken und Erfüllung der Eigenkapitalanforderungen nach geltendem Recht.
die Verarbeitung von Daten über Ihre Kontakte, um Ihnen das Auffinden dieser Kontakte zu erleichtern und sich mit ihnen in Verbindung zu setzen, sowie die Verbesserung der Zahlungssicherheit;
indem Sie uns Daten über Ihre Kontakte übermitteln, erklären Sie, dass Sie befugt sind, diese Daten für die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Zwecke an PayPal weiterzugeben;
Ihnen Informationen, Nachrichten und Werbung über unsere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen, einschließlich wo wir uns mit anderen zusammengetan haben, um ähnliche Dienstleistungen anzubieten.
Informationen über Sie zu assoziieren, um Ihre Nutzung der Dienste ohne PayPal-Konto zu identifizieren (z. B. Zahlung ohne PayPal-Konto) oder Markenlose Dienste (z.B. Braintree) und um solche Transaktionen mit Ihrem Konto zu verknüpfen, wenn Sie ein Konto haben oder später ein Konto einrichten.
die Speicherung Ihrer Präferenzen für die nächste Nutzung der Dienste, z.B. Ihre bevorzugte Zahlungsmethode oder ob Sie beim Bezahlen digitale Quittungen per E-Mail oder SMS erhalten möchten;
Wir sind nach dem EU- und dem Mitgliedstaaten-Recht gesetzlich dazu verpflichtet, bestimmte Verarbeitungstätigkeiten durchzuführen.
Wir tun dies, wenn dies erforderlich ist, um geltende Gesetze einzuhalten
.
Zu diesen Aktivitäten gehört:
die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste und Produkte;
die Bestätigung Ihrer Identität, auch zu Unterschriftszwecken, und die Überprüfung Ihrer persönlichen Angaben und Kontaktdaten;
die Begründung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung eines Rechtsanspruchs oder von Inkassoverfahren.
den Missbrauch unserer Dienste im Rahmen unserer Bemühungen, unsere Plattform sicher und geschützt zu halten, zu verhindern.
Risikoanalysen, Betrugsprävention und Risikomanagement durchzuführen.
geltendes Recht einzuhalten, wie z.B. die Gesetze zu Geldwäscheprävention und Buchführungspflichten sowie die aufsichtsrechtlichen Vorschriften über die Eigenkapitalanforderungen und die von unseren zuständigen Banken und relevanten Kartennetzwerken erlassenen Regeln. Zum Beispiel, wenn wir personenbezogene Daten zur Einhaltung der Know-Your-Customer-Voraussetzungen ("KYC") verarbeiten, um Geldwäsche, Terrorismusfinanzierung und Betrug zu vermeiden, zu erkennen und zu untersuchen. Ebenso führen wir Sanktionsprüfungen durch und machen Meldungen an Steuerbehörden, Polizeibehörden, Strafverfolgungsbehörden und Aufsichtsbehörden.
Wir stützen uns bei der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf Ihre ausdrückliche und freiwillige Einwilligung,
damit Sie in den Genuss bestimmter Funktionen kommen können, die zwar für die Nutzung der Dienste nicht notwendig, für Sie jedoch möglicherweise von Interesse sind, wie z.B. die Synchronisierung Ihrer Kontaktliste mit Ihrem Konto, die Bereitstellung von biometrischen Daten, gezielte Werbung, die Verknüpfung Ihres E-Mail-Kontos für das Tracking von Paketen oder die Verbindung mit einer Plattform Dritter. Sie können Ihre Entscheidung über die Nutzung dieser Funktionen jederzeit in Ihren Kontoeinstellungen ändern. Bitte beachten Sie, dass der Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung die Rechtmäßigkeit einer von uns vor dem Widerruf durchgeführten Verarbeitung nicht berührt. Weitere Informationen über Ihr Recht auf Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung finden Sie in Abschnitt 10 (“
Ihre Datenschutzrechte
”).
6. Unter welchen Umständen geben wir personenbezogene Daten weiter
Wir geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an Dritte weiter, wenn eine Rechtsgrundlage dafür besteht.
Dies umfasst:
Andere PayPal-Unternehmen
, um Ihnen die Dienste bereitzustellen, sowie in unserem berechtigten Interesse an der Ausübung unserer Geschäftstätigkeit. Diese Interessen werden in Abschnitt 5 (
Welche personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden und auf welchen Rechtsgrundlagen dies beruht
)
näher erläutert. Das PayPal-Unternehmen, das Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erhält, verarbeitet diese in Einklang mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Behörden
, soweit wir rechtlich dazu verpflichtet sind. Dazu zählen Steuerbehörden, Polizeibehörden, Strafverfolgungsbehörden und Aufsichtsbehörden in den jeweils maßgeblichen Ländern. Wir können auch verpflichtet sein, zuständigen Behörden, wie beispielsweise den Finanzbehörden, Informationen über Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen. Dies kann Ihren Namen, Ihre Adresse und Informationen zu Kartentransaktionen umfassen, die wir in Ihrem Auftrag über unsere Dienste abwickeln. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Einhaltung von Offenlegungspflichten, die sich aus dem Recht der EU und der Mitgliedstaaten ergeben, ist die bestehende rechtliche Verpflichtung. Soweit die Offenlegung nicht auf dem Recht der EU und der Mitgliedstaaten beruht, ist die Rechtsgrundlage unser berechtigtes Interesse und die Einhaltung geltender Vorschriften zur Verhinderung widerrechtlichen Verhaltens.
Andere Finanzinstitute und Kartennetzwerke
, um die Zahlungsabwicklung zu erleichtern, gemeinsam ein Produkt anzubieten oder Karten Ihrer E-Börse hinzuzufügen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Offenlegung ist die Erfüllung des zwischen Ihnen und uns bestehenden Vertrags. Die betreffenden Parteien können auch für andere berechtigte Zwecke auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zugreifen, wie etwa Identitätsprüfung, Betrugsprävention und Risikomanagement. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist das berechtigte Interesse von uns und unseren Partnern, betrügerisches und rechtswidriges Verhalten zu verhindern.
Betrugsbekämpfungs- und Identitätsprüfungsbehörden
, zum Beispiel, um uns bei der Erkennung von Aktivitäten zu unterstützen, die auf Betrug hindeuten. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist das berechtigte Interesse von uns und unseren Partnern, betrügerisches und rechtswidriges Verhalten zu verhindern.
Inkassobüros
, beispielsweise um unbezahlte überfällige Forderungen durch Dritte wie ein Inkassobüro einzuziehen. Wir tun dies auf der Grundlage unseres berechtigten Interesses, Geschäfte zu tätigen und Schulden einzutreiben. Bitte beachten Sie, dass die Datenschutzerklärung dieser Parteien für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten gilt, die Sie ihnen direkt mitteilen, und dass sie Ihre unbezahlten Schulden Kreditauskunfteien melden können, was Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit oder Ihre Fähigkeit zur Sicherung zukünftiger Kredite beeinträchtigen kann.
Dienstanbieter
, die in unserem Auftrag und nach unseren Weisungen Dienstleistungen erbringen, die wir an sie ausgelagert haben, wie z.B. Marketing, IT-Entwicklung, Wartung, Hosting und Support sowie Kundenserviceleistungen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist die Erfüllung unserer gegenüber Ihnen bestehenden Vertragspflichten.
Andere Nutzer, soweit dies ausweislich Ihrer Kontoeinstellungen zulässig ist
. Über Ihre Kontoeinstellungen können Sie anderen Nutzern bestimmte Informationen wie Ihr Profilfoto, Ihren Vor- und Nachnamen, Ihren Benutzernamen oder Ihren Wohnort anzeigen oder zugänglich machen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist Ihre Einwilligung. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie Ihre Profileinstellungen jederzeit und kostenfrei ändern können.
Finanzinstitute in Verbindung mit Ihrer Teilnahme an Open Banking
, z.B. wenn Sie eine Kontoverbindung mit einer anderen Bank, einem Kartenkonto oder einem Aggregator einleiten. Wir prüfen daher, ob Sie über genügend Geld verfügen, oder bestätigen, dass Sie der Inhaber des Kontos sind. Wenn Sie Ihr Konto verknüpfen, ist die Rechtsgrundlage für den Zugriff auf Ihre Kontodaten die Erfüllung unserer vertraglichen Verpflichtungen gegenüber Ihnen.
Partner und Händler, deren Dienstanbieter und sonstige Transaktionsbeteiligte
. Wenn Sie beispielsweise die Dienste nutzen, um Online-Einkäufe zu tätigen, Zahlungen an andere Nutzer vorzunehmen oder Waren zurückzugeben, können wir Informationen über Sie und Ihr Konto an die anderen Parteien weitergeben, die an der Abwicklung Ihrer Transaktionen beteiligt sind. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist die Erfüllung unserer gegenüber Ihnen bestehenden Vertragspflichten sowie unser berechtigtes Interesse. Bitte beachten Sie, dass für personenbezogene Daten, die an Partner und Händler (oder deren Dienstanbieter) weitergegeben werden, welche an einer Transaktion beteiligt sind, die eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen und Verfahren der Partner und Händler gelten.
Externe, unabhängige Datenverantwortliche
, wenn wir beispielsweise personenbezogene Daten an Kreditauskunfteien, Erwerber und andere Finanzinstitute weitergeben oder an Sicherheitsprodukte, um zu verhindern, dass Bots auf unsere Dienste zugreifen können.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass für die Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten, die Sie direkt an diese Parteien weitergeben, deren Datenschutzerklärungen gelten
. So verwenden wir beispielsweise reCAPTCHA von Google, um Missbrauch unserer Dienste zu verhindern, wenn Sie auf unsere PayPal-App zugreifen. Die
Datenschutzerklärung
und die
Nutzungsbedingungen
von Google gelten für die Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten, die Sie an Google weitergeben. Weitere Informationen zu Kreditauskunfteien, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, um Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit zu bewerten, finden Sie in Abschnitt 12 (
Warum wir personenbezogene Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weitergeben
).
Käufer oder sonstige Weitergabe in Verbindung mit einer Geschäftsübertragung
. Wenn wir beispielsweise ein Geschäft oder Vermögenswerte veräußern, können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an einen Käufer dieses Geschäfts oder dieser Vermögenswerte weitergeben. Ebenso können personenbezogene Daten weitergegeben werden, wenn PayPal oder ein wesentlicher Teil des PayPal-Vermögens von einer dritten Partei erworben wird. PayPal hat ein berechtigtes Interesse daran, derartige Transaktionen durchführen zu können.
7. Wie lange Ihre personenbezogenen Daten von PayPal gespeichert werden
Wir speichern personenbezogene Daten so lange, wie es im Rahmen des Zwecks, für den sie erhoben wurden, und in Übereinstimmung mit dem geltenden Recht benötigt oder zulässig ist.
Die Kriterien für die Bestimmung der Aufbewahrungsfrist lauten:
Personenbezogene Daten, die für die laufende Beziehung zwischen Ihnen und PayPal genutzt werden, werden für die Dauer der Beziehung zuzüglich eines Zeitraums von zehn Jahren gespeichert
Personenbezogene Daten in Bezug auf eine rechtliche Verpflichtung, der wir unterliegen, werden im Einklang mit geltendem Recht aufbewahrt, wie z.B. gemäß geltendem Insolvenzrecht und AML-Verpflichtungen.
Wir speichern personenbezogene Daten so lange wie nötig, wenn die Aufbewahrung angesichts von Rechtsstreitigkeiten, Ermittlungen, Audit- und Compliance-Praktiken oder zum Schutz vor Rechtsansprüchen ratsam ist.
8. Internationale Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten
Da wir in zahlreichen Ländern tätig sind, kann es vorkommen, dass wir (oder unsere Dienstanbieter) Ihre Daten außerhalb des Landes, in dem Sie leben, übermitteln und verarbeiten. Um Ihre Daten in den Vereinigten Staaten und anderen Ländern zu verarbeiten und zu speichern, setzen wir externe Dienstanbieter ein. In den betreffenden Ländern ist nicht immer ein gleichwertiger Datenschutz gegeben. Wir haben daher konkrete Maßnahmen in Übereinstimmung mit dem Datenschutzrecht der EU und Großbritanniens getroffen, um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu schützen. Bei der Übermittlung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zwischen PayPal-Unternehmen stützen wir uns auf von den zuständigen Aufsichtsbehörden genehmigte bindende Unternehmensregeln (abrufbar
hier
). Andere Übermittlungen erfolgen auf der Grundlage von Standardvertragsklauseln, die von der Europäischen Kommission genehmigt wurden, damit gewährleistet ist, dass Ihre Daten einen hohen Schutzstandard genießen und Ihre Datenschutzrechte gewahrt bleiben.
9. Wie wir Cookies und Tracking-Technologien verwenden
Wenn Sie mit unseren Diensten interagieren, E-Mails öffnen, die wir Ihnen senden, oder eine Website eines Drittanbieters besuchen, für die wir Dienste bereitstellen, verwenden wir und unsere Partner Cookies und andere Tracking-Technologien wie Pixel-Tags, Web-Beacons und Widgets (zusammen „
Cookies
“), um Sie als Benutzer zu erkennen, Ihre Online-Erfahrungen und Online-Inhalte anzupassen, einschließlich um Ihnen interessenbezogene Werbung bereitzustellen, Analysen durchzuführen, Risiken zu mindern und potenziellen Betrug zu verhindern und Vertrauen und Sicherheit auf unseren Websites und Diensten zu fördern. Bestimmte Aspekte und Funktionen unserer Dienste und Websites sind nur durch die Verwendung von Cookies verfügbar. Wenn Sie also bestimmte Cookies ablehnen, kann Ihre Nutzung der Websites und Dienste eingeschränkt oder nicht möglich sein.
Wir verwenden Cookies, um Ihre Geräteinformationen, Informationen zu Internetaktivitäten und Rückschlüsse wie oben beschrieben zu sammeln.
Cookies helfen uns, Folgendes zu tun:
Ihre Daten zu speichern, damit Sie sie nicht erneut eingeben müssen
Zu verfolgen und verstehen, wie Sie unsere Online-Dienste und E-Mails nutzen und mit ihnen interagieren
Unsere Online-Dienste an Ihre Einstellungen anzupassen
Zu messen, wie nützlich und effektiv unsere Dienste und Kommunikation für Sie sind
Unsere Produkte und Dienste zu verwalten und zu verbessern
Do Not Track (DNT) ist eine optionale Browser-Einstellung, mit der Sie Ihre Präferenzen bezüglich der Nachverfolgung Ihrer Handlungen im Internet durch Werbetreibende und andere Dritte festlegen können. Derzeit sind unsere Websites nicht darauf ausgelegt, auf DNT-Signale oder ähnliche Mechanismen von Browsern zu reagieren.
Näheres zu unserer Verwendung von Cookies erfahren Sie in unserer
Erklärung zu Cookies und Tracking-Technologien
.
10. Ihre Datenschutzrechte
Nach geltendem Datenschutzrecht haben Sie bestimmte Rechte, unsere Erfassung und Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu kontrollieren. Zu Ihren Rechten gehören:
Zugriff, Berichtigung, Löschung, Widerspruch, Übertragbarkeit und Einschränkung Ihrer Informationen
Wir erkennen an, wie wichtig es ist, dass Sie die Kontrolle über die Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten haben. Daher bieten wir Ihnen verschiedene Möglichkeiten, Ihre Rechte auf Zugriff, Auskunft, Berichtigung (durch Korrektur oder Aktualisierung), Löschung, Widerspruch, Übertragbarkeit und Einschränkung der Verarbeitung ganz oder teilweise auszuüben.
Wenn Sie ein Konto haben, können Sie Ihre Datenschutzrechte ausüben, indem Sie in den Kontoeinstellungen der PayPal-App auf "Daten und Datenschutz" zugreifen. Auch ohne Konto (z.B. wenn Sie die Funktion "Zahlung ohne PayPal-Konto" nutzen) können Sie in Bezug auf Daten zu Transaktionen, die mit der Funktion "Zahlung ohne PayPal-Konto" durchgeführt wurden, Auskunft, Änderung, Berichtigung oder Löschung verlangen. Ersuchen zu den Daten einer anderen Person können Sie einreichen, indem Sie sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, sofern Sie ordnungsgemäß bevollmächtigt sind. Bitte beachten Sie, dass wir von Ihnen gegebenenfalls zusätzliche Verifizierungsinformationen anfordern.
Ihr Recht, den automatisierten Entscheidungen und der Profilerstellung zu widersprechen
Falls Sie im Rahmen der unten beschriebenen automatisierten Entscheidungen nicht zugelassen sind, haben Sie keinen Zugang zu unseren Dienstleistungen, wie beispielsweise unseren Zahlungsmethoden. PayPal verfügt über verschiedene Sicherheitsmechanismen, um die Angemessenheit der Entscheidungen zu gewährleisten. Zu diesen Mechanismen gehören laufende Überprüfungen unserer Entscheidungsmodelle und fallweise Stichproben. Wenn Sie bezüglich des Ergebnisses Bedenken haben, können Sie uns
kontaktieren
. Wir werden dann überprüfen, ob das Verfahren korrekt durchgeführt wurde.
Sie haben das Recht, einer automatisierten Entscheidung zu widersprechen, wenn deren Rechtsfolgen oder Ergebnisse geeignet sind, (zusammen mit dem entsprechenden Profiling) in sonstiger Weise erhebliche Auswirkungen auf Sie zu haben, indem Sie uns
kontaktieren
. Wir prüfen die Entscheidung sodann unter Berücksichtigung der zusätzlichen Umstände.
Zustimmung
Wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit Ihrer Zustimmung verwenden, haben Sie im Allgemeinen das Recht, Ihre Zustimmung jederzeit zu widerrufen, ohne die Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung aufgrund der Zustimmung vor ihrem Widerruf zu beeinträchtigen.
Die Rechtmäßigkeit einer Verarbeitung, die vor Ihrem Widerruf stattgefunden hat, wird durch den Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung nicht berührt. Das gleiche gilt für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf der Grundlage eines anderen Rechtsgrundes als Ihrer Einwilligung.
Widerspruchsrecht gegen Direktmarketing
Sofern wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für Direktmarketingzwecke verwenden, können Sie jederzeit Ihre Berechtigungseinstellungen ändern, widersprechen und sich über den Abmeldelink in elektronischen Mitteilungen bzw. über Ihre Kontoeinstellungen von zukünftigen Direktmarketingnachrichten abmelden.
Widerspruchsrecht gegen die Verarbeitung berechtigter Interessen
Verwenden wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zur Verfolgung berechtigter Interessen von uns oder einem Dritten, haben Sie das Recht, der Verwendung für diesen Zweck zu widersprechen. Näheres dazu finden Sie in Abschnitt 5 (
Welche personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden und auf welchen Rechtsgrundlagen dies beruht
)
Wie nehmen Sie Ihre Rechte wahr, und wie können Sie uns oder die Datenschutzbehörde kontaktieren?
Wenn Sie aus irgendeinem Grund mit unserer Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten unzufrieden sind, haben Sie das Recht, eine Beschwerde bei der Aufsichtsbehörde für den Datenschutz in Ihrem Land einzureichen.
Unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten erreichen Sie online oder per Post unter PayPal (Europe) S.à.r.l. et Cie, S.C.A, 22-24 Boulevard Royal L-2449, Luxemburg.
Wenn Sie glauben, dass Ihre Rechte verletzt wurden, können Sie auch bei
den örtlichen Gerichten
Rechtsmittel einlegen.
Sie können auch bei der für uns zuständigen
führenden Aufsichtsbehörde für den Datenschutz
, der Nationalen Kommission für Datenschutz des Großherzogtums Luxemburg (CNPD), eine Beschwerde einreichen. Die betreffende Postanschrift lautet: Commission nationale pour la protection des données, Service des plaints, 15, Boulevard du Jazz, L-4370 Belvaux, Luxemburg.
Der Vertreter im Vereinigten Königreich kann per Post für alle Anfragen zum Datenschutz in Großbritannien bei Bird & Bird GDPR Representative UK, 12 New Fetter Lane, Holburn, London EC4A 1JP kontaktiert werden.
11. Nähere Informationen zu automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung und Profiling
"
Automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung
" ist der Prozess der vollautomatischen Entscheidungsfindung ohne menschliche Beteiligung. In einigen Fällen könnten diese Entscheidungen
rechtliche oder ähnlich erhebliche Auswirkungen
auf Sie als natürliche Person haben. "
Profiling
" bezeichnet Analysen der Persönlichkeit, des Verhaltens, des Interesses und der Gewohnheiten einer Person, um Vorhersagen oder Entscheidungen über sie zu treffen. Soweit dies nach dem Recht der EU oder der Mitgliedstaaten zulässig oder für den Abschluss oder die Erfüllung eines Vertrags erforderlich ist, können wir in einigen Fällen automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung oder Profiling für Entscheidungen verwenden. Ein Beispiel für unseren Einsatz automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung ist die Bewertung Ihrer Kreditwürdigkeit, um Ihre Eignung für bestimmte Kreditprodukte zu beurteilen.
Wir glauben, dass PayPal durch das automatische Treffen solcher Entscheidungen seine Objektivität und Transparenz bei der Entscheidung, welche Dienste Ihnen angeboten werden, erhöht. Wir setzen mehrere Sicherheitsmechanismen ein, um sicherzustellen, dass die Entscheidungen angemessen sind. Zu diesen Mechanismen gehören laufende Übersichten unserer Entscheidungsmodelle und Stichproben im Einzelfall. Sie können stattdessen jederzeit eine manuelle Entscheidungsfindung verlangen, Ihre Meinung äußern oder eine Entscheidungsfindung anfechten, die ausschließlich auf einer automatisierten Verarbeitung, einschließlich Profiling, beruht, wenn eine solche Entscheidung
rechtliche Wirkung entfaltet oder Sie in ähnlicher Weise erheblich beeinträchtigt
. Weitere Informationen darüber, wie Sie diesen Entscheidungen widersprechen können, finden Sie in Abschnitt 10
("Ihre Datenschutzrechte")
.
Wenden Sie sich
online
an unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten, wenn Sie mehr über die Nutzung von automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung oder Profiling erfahren möchten.
12. Warum wir personenbezogene Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weitergeben
Haben Sie einen Kredit beantragt oder nutzen Sie unsere Kreditdienste, können wir zur Bearbeitung Ihres Antrags Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weitergeben, die uns Informationen über Sie geben, wie z.B. Ihre Finanzhistorie. Dies geschieht, um Kreditwürdigkeit und Produkteignung zu beurteilen, Ihre Identität zu überprüfen, offene Forderungen zu ermitteln und einzuziehen sowie kriminelle Handlungen zu verhindern.
Die Rechtsgrundlagen für diese Übermittlungen finden sich in Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstabe b (vertraglich) und Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstabe f (berechtigtes Interesse) der EU-Datenschutzgrundverordnung ("EU-DSGVO").
Wir werden auch weiterhin laufend Informationen über Sie mit Kreditauskunfteien austauschen, einschließlich über Ihre beglichenen Konten und alle Schulden, die nicht rechtzeitig vollständig zurückgezahlt wurden. Diese Informationen können von CRAs an andere Organisationen weitergegeben werden, um ähnliche Überprüfungen durchzuführen und Ihren Aufenthaltsort zu ermitteln und Schulden einzutreiben.
Ihre Daten werden auch mit den Daten aller gemeinsamen Bewerber oder anderer Finanzpartner verknüpft.
So erfahren Sie mehr
Wenden Sie sich
online
an unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten, wenn Sie mehr darüber erfahren möchten, welche Kreditauskunfteien wir für eine bestimmte Suche eingesetzt haben.
Hier
finden Sie die Liste der in Großbritannien und dem EWR genutzten Kreditauskunfteien, einschließlich der Identitäten der in den jeweiligen Ländern genutzten Kreditauskunfteien und eines Links zu deren Datenschutzerklärung, aus der Sie entnehmen können, wie diese personenbezogene Daten verwenden und weitergeben, einschließlich der Dauer der Speicherung dieser personenbezogenen Daten. Sie können sich an die Kreditauskunfteien, die im Land Ihres Wohnsitzes tätig sind, direkt wenden, wenn Sie Fragen zu deren Dienstleistungen, Ihrem Kreditscore oder zu den über Sie gespeicherten Daten haben. Das gleiche gilt, wenn Sie gegenüber den Kreditauskunfteien Ihre Rechte als betroffene Person ausüben möchten.
13. Wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten schützen
Wir führen technische, physische und administrative Sicherheitsmaßnahmen durch, um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten angemessen vor Verlust, Missbrauch, unbefugtem Zugriff, Weitergabe und Änderung zu schützen. Zu diesen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen gehören Firewalls, Datenverschlüsselung, physische Zugangsbeschränkungen für unsere Rechenzentren und Berechtigungskontrollen für den Zugriff auf Daten. Wir sorgen für die Sicherung unserer Systeme und Dienste. Für die Sicherheit und die Geheimhaltung Ihres Passworts bzw. Ihrer Passwörter und Ihres Kontoprofils bzw. Ihrer Anmeldedaten sind Sie jedoch selbst verantwortlich. Darüber hinaus liegt es in Ihrer Verantwortung zu prüfen, dass die personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie besitzen, richtig und auf dem aktuellen Stand sind. Wir haften nicht für den Schutz personenbezogener Daten, die wir auf Grundlage einer von Ihnen autorisierten Kontoverknüpfung an Dritte weitergeben.
14. Können Kinder unsere Dienste nutzen?
Wir erfassen wissentlich keine Informationen, einschließlich personenbezogener Daten, von Kindern unter 16 Jahren oder anderen Personen, die rechtlich nicht in der Lage sind, unsere Websites und Dienste zu nutzen. Wenn wir tatsächliche Kenntnis davon erhalten, dass wir personenbezogene Daten von jemandem erhoben haben, der unsere Dienste nicht nutzen darf, werden wir diese unverzüglich löschen, es sei denn, wir sind gesetzlich verpflichtet, diese Daten aufzubewahren.
Bitte
kontaktieren Sie uns
, wenn Sie glauben, dass wir irrtümlich oder unbeabsichtigt Daten von jemandem erhoben haben, der zur Nutzung unserer Dienste nicht berechtigt ist.
15. Aktualisierungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Diese Datenschutzerklärung wird von Zeit zu Zeit überarbeitet, um Änderungen an unserer Geschäftstätigkeit, unseren Diensten oder den geltenden Gesetzen Rechnung zu tragen. Wenn nach geltendem Recht auf die überarbeitete Fassung hinzuweisen ist, informieren wir Sie 30 Tage im Voraus durch Bekanntgabe der Änderung auf der Seite
AGB-Aktualisierungen
oder der Seite
Datenschutzerklärung
. Andernfalls wird die überarbeitete Datenschutzerklärung ab dem angegebenen Startdatum wirksam.
16. Hinweis zu Bankvorschriften für Nutzer im EWR und in Großbritannien
In der Regel verlangt das luxemburgische Recht, dem PayPal (in Bezug auf Datenschutz und Bankgeheimnis) unterliegt, einen höheren Grad an Transparenz als die meisten anderen Rechtsordnungen in der EU. Im Gegensatz zu den meisten Anbietern von Internet- oder Finanzdienstleistungen in der EU listen wir daher in dieser Datenschutzerklärung die Drittanbieter und Geschäftspartner, die Dienstleistungen für uns erbringen und denen gegenüber wir Ihre Daten offenlegen, sowie den Zweck der Offenlegung und die Art der offengelegten Daten auf. Einen Link zu diesen Drittanbietern finden Sie
hier
. Dadurch, dass Sie diese Datenschutzerklärung annehmen und ein Konto bei PayPal haben, willigen Sie ausdrücklich in die Übermittlung Ihrer Daten an diese Drittanbieter für die aufgeführten Zwecke ein.
PayPal kann die oben genannte Drittanbieterliste am ersten Werktag eines jeden Quartals (d.h. im Januar, April, Juli und Oktober) aktualisieren. PayPal beginnt erst 30 Tage nach dem Datum der Veröffentlichung der Liste innerhalb der Datenschutzerklärung mit der Übermittlung von Daten an eines der in der jeweiligen Aktualisierung neu aufgeführten Unternehmen oder für die dort neu aufgeführten Zwecke oder Datentypen. Sie sollten sich in jedem Quartal zu den oben genannten Terminen auf der PayPal-Website erneut mit der Liste vertraut machen. Wenn Sie der neuen Form der Datenübertragung nicht innerhalb von 30 Tagen nach Veröffentlichung der aktualisierten Drittanbieterliste widersprechen, gelten die Änderungen der Liste und dieser Datenschutzerklärung als von Ihnen angenommen. Sind Sie mit den Änderungen nicht einverstanden, steht es Ihnen frei, Ihr Konto zu schließen und unsere Dienste nicht mehr zu nutzen.
Um die PayPal-Dienste bereitstellen zu können, müssen wir möglicherweise bestimmte Daten, die wir (wie in dieser Datenschutzerklärung dargelegt) erhoben haben, an andere mit PayPal verbundene Unternehmen oder sonstige Stellen übermitteln, einschließlich solcher, die gemäß diesem Abschnitt eine Funktion als Zahlungsdienstleister, Zahlungsanbieter oder Kontoinhaber (oder ähnliche Funktionen) erfüllen. Sie erkennen an, dass diese Stellen in ihren jeweiligen Rechtsordnungen Gesetzen, Vorschriften, Untersuchungen, Ermittlungen oder Anordnungen unterworfen sein können, durch die sie zur Weitergabe von Daten an die zuständigen Behörden des betreffenden Landes verpflichtet sind. Durch die Nutzung der PayPal-Dienste willigen Sie in die Übermittlung solcher Daten durch uns zum Zweck der Bereitstellung der PayPal-Dienste an Sie ein.
Insbesondere stimmen Sie allen folgenden Datenverarbeitungsmaßnahmen zu und weisen PayPal an, diese vorzunehmen:
a. Offenlegung notwendiger Informationen gegenüber der Polizei und anderen Strafverfolgungsbehörden, Sicherheitskräften, zuständigen staatlichen, zwischenstaatlichen oder überstaatlichen Stellen, zuständigen Behörden, Abteilungen, Aufsichtsbehörden, Selbstregulierungsbehörden oder -organisationen (einschließlich der
hier
im Abschnitt "Behörden" der Drittanbieterliste genannten Stellen) und anderen Dritten, einschließlich Unternehmen der PayPal-Gruppe, (i) deren Weisungen wir gesetzlich verpflichtet und befugt sind, einzuhalten, unter anderem aufgrund der luxemburgischen Gesetze vom 24. Juli 2015 über das US-amerikanische Gesetz zur Einhaltung der Steuervorschriften für Auslandskonten ("FATCA-Gesetz") und vom 18. Dezember 2015 über die einvernehmlich festgelegten Standards für die Berichterstattung der OECD ("CRS-Gesetz"), (ii) bei denen wir Grund zu der Annahme haben, dass die Kooperation mit ihnen bei der Untersuchung von Betrugsfällen oder sonstigen tatsächlichen oder mutmaßlichen widerrechtlichen Aktivitäten geboten ist, oder (iii) zur Ermittlung von Verstößen gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen (dies gilt auch für Ihre Zahlungsquelle oder Ihren Kredit- oder Debitkartenanbieter).
Wenn Sie in den Geltungsbereich des FATCA- oder des CRS-Gesetzes fallen, sind wir dazu verpflichtet, Sie über die Weitergabe von Daten an die jeweiligen Behörden zu unterrichten. Informieren Sie sich über die Verpflichtungen von PayPal nach dem FATCA- und dem CRS-Gesetz sowie darüber, welche Auswirkungen diese Verpflichtungen für Sie haben können und welche Informationen wir gegebenenfalls im Zuge dieser Verpflichtungen weitergeben.
Wir und weitere Organisationen, einschließlich von Unternehmen, die Zahlungen über PayPal akzeptieren, können notwendige Daten (darunter auch Daten, die von Betrugsbekämpfungsstellen aufgezeichnet wurden, und Daten aus anderen Ländern) zum Zwecke der Bewertung und Verwaltung von Risiken (wie z.B. zur Verhinderung von Betrug, Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung) weitergeben, nutzen und auf sie zugreifen. Bitte wenden Sie sich an uns, wenn Sie weitere Informationen über die jeweiligen Betrugsbekämpfungsstellen wünschen. Klicken Sie
hier
, um weitere Informationen zu diesen Behörden, den Betrugsbekämpfungsstellen und sonstigen Dritten zu erhalten.
b. Offenlegung von Kontoinformationen gegenüber Inhabern von geistigem Eigentum, wenn diese nach dem maßgeblichen nationalen Recht eines EU-Mitgliedstaates einen außergerichtlichen Auskunftsanspruch gegen PayPal aufgrund einer Verletzung ihrer geistigen Eigentumsrechte haben, bei der PayPal-Dienste genutzt wurden (zum Beispiel § 19, Absatz 2, Unterabsatz 3 des deutschen Markengesetzes oder § 101, Absatz 2, Unterabsatz 3 des deutschen Urheberrechtsgesetzes).
c. Obligatorische Offenlegung aufgrund von Kreditkartenbestimmungen oder in straf- oder zivilrechtlichen Verfahren.
d. Offenlegung Ihres Namens und PayPal-Links im PayPal-Benutzerverzeichnis. Ihre Daten werden anderen PayPal-Kunden angezeigt, wenn diese eine Suche anhand Ihres Namens, Ihrer E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer oder eines Teils dieser Angaben durchführen. Dadurch soll sichergestellt werden, dass Zahlungen an den richtigen Empfänger erfolgen. Diese Funktion kann in den PayPal-Profileinstellungen deaktiviert werden.
e. Nutzen Sie als Händler einen Dritten für den Zugriff auf PayPal oder die Integration von PayPal, können wir notwendige Informationen an diesen Dritten zur Umsetzung und Verwaltung der betreffenden Vereinbarungen weitergeben (darunter den Status Ihrer PayPal-Integration, ob Sie ein aktives PayPal-Konto haben und ob Sie bereits mit einem anderen PayPal-Integrationspartner arbeiten).
f. Offenlegung notwendiger Daten gegenüber Zahlungsanbietern, Wirtschaftsprüfern, Kundenservice-Anbietern, Kreditauskunfteien und Betrugsbekämpfungsstellen, Anbietern von Finanzprodukten, Handelspartnern, Marketing- und PR-Unternehmen, Anbietern von operativen Dienstleistungen, Konzerngesellschaften, Agenturen, Marktplätzen und sonstigen Dritten, die
hier
aufgeführt sind. Zweck der Offenlegung ist die Bereitstellung der PayPal-Dienste an Sie. In der Drittanbieterliste haben wir außerdem unter jeder Kategorie nicht abschließende Beispiele von Drittanbietern (einschließlich deren Abtretungsempfängern und Rechtsnachfolgern) aufgeführt, gegenüber denen eine Offenlegung Ihrer Kontoinformationen derzeit tatsächlich stattfindet oder in Betracht gezogen werden kann. Neben dem Zweck der Offenlegung haben wir auch die offengelegten Informationen angegeben (soweit nicht anders angegeben, ist es diesen Drittanbietern gesetzlich bzw. vertraglich untersagt, die Informationen für einen anderen als den vorgesehenen Zweck zu nutzen).
g. Offenlegung erforderlicher Daten gegenüber Ihren Vertretern bzw. Verfahrensbevollmächtigten (z.B. dem Inhaber einer von Ihnen erteilten Vollmacht oder einem für Sie bestellten Vormund).
h. Offenlegung von zusammengefassten Statistikdaten an unsere Geschäftspartner oder PR-Partner. Wir können beispielsweise offenlegen, dass ein bestimmter Prozentsatz unserer Kunden in einer bestimmten Stadt lebt. Diese zusammengefassten Daten enthalten keine personenbezogenen Daten.
i. Weitergabe notwendiger Kontoinformationen an nicht mit uns verbundene (
hier
aufgeführte) Drittanbieter zu folgenden Zwecken:
Betrugsprävention und Risikosteuerung: Prävention von Betrug sowie Bewertung und Steuerung von Risiken.
Kundenservice: zu Zwecken des Kundenservice, einschließlich der Betreuung Ihrer Konten oder zur Klärung von Konflikten (z.B. in Bezug auf Rechnungen oder Transaktionen).
Versand: im Zusammenhang mit dem Versand und darauf bezogenen Dienstleistungen bei Käufen, die mit PayPal getätigt wurden.
Einhaltung gesetzlicher Vorschriften: zur Unterstützung der Verifizierungsanforderungen bei der Bekämpfung von Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung.
Dienstleister: um die mit uns vertraglich verbundenen Dienstleister in die Lage zu versetzen, uns bei geschäftlichen Vorgängen wie z.B. Betrugsprävention, Inkassomaßnahmen, Marketing, Kundenservice und Technologiedienstleistungen zu unterstützen. Diese Dienstleister werden von uns vertraglich verpflichtet, Ihre Daten nur für die Dienstleistungen zu verwenden, die sie für uns erbringen, nicht jedoch zu ihrem eigenen Nutzen.
17. Begriffsbestimmungen
Gerätedaten bezieht sich auf Daten, die automatisch von einem beliebigen Gerät erfasst werden können, das für den Zugriff auf die Seite oder Dienste verwendet wird. Zu diesen Daten gehören unter anderem Ihr Gerätetyp, die Netzwerkverbindungen Ihres Geräts, Name und IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, Informationen zum Webbrowser Ihres Geräts und zur Internetverbindung, mit denen Sie auf die Seiten oder Dienste zugreifen, Geolokalisierungsdaten, Informationen zu Apps, die auf Ihr Gerät heruntergeladen wurden, sowie biometrische Daten.
Geolokalisierungsinformationen sind Informationen, die Ihren Standort mit präziser Genauigkeit identifizieren, indem sie beispielsweise Längen- und Breitengradkoordinaten verwenden, die Sie über Ihr GPS oder Ihre Geräteeinstellungen erhalten.
Standortinformationen sind Informationen, die mit angemessener Genauigkeit Ihren ungefähren Standort identifizieren, indem beispielsweise Längen- und Breitengradkoordinaten verwendet werden, die durch GPS oder Wi-Fi oder Triangulation von Mobilfunkstandorten erhalten werden.
Partner bezeichnet den Händler oder das Unternehmen, mit dem unsere Benutzer Geschäfte tätigen, um Waren oder Dienstleistungen zu erhalten.
Bezahlen ohne PayPal-Konto hat dieselbe Bedeutung wie in den
Nutzungsbedingungen für Zahlungen ohne PayPal-Konto
.
PayPal-Unternehmen bedeuten Unternehmen, die Sich im Besitz von PayPal befinden und personenbezogene Daten gemäß ihren Nutzungsbedingungen und Datenschutzrichtlinien verarbeiten. PayPal Unternehmen sind Honey Science LLC, Paidy Inc., Happy Returns, LLC, HyperWallet und Braintree.
Personenbezogene Daten bezeichnet Informationen, die einer identifizierten oder direkt oder indirekt identifizierbaren natürlichen Person zugeordnet werden können. Zu "personenbezogenen Daten" zählen beispielsweise Name, Postanschrift (einschließlich Rechnungs- und Lieferadresse), Telefonnummer, E-Mail-Adresse, Zahlungskartennummer, sonstige Kontoinformationen, Kontonummer, Geburtsdatum, Daten aus amtlichen Ausweisen (z.B. Führerscheinnummer, Personalausweisnummer, Reisepassnummer) und biometrische Daten.
Verarbeitung bezeichnet jede Methode oder Art und Weise, wie wir mit personenbezogenen Daten oder Sätzen personenbezogener Daten umgehen, sei es durch automatisierte Mittel, wie z.B. durch Erhebung, Aufzeichnung, Kategorisierung, Strukturierung, Speicherung, Anpassung oder Änderung, Abruf und Konsultation, Verwendung, Offenlegung durch Übertragung, Verbreitung oder anderweitige Bereitstellung, Abgleich oder Kombination, Einschränkung, Löschung oder Vernichtung von personenbezogenen Daten.
Dienste bezeichnet alle Zahlungsdienste mit oder ohne die Markenbezeichnung "PayPal", die Funktion "Bezahlen ohne PayPal-Konto", Kreditprodukte und -dienste, Inhalte, Merkmale, Technologien oder Funktionen sowie alle zugehörigen Websites, Anwendungen und Dienste, die Ihnen von PayPal angeboten werden. Zur Nutzung der Dienste zählt auch die Nutzung unserer Website.
Seiten bezieht sich auf die Websites, mobilen Apps, offiziellen Social-Media-Plattformen oder andere Online-Tools, über die PayPal die Dienste anbietet und die diese Datenschutzerklärung veröffentlicht haben oder mit ihr verlinkt sind.
Markenlose Zahlungsdienste bedeutet, dass Sie mit Händlern interagieren und Zahlungen an diese leisten, indem Sie unsere Kartenzahlungsdienste verwenden, die nicht die Marke PayPal tragen.
Nutzer ist jede Person, die die Dienste als Verbraucher für den persönlichen oder Haushaltsgebrauch nutzt. Für die Zwecke dieser Mitteilung enthält "Benutzer" "Sie" und "Ihr".
18. Unsere Kontaktdaten
Unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten erreichen Sie
online
oder offline unter PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A, 22-24 Boulevard Royal L-2449, Luxemburg.
Wenn Sie
Einwohner des Vereinigten Königreichs
sind, wenden Sie sich an unseren Vertreter bei Bird & Bird GDPR Representative UK, 12 New Fetter Lane, Holburn, London EC4A 1JP.
Klicken Sie
hier
, um uns wegen Ihres PayPal-Kontos oder des PayPal-Kundenservices zu kontaktieren.
Klicken Sie
hier
, um uns wegen Ihres Xoom-Kontos oder des Xoom-Kundenservices zu kontaktieren.
Sub-policy 9
https://www.visa.de/nutzungsbedingungen/visa-privacy-center.html:
Visa Privacy Center
Globale Datenschutzmitteilung
Cookie-Hinweis von Visa
Länder-/Regionsspezifische Seite
Visa Privacy Center
Visa schätzt Ihr Vertrauen und respektiert Ihre Privatsphäre. Im Privacy Center erfahren Sie, wie wir Daten erheben, nutzen und teilen. Sie finden außerdem Links mit Hilfe zur Ausübung Ihrer Datenschutzrechte.
Globale Datenschutzmitteilung
Unsere
Globale Datenschutzmitteilung
erläutert, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben.
Wir haben auch einen
Cookie-Hinweis,
der unsere Praktiken in Bezug auf Cookies, Tags und ähnliche Arten von Onlinedaten, die wir erheben, erläutert.
Die folgenden zusätzlichen Datenschutzhinweise enthalten zusätzliche Informationen, wie gesetzlich vorgeschrieben:
Für Argentinien (Spanisch)
Für Australien (Englisch)
Für Brasilien (Portugiesisch)
Für Kanada (Englisch)
Für das chinesische Festland (vereinfachtes Chinesisch)
Für Kolumbien (Spanisch)
Für den europäischen Wirtschaftsraum (EWR) (Englisch)
Für Japan (Japanisch)
Für Taiwan (traditionelles Chinesisch)
Für die Türkei (Türkisch)
USA – kalifornische Datenschutzrechte (Englisch)
USA – Richtlinie zur Sozialversicherungsnummer und Hinweis zu sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten (Englisch)
Obwohl das Visa Global Privacy Program alle Informationen schützt, die wir erheben und nutzen, haben einige Visa Produkte und Plattformen ihre eigenen Datenschutzmitteilungen. Diese Mitteilungen spiegeln die geltenden unternehmensspezifischen Anforderungen wider. Bitte lesen Sie die auf unseren Websites und Plattformen veröffentlichten Datenschutzmitteilungen, wenn Sie sich anmelden.
Um einen Antrag auf Ausübung von Datenschutzrechten gemäß den relevanten Gesetzen einzureichen, gehen Sie bitte auf unser
Portal für Datenschutzrechte
.
Global Privacy Office von Visa kontaktieren
Senden Sie uns eine E-Mail
privacy@visa.com
Bitte geben Sie keine vertraulichen Daten wie Ihre Kontonummer in E-Mails an.
Schreiben Sie uns an
Visa Global Privacy Office
900 Metro Center Blvd.
Foster City, CA 94404, USA
Wir verwenden Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, wo dies zur Bereitstellung unserer Website erforderlich ist. Wir verwenden sie auch, um Ihre Präferenzen zu speichern, damit wir Ihnen das beste Online-Erlebnis bieten können, Ihre Besuche auf unseren Seiten analysieren und personalisiertes Marketing ermöglichen können (auch über unsere Marketingpartner). Weitere Details finden Sie in unserer
Cookie-Hinweis.
Akzeptieren
Alle ablehnen
Auswahl überprüfen
32
Unbedingt notwendig
Einwilligung für: Unbedingt notwendig
Diese Technologien sind für den zugrunde liegenden Betrieb der Website oder App notwendig bzw. zur Anzeige oder Unterstützung von Funktionen, die Sie anfordern.
Detailed description of cookies categorised as: Unbedingt notwendig.
Cookie
Verfalldatum
Domäne
Unternehmen
Zweck
Beschreibung
Cookie
cf_clearance
Verfalldatum
1 Jahr
Domäne
smartrecruiters.com
Unternehmen
Cloudflare, Inc.
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Speichert den Nachweis der bestandenen Herausforderung. Es wird verwendet, um keine Herausforderung mehr auszugeben, falls vorhanden. Es ist erforderlich, um einen Ursprungsserver zu erreichen.
Cookie
_cfuvid (x 7)
Verfalldatum
Sitzung
Domäne
usa.visa.com
Unternehmen
Cloudflare, Inc.
Zweck
Autorisierung
Beschreibung
Cookie im Zusammenhang mit Richtlinien zur Ratenbegrenzung. Cloudflare Rate Limiting ist eine Funktion, mit der Kunden hohe Anforderungsraten automatisch identifizieren und verringern können, entweder für bestimmte URLs oder für eine gesamte Domain.
Cookie
__cflb (x 3)
Verfalldatum
23 Stunden
Domäne
cdn.visa.com
Unternehmen
Cloudflare, Inc.
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Cookie im Zusammenhang mit dem Lastausgleich.
Cookie
__cfruid (x 7)
Verfalldatum
Sitzung
Domäne
visa.es
Unternehmen
Cloudflare, Inc.
Zweck
Autorisierung
Beschreibung
Cookie im Zusammenhang mit Richtlinien zur Ratenbegrenzung. Cloudflare Rate Limiting ist eine Funktion, mit der Kunden hohe Anforderungsraten automatisch identifizieren und verringern können, entweder für bestimmte URLs oder für eine gesamte Domain.
Cookie
__cf_bm (x 2)
Verfalldatum
30 Minuten
Domäne
chat.visa.com
Unternehmen
Cloudflare, Inc.
Zweck
Autorisierung
Beschreibung
Verwaltet die Bot-Verwaltung für unsere Site und verwaltet eingehenden Datenverkehr, der aus Sicherheitsgründen mit Bots verknüpft sein kann
Cookie
datadome
Verfalldatum
Sitzung
Domäne
smartrecruiters.com
Unternehmen
DataDome
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Dies ist ein Sicherheits-Cookie zur Erkennung von BOTS und bösartigem Datenverkehr.
Cookie
wscrCookieConsent
Verfalldatum
1 Jahr
Domäne
www.visa.de
Unternehmen
Digital Control Room Ltd
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Session Cookie (= gültig für die Dauer der jeweiligen Sitzung/ Nutzung unserer Webseite), das nur die Information enthält, ob Sie der Cookie­Nutzung bezogen auf die einzelnen Cookie­ Kategorien auf unserer Seite zugestimmt haben.
Cookie
receive-cookie-deprecation
Verfalldatum
1 Jahr
Domäne
doubleclick.net
Unternehmen
Google
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Um sich auf die Abschaffung von Drittanbieter-Cookies vorzubereiten, stellt Google Chrome-unterstützte Testmodi bereit, die es Websites ermöglichen, eine Vorschau des Verhaltens und der Funktionalität der Website ohne Drittanbieter-Cookies anzuzeigen.
Cookie
utag_main
Verfalldatum
1 Jahr
Domäne
visa.de
Unternehmen
Tealium
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Dient zum Speichern der Tealium-ID, die für die Analyse von Besucherinformationen erforderlich ist.
Cookie
lbs
Verfalldatum
Sitzung
Domäne
www.visa.de
Unternehmen
Visa
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Loadbalancer-Cookie zur Aufrechterhaltung der Sitzung.
Cookie
AWSALB
Verfalldatum
1 Stunde
Domäne
subscriptions.smartrecruiters.com
Unternehmen
Amazon Web Services, Amazon.com, Inc.
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Wird von Elastic Load Balancing von Amazon Web Services verwendet, um die Last auf den Servern effektiv auszugleichen.
Cookie
AWSALBCORS
Verfalldatum
1 Woche
Domäne
subscriptions.smartrecruiters.com
Unternehmen
Amazon Web Services, Amazon.com, Inc.
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Wird von Elastic Load Balancing von Amazon Web Services verwendet, um die Last auf den Servern effektiv auszugleichen.
Cookie
AWSELB
Verfalldatum
Sitzung
Domäne
rum.optimizely.com
Unternehmen
Amazon Web Services, Amazon.com, Inc.
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Wird von Elastic Load Balancing von Amazon Web Services verwendet, um die Last auf den Servern effektiv auszugleichen.
Cookie
AWSELBCORS
Verfalldatum
Sitzung
Domäne
rum.optimizely.com
Unternehmen
Amazon Web Services, Amazon.com, Inc.
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Wird von Elastic Load Balancing von Amazon Web Services verwendet, um die Last auf den Servern effektiv auszugleichen.
Cookie
ar_debug
Verfalldatum
30 Tage
Domäne
doubleclick.net
Unternehmen
DoubleClick, Google LLC
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Dieses Cookie wird von DoubleClick zum Debuggen von Anzeigen verwendet.
Cookie
ar_debug
Verfalldatum
90 Tage
Domäne
region1.google-analytics.com
Unternehmen
Google Analytics, Google LLC
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Dieses Cookie wird von Google Analytics verwendet, wenn der Debug-Modus mit dem Google Tag Assistant aktiviert wird.
Cookie
__Secure-ROLLOUT_TOKEN
Verfalldatum
180 Tage
Domäne
youtube.com
Unternehmen
YouTube, Google LLC
Zweck
Ihr Besuch
Beschreibung
Funktionale Bereitstellung von YouTube
0
Site-Erfahrung
Einwilligung für: Site-Erfahrung
Diese Technologien werden verwendet, um Ihre Erfahrung zu unterstützen, und beinhalten vom Benutzer angewählte Auswahlmöglichkeiten und Navigationshilfen.
Für folgende Kategorien verwenden wir keine Cookies
17
Leistung und Betrieb
Einwilligung für: Leistung und Betrieb
Diese Technologien werden zur Verwaltung einer Website oder App verwendet. Dies umfasst die Aufzeichnung der Besucherzahlen und die Erkennung von möglichen Problemen.
Detailed description of cookies categorised as: Leistung und Betrieb.
Cookie
Verfalldatum
Domäne
Unternehmen
Zweck
Beschreibung
Cookie
gi
Verfalldatum
1 Tag
Domäne
r.3gl.net
Unternehmen
Catchpoint Systems, Inc.
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
Catchpoint überwacht Ihre Erfahrungen auf der Website, um Probleme schnell zu erkennen, zu identifizieren und zu beheben.
Cookie
ua
Verfalldatum
1 Stunde
Domäne
r.3gl.net
Unternehmen
Catchpoint Systems, Inc.
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
Catchpoint überwacht Ihre Erfahrungen auf der Website, um Probleme schnell zu erkennen, zu identifizieren und zu beheben.
Cookie
_cs_c
Verfalldatum
1 Jahr, 1 Monat
Domäne
visa.de
Unternehmen
ContentSquare
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
ContentSquare hilft bei der Optimierung des Website-Designs. Diese Cookies speichern die Zustimmung des Besuchers, verfolgt zu werden.
Cookie
_cs_
<digits>
* (x 2)
Verfalldatum
Sitzung
Domäne
visa.de
Unternehmen
ContentSquare
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
ContentSquare hilft bei der Optimierung des Website-Designs.
Cookie
_cs_id
Verfalldatum
13 Monate
Domäne
visa.de
Unternehmen
ContentSquare
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
ContentSquare hilft bei der Optimierung des Website-Designs. Dieser Cookie erkennt anonym einen wiederkehrenden Besucher.
Cookie
_cs_mk
Verfalldatum
30 Minuten
Domäne
visa.de
Unternehmen
ContentSquare
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
Dieses Cookie wird für die Integration von Google Analytics und Adobe Analytics verwendet. Es stellt sicher, dass die Dimensionen und Evars von Adobe und Google nur einmal alle 30 Minuten festgelegt werden.
Cookie
_cs_root-domain
Verfalldatum
Sitzung
Domäne
visa.de
Unternehmen
ContentSquare
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
ContentSquare hilft bei der Optimierung des Website-Designs.
Cookie
_cs_s
Verfalldatum
30 Minuten
Domäne
visa.de
Unternehmen
ContentSquare
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
ContentSquare hilft bei der Optimierung des Website-Designs. Dieses Cookie enthält die Anzahl der Seitenaufrufe.
Cookie
_pk_id
*
Verfalldatum
2 Jahre
Domäne
www.visa.de
Unternehmen
Matomo
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
Erkennen Sie einen wiederkehrenden Besucher.
Cookie
_pk_ses
*
Verfalldatum
30 Minuten
Domäne
www.visa.de
Unternehmen
Matomo
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
Erkennen Sie einen wiederkehrenden Besucher.
Cookie
optimizelyRumLB
Verfalldatum
Sitzung
Domäne
rum.optimizely.com
Unternehmen
Optimizely, Inc.
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
Wird von der Analytics-Plattform verwendet. Optimiert, um A / B-Tests bereitzustellen, indem das Site-Design für eine Stichprobe von Benutzern geändert wird. Bewegungen werden verfolgt, um Daten über die erfolgreichste Site-Variante zu sammeln.
Cookie
ELOQUA
Verfalldatum
2 Jahre
Domäne
eloqua.com
Unternehmen
Eloqua, Oracle Corporation
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
Dieses Cookie hat ein Wertepaar aus guid = zufällig generierter Zeichen- und Zahlenfolge. Wird für die Datensuche verwendet, die das dynamische Abrufen von Daten aus dem Eloqua-System zur Verwendung auf einer bestimmten Webseite ermöglicht. Der Datenumfang, der zurückgegeben werden kann, ist praktisch unbegrenzt, sodass Kontakt-, Interessenten-, Datenkarten-, Gruppenmitgliedschafts- oder Besucherdaten zurückgegeben werden können. Datensuchen werden verwendet, um Daten in einem Formular aufzufüllen oder zu überprüfen, ob der Kontakt Teil einer E-Mail-Gruppe ist.
Cookie
ELQSTATUS
Verfalldatum
2 Jahre
Domäne
eloqua.com
Unternehmen
Eloqua, Oracle Corporation
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
Dieses Cookie wird NUR gelöscht, wenn der Client der Verfolgung zustimmt. Wird für die Datensuche verwendet, die das dynamische Abrufen von Daten aus dem Eloqua-System zur Verwendung auf einer bestimmten Webseite ermöglicht. Der Datenumfang, der zurückgegeben werden kann, ist praktisch unbegrenzt, sodass Kontakt-, Interessenten-, Datenkarten-, Gruppenmitgliedschafts- oder Besucherdaten zurückgegeben werden können. Datensuchen werden verwendet, um Daten in einem Formular aufzufüllen oder zu überprüfen, ob der Kontakt Teil einer E-Mail-Gruppe ist.
Cookie
_ga
Verfalldatum
2 Jahre
Domäne
visa.de
Unternehmen
Google Analytics, Google LLC
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
Ein eindeutiges Identifizierungszeichen, das jedem Browser zugewiesen wird und die Interaktion mit der Website verfolgt.
Cookie
_ga_
*
(x 2)
Verfalldatum
2 Jahre
Domäne
visa.de
Unternehmen
Google Analytics, Google LLC
Zweck
Analysen
Beschreibung
Ein eindeutiges Identifizierungszeichen, das jedem Browser zugewiesen wird und die Interaktion mit der Website verfolgt.
19
Marketing, Personalisierung und Werbung
Einwilligung für: Marketing, Personalisierung und Werbung
Diese Technologien sammeln Informationen über Ihr Surfverhalten. Wir arbeiten darüber hinaus mit Werbepartnern zusammen, um online personalisierte Anzeigen an Sie zu liefern. Weitere Informationen zu unseren Marketing- und Werbeaktivitäten finden Sie
in unserem globalen Privacy Center
Detailed description of cookies categorised as: Marketing, Personalisierung und Werbung.
Cookie
Verfalldatum
Domäne
Unternehmen
Zweck
Beschreibung
Cookie
ad-id
Verfalldatum
24 Jahre
Domäne
amazon-adsystem.com
Unternehmen
Amazon.com, Inc.
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Wird verwendet, um eine Anfrage an DoubleClick for Advertisers (DFA) zu senden, eine Floodlight-Impression aufzuzeichnen und alle dynamischen Tags zurückzugeben, die bereitgestellt werden müssen.
Cookie
ad-privacy
Verfalldatum
24 Jahre
Domäne
amazon-adsystem.com
Unternehmen
Amazon.com, Inc.
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Wird verwendet, um eine Anfrage an DoubleClick for Advertisers (DFA) zu senden, eine Floodlight-Impression aufzuzeichnen und alle dynamischen Tags zurückzugeben, die bereitgestellt werden müssen.
Cookie
CMID
Verfalldatum
1 Jahr
Domäne
casalemedia.com
Unternehmen
Casale Media Inc.
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Sammelt Daten über Benutzer im Auftrag der Werbeplattform Casale Media Inc. Die Daten werden verwendet, um die Faktoren für die Anzeigenschaltung zu steuern, einschließlich der Häufigkeit, mit der eine Anzeige geschaltet wird, und um Anpassungen an ihren Kampagnen vorzunehmen.
Cookie
CMPRO
Verfalldatum
90 Tage
Domäne
casalemedia.com
Unternehmen
Casale Media Inc.
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Sammelt Daten über Benutzer im Auftrag der Werbeplattform Casale Media Inc. Die Daten werden verwendet, um die Faktoren für die Anzeigenschaltung zu steuern, einschließlich der Häufigkeit, mit der eine Anzeige geschaltet wird, und um Anpassungen an ihren Kampagnen vorzunehmen.
Cookie
CMPS
Verfalldatum
90 Tage
Domäne
casalemedia.com
Unternehmen
Casale Media Inc.
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Sammelt Daten über Benutzer im Auftrag der Werbeplattform Casale Media Inc. Die Daten werden verwendet, um die Faktoren für die Anzeigenschaltung zu steuern, einschließlich der Häufigkeit, mit der eine Anzeige geschaltet wird, und um Anpassungen an ihren Kampagnen vorzunehmen.
Cookie
tuuid
Verfalldatum
2 Jahre
Domäne
company-target.com
Unternehmen
Demandbase Inc.
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Verhaltensverfolgung mittels Cookies, die die Lieferung gezielter Werbung ermöglichen.
Cookie
tuuid_lu
Verfalldatum
2 Jahre
Domäne
company-target.com
Unternehmen
Demandbase Inc.
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Verhaltensverfolgung mittels Cookies, die die Lieferung gezielter Werbung ermöglichen.
Cookie
bcookie
Verfalldatum
2 Jahre
Domäne
linkedin.com
Unternehmen
LinkedIn Corporation
Zweck
Social Networking
Beschreibung
Browser Identifier-Cookie zur eindeutigen Identifizierung von Geräten, die auf LinkedIn zugreifen, um Missbrauch auf der Plattform zu erkennen
Cookie
lidc
Verfalldatum
1 Tag
Domäne
linkedin.com
Unternehmen
LinkedIn Corporation
Zweck
Social Networking
Beschreibung
Wird von der Social Networking Plattform der LinkedIn Corporation gesetzt, wenn ein Website-Besucher eine Seite der Website lädt, das ein "Follow us"-PlugIn von LinkedIn enthält.
Cookie
li_gc
Verfalldatum
2 Jahre
Domäne
linkedin.com
Unternehmen
LinkedIn Corporation
Zweck
Social Networking
Beschreibung
Wird verwendet, um die Zustimmung der Gäste zur Verwendung von Cookies für nicht wesentliche Zwecke zu speichern
Cookie
tvid
Verfalldatum
1 Jahr
Domäne
tremorhub.com
Unternehmen
Tremor International Ltd.
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Softwareunternehmen für Online-Videowerbung
Cookie
tv_UIDM
Verfalldatum
1 Jahr, 1 Monat
Domäne
tremorhub.com
Unternehmen
Tremor International Ltd.
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Softwareunternehmen für Online-Videowerbung
Cookie
_gcl_au
Verfalldatum
3 Monate
Domäne
visa.de
Unternehmen
AdSense, Google LLC
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Google AdSense sammelt Statistiken über die Nutzung seines Dienstes, um Marketingentscheidungen zu treffen
Cookie
IDE
Verfalldatum
2 Jahre
Domäne
doubleclick.net
Unternehmen
DoubleClick, Google LLC
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Enthält einen eindeutigen Code, mit dem ermittelt wird, welche Anzeigen auf einem Gerät im Auftrag von Google Inc. angezeigt wurden. Werbeplattform DoubleClick. Ermöglicht die Überwachung der Effektivität der Anzeigen und macht die Anzeigen für den Nutzer relevanter.
Cookie
test_cookie
Verfalldatum
15 Minuten
Domäne
doubleclick.net
Unternehmen
DoubleClick, Google LLC
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Überprüft im Auftrag der Google Inc. Werbeplattform "DoubleClick", ob der Browser eines Nutzers Cookies unterstützt.
Cookie
_fbp
Verfalldatum
90 Tage
Domäne
visa.de
Unternehmen
Facebook, Meta Platforms, Inc.
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Dieses Cookie hilft dabei, unsere Werbung an Personen zu liefern, die unsere Website bereits besucht haben, wenn sie sich auf Facebook oder einer von Facebook Advertising betriebenen digitalen Plattform befinden.
Cookie
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Verfalldatum
240 Tage
Domäne
youtube.com
Unternehmen
YouTube, Google LLC
Zweck
Werbung
Beschreibung
Speichert, ob YouTube für den jeweiligen Website-Besucher den neuen oder alten Stil des Video-Interfaces anzeigen soll.
Cookie
VISITOR_PRIVACY_METADATA
Verfalldatum
180 Tage
Domäne
youtube.com
Unternehmen
YouTube, Google LLC
Zweck
Social Networking
Beschreibung
Indicates acceptance of YouTube's privacy review
Cookie
YSC
Verfalldatum
Sitzung
Domäne
youtube.com
Unternehmen
YouTube, Google LLC
Zweck
Social Networking
Beschreibung
Ein eindeutiges Identifizierungszeichen, das für jeden Nutzer erstellt wird, wenn dieser ein YouTube-Video abruft.
Cookie-Hinweis
Weitere Informationen zur Verwendung von Cookies finden Sie unter
Visa Cookie Notice
.
Powered by
Digital Control Room
Sub-policy 10
https://www.global.jcb/en/about-us/policy/privacy/:
Rectangle 1
Angle
Rectangle 1
chip
Rectangle 1
Expand
FB
G+
JCB-logo
Location
Rectangle 2
Rectangle 1
Rectangle 2
Search
Security
Thumbprint
twitter
up-arrow
Brand
privacy policy
Please ask your card issuer for its Privacy Policy.
Personal Information Protection Policy
Personal Information Protection Policy
Regional Policies
European Privacy Notice
JCB has decided on "European Privacy Notice" for UK and the European Economic Area (EEA) in compliance with GDPR.
European Privacy Notice
JCB Singapore Data
Protection Policy
JCB has decided on "JCB Data Protection Policy" under Singapore's Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (PDPA).
JCB Singapore Data Protection Policy
JCB Korean Privacy Policy
JCB has decided on "JCB Privacy Policy" under Korea's Personal Information Protection Act (the "PIPA").
JCB Korean Privacy Policy
JCB Thailand Privacy Notice
JCB has decided on "JCB Privacy Notice"
under Thailand's Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
JCB Thailand Privacy Notice (English)
JCB Thailand Privacy Notice (Thai)
JCB Indonesia Privacy Notice
JCB has decided on "JCB Privacy Notice" under Indonesia's Personal Data Protection Law (PDPL).
JCB Indonesia Privacy Notice (English)
JCB Indonesia Privacy Notice (Indonesia)
Cookie & Web Beacon Policy
Cookie & Web Beacon Policy
Home
About Us
Brand privacy policy
↑
We use cookies in order to manage secure websites and to provide optimum contents and services. 　By clicking “I agree.” below, you agree that we may store and access cookies on your device.
To get more details or to change your cookie settings for our website, please click
“More Information”
More information
I agree.